 Indian Documents; 
consisting of 
Reports of Committees, and Letters relating 
the civilization of the American Indians,
1807 to 1848 To facilitate the labors of those who may take 
interest in the proceedings of Friends of New York Yearly 
Meeting in relation to the civilization of the Indians, 
these Papers--found with other documents long con- 
sidered of little or no value--have been arranged, 
mostly in chronological order, and preserved in this 
form,--by Wm. Wood 
New York 4 mo 4. 1875 Donation of 4000 dolls. from England for benefit 
of the Indians. Philad. 7 mo. 23. 1807 Thomas Franklin 
Esteemed Friend The Letter of the Committee of your Yearly 
Meeting on the Indian concern, dated on the 27th day of the 
5th mo., sign'd by thee on their behalf, was lately consider'd 
by a Committee of our Meeting for Sufferings, to whose 
particular care & attention the right application of the 
Donation of our Friends in England had been referr'd, 
they on persuing your written communication & hearing 
several of our brethren, Members of our Indian 
Committee, who had attended your late Yearly Meeting 
& obtain'd some information of the state & progress of this 
concern with you, concluded to recommend to our Meeting 
for Sufferings held on the 17th Just, that the sum of four 
thousand Dollars part of the said Donation, be paid 
to your Committee on Indian Affairs--which being 
accorded with, we were appointed to inforn your Committee 
thereof & that their order or draught for that sum on 
Henry Drinker Treasurer of our Yearly Meeting will be 
paid, Thy loving Friends Henry Drinker 
Tho. Stewardson Proposition In teaching the Oneida Children. The Committee, under whose care the Yearly Meeting 
has placed its concern relative to the Indian Natives, in 
in their deliberations from time to time on this impor- 
tant subject, have been led to apprehend that in order to 
be more extensively useful to that People, the attention of 
Friends should be particularly turned to the young and 
rising generation, who are in great want of suitable 
instruction; and as a friend & his family have for some 
time resided with the Brothertown Tribe, whose services 
have been found very useful to them, & the want of similar 
assistance in the Oneida Tribe is sensibly felt, we are now 
induced to spread the subject in this manner with few 
the view of encouraging a Friend & his wife particularly, 
or a single man, who may feel their minds disposed to 
go & reside amongst that Tribe for a time, for the 
purpose of instructing their Childern & aiding the 
endeavours of the Committee in the promotion of 
thier civilization & welfare. The clerk is directed to forward Copies of 
this minute to the several Quarterly Meetings in 
the Yearly Meeting. Extracted from the Minutes of the Comm- 
ittee at a Meeting held in New York 23rd of 5th mo. 1808Samuel Parsons Clerk Letter from Stockbridge Women-- 
asking to be taught to spin, &c. Copy of a Letter from several Indian Women 
New StockbridgeJan. 30th 1810 
Dear friends We write this to inform you that through a kind Providence we 
are all well, we hope we are united in love to our blessed Saviour. 
We take this oppertunity to thank you for all your good Counsel to us 
and our People both in your letters and when ever you have visited 
us; all your good words we have laid up in our minds: But par- 
ticularly of late we have thought much about what you have 
advised us with respect to learning our Children to spin and make 
Cloth, which we think is the best measure we can take 
toward making some progress toward a Civilized life. We have therefore concluded to set about this Important work, 
and have agreed with Mary Peters (so called) who is Married 
but has agreed to undertake a spinning school next summer and 
make a trial what can be done now in order to effect this important 
good work: We wish for your assistance to procure wheels 
Flax, perhaps some wool or a few Sheep to begin with; and 
also Flaxseed to be given to those of our Men who will engage to 
Culturate it according to the manner of farmers; we wish you 
to take these things into consideration that we may see how we 
can get along. We wish you every blessing and remain your 
friends 
Friends. Hannah Jackson Hannah Harlan Ann Miflin Hannah Gifford Elizabeth Joseph Elizabeth Pye Esther Letchman Mary Pye Catharine Letchman Copy of Letter on page 9. Copy of 
a Letter from the Onondaga Indians, to the Yearly 
Meeting of Friends in New York. Friends & Brothers, We have heard from your Council-Fire once 
more. We heard that you wanted to know whether we 
the Onondagas had left off the use of ardent Spirits, or 
not. We have left off a long time ago; you told us to 
leave off, the Great Spirit told us to leave off: we have 
listened to His voice; there are some who visit us from 
the Oneidas who drink; we think they will leave off by 
our good advice. Brothers 
We are in want of Cattle, Chains, Ploughs, and all 
kinds of Farming-utensils; you have told us you would 
help us; we were glad to hear you were willing to help us. Brothers 
We are in want of Black-Smiths, Carpenters and 
other Mechanics: We want to teach our Children to work: 
we have opened our Eyes, we now see we must work, we 
are willing to work: we begin to raise Wheat, and will 
do more if we can get help. Brothers 
A part of our Tribe lives at Buffalo; they are of 
the same mind with us; We all agree: We wish you, if you 
will, to help us to oxen and farming tools and that you 
would send them as soon as you can, as we are much in 
want. You will find us of the mind as you did when 
you were here. We hope to hear from you soon. Brothers, 
We respect you, and wish you all well: re- 
member us at your great Council: we look to you 
as our Friends, (Signed by four of our Chiefs) 
Onondago 
April 8th 1811 
To the Friends or Quakers at New York. 
to the care of our Friend residing at the Oneida 
Castle. Epistle from the Onondagas. 4 mo 1811 to the Friends or Quakers at New York 
to the Care of our friend residing at the 
Oneida Castle Friends and Brothers we have heard from your 
Counsel fire once more we heard that you 
wanted to know whether we the onondagas had 
left off the use of Sparits or not. 
Brothers we have Left of a Long time ago you 
told us to Leave of the grate Sparet told us 
to Leave of we have listind to his vois. 
thair is sum that visit us from the onidas that 
drink we think they will Leave of by our good 
advice. Brothers we air in want of Cattle Chains Plows 
and All kinds of farming uatenshels you 
have told us that you would help us 
we wair glad to hear that you wair Willin 
to help us. Brothers we air in want of Black Smiths Carpenters 
and other Mecanicks we want to Larn our Children 
to work we have opend our Eyes we now see 
that we must work we air willing to work we 
begin to rase wheat and will due more if 
we Can git help. Brothers a part of our tribe Lives at Bufaloa 
thay air of the same mind with us we all agree 
we wish if you will help us to oxin and farming 
tools that you would send them on as soon as 
you Can as we air much in want you will 
find us of the mind as you did when you was 
hear we hope to hear from you soon. 
 Brothers we respect you and wish you all well remember 
us at your grate Counsell we Look to you as our 
frinds. Signed by four of our Cheafs You non e talack 
his X Mark his X Mark John his X Mark tutios his X Mark Abraham X Brand John X mark Onondaga Apral 8 1811 NB plas to write by 
the Bairer friends by the requst of the onondagos i will inform 
you as to their sittiation thay air industrius and sober 
they appear to be onest in thair deal one with 
a nother and with the White Paple thair nabors 
thay want a Little in Currigment and i think 
often Exprest to me thair wish to Larn the 
use of tools and to have thair Children 
Eddicatid i think thair is as fair a prospect 
at this place as any that i know of among 
the Natives. yurs with esteem and respect 
Eph. Webstr. 
 Onondaga 
April 8 1811 Letter 
from 
Onandaga 
Chiefs 
to 
Friends 
 of 
New York 
& 
reply. Address from the Onandago Tribe of Indians 
 Friends and Brothers We have heard from your 
Counsil fire once more, we have heard that you 
wanted to know whether the Onondagoes had left off 
the use of Strong Drink or not. Brothers we have 
left off a long time ago, you tols us to leave off the 
Great spirit told us to leave off. we have listened 
to his voice; there are some that visite us from the 
Oneidas that drink, we think they will leave off 
by our good advice Brothers we are in want of Cattle, Chaines 
Ploughs, and all Kinds of farming utensils, you 
have told us that you would help us, we were 
glad to hear you were willing to help us Brothers We are in want of Blacksmyths 
Carpenters, and other Mechanics, we want to learn 
our children to work, we have opened our eyes 
we now see that we must work, we are willing 
to work we begin to raise wheat, and will do 
more if we can get help Brothers a part of our tribe lives at Buffaloe 
they are of the same mind with us, we all agree 
we wish If you will help us to Oxen, and farming 
utensiles, that you would send then on as soon 
as you can, as we are much in want, you will 
find us of the same mind, as when you ware 
here, we hope to hear from you soon Brothers We respect you and wish you 
all well remember us at your great Council 
we look to you as our friends. Signed by four 
of our Chiefs.
 You non e talach Ieong Tulios Abraham Brand 
Onondago 8th April 1811 
To the Friends or Quakers 
at New York To the care 
of our friend residing at 
the Oneida Castle Answer Brothers and Sisters of the Onandago Tribe 
Friends and Brothers Your letter was read in 
our Council, and our hearts were made glad 
 to find you had listened to the voice of the great 
Spirit in leaving off strong drink. We hope you 
will continue on this good resolution, daily seeking 
to the great Spirit to strengthen you in it Brothers we are glad you have got your 
eyes opened to see what is good for you, and that 
it is right and honorable to cultivate the Earth, so 
that you and your families may live comfortably Sisters We want you to help forward this 
good work, not only by encouraging the Men to be 
sober and industrious, but by being so yourselves 
doing your part of the business, by learning to 
spin, weave make clothing for yourselves and 
families, and keeping your houses and all 
around you neat and clean. Brothers and 
Sisters We wish you would be careful to 
bring up your Children well teach them to 
hearken to what the Good Spirit says in their 
hearts to love one another, to be Industrious 
The sons to help their Fathers plough, hoe, and 
raise grain, and the daughters to assist their 
Mothers in things about the House such as 
spinning, weaving, sewing and keeping all clean 
and in good order so that when old age comes upon 
the Fathers, and Mothers the children by their 
Iddustry and good conduct may make them 
comfortable by their fire sides As we want to encourage you in 
your good resolutions, we have desired our 
friends to go and see you and they will 
assist you by lending you such oxen & Farming utensils as you stand in need of 
of which we desire you will take good care We are your Friends 
Signed on behalf of the Committee 
of the yearly meeting of Friends of New 
York 31st of 5th Month 1811 Treasurer's Account 
5 mo 20. 1811 
 Indian Committee with John Barrow Treas. D. 1810 6 mo 10 To Cash p. Jn Dean p. order of Com. $125-- 7 m. 4 To Cash p. order from Absolem Hatfield 50-- 8.14. To Cash p. Jn. Griffin p. order of Com. 23.44 10.18. To Cash p. Dft from Abs. Hatfield 125-- 1811 4 m. 9 To Cash p Jn. Dean p. Jn. Murray 125-- 11. To Cash p. A. Hatfield p. Jn. Murray 75-- 11. To Cash p. S. Mott p. order Com. 10-- 5.10. To Cash p. Dft from A. Hatfield 200-- To Balance due Com. 107.45 $846.89 1811 5 m. 19. To Cash p R Povine p. order Com. 15.48 Cr. 1810 5 m. 17. By Balance in my hands (reported $542.80 11 m. 16. By Cash Int. on P. G. Shuyvasants Bond 280-- By Balance of Int 24--9 $846.89 1811 
5 m. 20 By Balance in my hands $107.45 15.48 $91.97 Interest Account. Dr. $125 11.10 7.07 56 10.16 3--2 23.44 9.8 1--7 125 7.2 4.41 215 1.10 1.42 200 10 --33 $17.32 By $542 1.0.3 $32.83 280 6.4 8.58 $41.41 P.G. Shuyvasants Bond $4000 Int. paid Jn. Murray p. Noke 811 Int. due 
from dates Jn. & Dixie 300 Int. due 
from dates Jn. Roakes Noke 125 Int. due 
from dates Onida Chiefs Noke 85 Int. due 
from dates Philena Hunts Noke 50 Int. due 
from dates E.E. 
New York 5 mo 20. 1811 Jn. Barrow Report 
of 
Committee 
to visit 
Onondagas 
1811 We had an interview with the Onondagos on the 14 of 6th Mo, 1811 
a Number present with their Cheifs they exprest a gladness 
 in the oppertunity, appeared hearily to thank the Great Spirit 
in preserving us on our long Jurney and giving us this Opertunity We then informed them that we Joined with them in Ackno- 
ledging the kind care of the great Spirit in preserving us and 
in giving us this Oppertunity and that We for a long time had 
them on our minds and that we believed that the great spirit 
warmed our hearts with Desires to do them Good, and that we 
had come for that intent, tho it is but a little that we could do. We then presented the letter--they then very Deliberately 
took up and Considered every sentence in the Letter and Oth- 
erwise communicated and exprest their approbation--they 
then informed us of their situation their former manner of living 
said they, had got their eyes opened, saw it was best to cultivate 
the land and that they ware willing to work but wanted Oxen 
and Farming tools and some body to shew them how to mannage, 
that they had Confidence in their Brothers the Quakers. They 
wanted their Instruction and advice and above all they wishd 
a strickt attention and care to their Childrens education, they 
 wanted a school among them for (say they) if we send them 
abroad they Learn what is bad, Get their mind alineated from 
a love and desire to do the Nation Good, and feel above them, and 
so become Useless to the Nation and white people to, by mixing 
with the Baser sort of whit people, and so bring in that which 
is bad which their young people learn--for which they are 
very sorry--but if they had a school among them they could 
often put them in mind to fear the Great Spirit and so bring 
them up to love their Parrents and Nation, and so the would becom 
useful and make good interpreters for them. The Next day 
15th we met them at one of their feasts of Worship near all the Na- 
tion present they again thanked the Great Spirit for preserving 
us another night and gibing us another oppertunity, we then 
told them that we whare very glad to find them thus mindfull 
of the Great Spirit and that we desired to join with them in the 
same, and that we hoped that they would continue in their good 
resolution and as the Great Spirit sees and knows all that we did 
that we hoped they would be carefull not to do any thing which 
they thought would be wrong in his Sight, we also Informed 
them how Glad it made our hearts to find them so carefull of 
their Children, we desired them to continue to teach them to 
work to love their Parents and obay them, and their Cheifts but 
above all to fear the Great Spirit who made them, and do not- 
hing they thought would be Displeasing to him--and desired 
them to keep strong from drink--they then seriously counseled 
together and then gave us some account of the form and manner 
of their Government, Interdus'd us to their head men the Cheifts 
--and as we now Informed them that we ware about to leave 
them we desired them to take Good care of the Oxen and the tools 
which the Committy lent them, and thought we or some of 
the Committy would make them another Visit in the course 
of this Season--they then thanked us for the Oxen and tools 
said they would take good care of them and endeavour no damage 
should befall them except the ware. One of the Cheifts 
in a very animated Speach eschorted the People--said the talk 
of making us another Visit, now how should we feel seeing we 
have promised to do well if when they come find some of us 
drunk how shamed we should be to have them know we lyed 
and did bad to--this would be Bad enough, for we have promised 
them we would not Drink, Now Remember (says he) we promised 
the Great Spirit we would not drink nor do bad, now if we are 
afraid that these our good Friends should know that we do what 
is not wright, how much more should we be afraid to lye to 
the Great Spirit and do any thing wrong, when the Great Spi- 
rit sees and knows all we do and say every Day and every Nig- 
ht. Now we have been thus particular for we considered 
the Indervew a very Interesting one and the Ideas the commun- 
icated worth preserving and what the Committy would be 
willing to have. And now we desire that truth 
might be sought and waited for in seperating to go among
them least they should be harmed, we may see they have 
a high opinion of Friends, they also are as quick to discover 
and Notice any thing wrong as any People we know of, I 
believe we have felt our own weakness and Insoficiency 
and have been afraid least we should hurt the Oil or the wine The parable of the seed sown in the field and the Lord answer to 
the servants was often revived in our minds, when the servants 
sayed wilt thou that we pluck up the tares. The Lord says not so 
least ye pluck up the wheat also. Now we feel easy to leave the 
subject for further consideration. We also took a little view at the Oneida, found Absalom 
very unwell--we also say three of the Chiefts they desired to be 
remembered to the Committy their Good Brothers the Quakers 
hoped they would not forsake them tho some of them did conduct 
bad, they said they had bread corn so as to be comfortable Signed on behalf of the Committy by Joseph Frost Onondagas Dear Friend 
Sam. A. Parsons I should have written to thee before but 
I concluded that Charles Willetts would inform 
thee all I had to Communicate Respecting our first viset 
to our friendly People of the Onondaga tribe--I last 
Evening Returned from a second visit (John Dean acompaneyed 
me) I think their Conduct and apereance are a Confermation 
that the Concern of Friends for the good of the Indians are 
a Cooperation of that Sperit which prouceth that life which 
breates peace on Earth good will to all men 
their very Countenances and gestures ware explanative of 
their joy and thankfullness for another opportunity 
of taking us by the hand--with all acknowledging the 
kind Care of the Great Spirit in our preservation. The oxen and Tools which we precured 
for them (it appears) they have improved agreable to 
Friends Desire--they Continue as in their letter to 
Request a famely to come among them; a Blacksmith 
and a Schoolmaster as they think would suit them best 
I beleave a Door is opened to Do them Good; I allso beleave 
that It requires a Great Deal of Caution, to attend to best 
Wisdom; so that time and money may be wrightly 
applyed. Ephrain Webster the Interpreter apears to be 
a sensible man; a man to be Depended on, a reail Friend 
to the Indians; apears to have good Unity with Friends in 
helping & teaching the Indians apears to be willing to do all 
he can to Cary our Designs into effect for their good 
these Indians are really Before Friends in the practice of benevolence, acording to ability, 
it is a common practice among them to to Care for the Sick & 
lame Old men and widdows--as to plant a piece of corn for 
them; all the young men turn out hoe and harvest it 
then day they all can have Bread of there own, they have 
a piece of land now prepared to sow to wheat for the same 
Benovelent use it apears they will have a comfortable suply 
of Corn for their Bread, they are most Defishant for forage 
for their Cattle Absalom Hatfield remains very unwell tho Better then he 
has Ben he is able to walk a little, the oneidans seem to 
improve in aggriculture it is Calculated they will have 
one thousand bushel of wheat this yeare and a good suply 
of corn; but they do not seem to be so friendly to each other 
as the Onandagas are; I beleave it would be usefull if a Suitable Number of 
the committy ware to vistet the Oneidas and Onondagas 
about the first of 10th Mo. and try to find the best metherd 
to presue for their good, for it apears to me that 
something more aught to be Done. The onondagas seem to be thankful for what Friends 
have dun for them they say that when we ware there 
before we Desired them to speak freely as to Brothers 
and now we tel you freely some of our wants which are 
Many, but we do not wish you to do any more for us 
then you feel willing and able to do--nor any more 
then what you see and beleave will be for our good 
their wants are sumed up, to be helpd to the means 
and taught the arts of Husbandry & house keeping Newhartford: 1st of 9th Mo. 1811 from thy Friend 
Joseph Frost 
thy Prudance will excuse the unintended erows 
as I have not time to take a Coppy Agreeable to the request of some of the committee 
I shall endeavour to state the present condition of the onondaga 
tribe they have 7000-two hundred acres of land of which 
I should judge theres is from 5 to 700 acres under 
partial improvement; besides they have bought a tract 
of land of the Seneca tribe lying on tontawonta Creek 
6 miles long and 4 broad for which they have agreed 
to pay $3000 and apply a portion of their annuity 
yearly to that purpose there are of all classes residing here 
about 320 and there are as near as I can learn from 30 
to 50 familys of this tribe residing at buffaloe and 
tontawonta on their new purchase those that Live 
here have 18 yoke of working oxen besides those belonging to 
friends 3 yoke of which blong to the nation at Cangee 
the others to individuals they have 146 cows and other 
cattle together with 36 horse kind a greater part that may be 
properly termed colts not more than 4 8 pair of working 
horses and those not very valuable they have one cart which 
blongs to the nation and 6 waggons which are individuals and 
I should say not less than 30 ploughs a few of which belong to the 
nation at large after makeing the above statement I think 
may be proper to inform friends how we have 
proceded since being here and also to suggest to friends the propriety 
of some things that apear to us to be absolutely necessary 
in to attain the object in view. We arrived here the fore part 
of 10th mo. Last the natives received us in a friendly manner 
but yet with that shyness that so universally conspicuous 
in the indian character. Yet they furnished us with the 
best house they had which far from being confortable for 
a family to live in and for five on six weeks after our 
arrival I could not prevail upon them to do any thing 
whether it was on account of a fear of being deceived or on 
account of its being in the time of one of their annual feasts I 
have not been able to learn although their eyes seemed 
to be continuously fixed on me in almost every thing that I 
did there fore during the time I mentioned I diligently set 
about doing anything that appeared to me to be necessary 
to be done as though I had been on a farm of my own and pretty 
soon found they were pleased with it, and after the time 
abovementioned had elapsed what was left at home which was but few 
most of the young men being gone to their winters hunt 
came forward and went to work and we succeded in getting up 
a comfortable shop and in cutting and burning a sufficient 
Quantity of coal for a years stock which has enabled me to do 
considerable smith work which was very much needed and there is 
still as much work as it will be posible for one fire to do and 
blow steadily I may here note that they selected three young men 
to Learn the trade one of which is to work with me who behaves 
steadily and well and has made quite a considerable progress in the 
business for the time. after bein here 2 or 3 months my mind 
was arrested with the propriety of a Schools being established 
amongst them yet differing from the common way in which 
Schools are taught to be so calculated as in a very considerable 
degree to embrace the fernale part of the children as the 
education and cultivation of this looked to me to be a very 
essential object to attain Report of 
Indian Committee To the Yearly Meeting 
The Committee on the Concern relative to the Indian 
Natives report, That in attending to the Concern com- 
mitted to their charge, the 4 tribes under the care of the Yearly 
Meeting have been visited by some of our number; And 
altho' some of the Natives are in rather an unsettled state, and 
looking toward removing their habitation, yet it appears by the 
report of our committee, that others are industrious, and 
attentive to aggricultural improvements; that in the Brothertown 
tribe, considerable advancements have been made therein, as also 
in the domestic manufactures, and an increase of attention to 
keeping sheep and other stock, inclosing their lands with better 
fence, erecting buildings &c--which improvements have been 
promoted by small rewards for industry, having been paid out 
of their annuity. This tribe consists of 60 men and 75 
women besides children. Two Schools are taught in this 
tribe which appear to be under good regulation; and one in 
the Stockbridge tribe; where there is also a number of framed 
houses and barns, and some farms well fenced and under good 
cultivation. In those families where the men are sober 
and industrious they are in the plentiful enjoyment of the 
comforts of civilized life; others less sober and industrious 
are consequently more needy. It was recommended to this 
tribe to persevere in manufacturing their own apparrel, as at 
Brothertown; which the sober and industrious amongst them 
are very desirous to do; and it appearing by a late Act of 
the Legislature that the disposal of their Annuity is confided 
to the Agents appointed by Government to receive & pay the same 
it is hoped that this change in the appropriation of their funds 
will enable each one to obtain his equitable proportion, 
and thereby encourage a system of industry, which may not 
only furnish decent apparrel, but attract their attention 
so as in some measure to draw them off from those wandering 
habits which lead to poverty and vice. The Oneida tribe, being the largest, consists of 
about 1150 individuals, some of whom have made 
considerable improvements in agriculture, and a few 
who have inclosed large farms, and improved them so as to 
produce in great plenty: In this tribe is one school taught 
on the Lacasterian plan, and two Indian youths learning 
the Blacksmith's bussiness. The Committee have procured a friend, who with 
his Wife reside with the tribe at Onondago; One of the 
Chiefs has given up his house for their accommodation, 
and he being a blacksmith and his wife a weaver it is 
hoped their services will be useful: The principal men 
appear disposed to promote the views of friends; and to dis- 
swade their young men from habits of intemperance; in which 
they were encouraged, and advised to wait on the Great Spirit, 
to dwell in his fear, that he might give them Wisdom and strength 
to bring up their children aright, to train them in habits 
of industry, and the cultivation of their Land. They having 
concluded to promote the cultivation of flax, were also encou- 
raged to procure sheep, & manufacture cloth: and it was 
satisfactory to observe that they appear disposed to acquire the 
knowledge of the most useful mechanic arts. The care of friends, and the continued in- 
terest manifested from time to time, was in the differrent 
tribes gratefully acknowledged; and it appears that 
they still place such an implicit confidence in friends 
that it is believed there remains a service in the power 
of the Society, still to render this greatly injured people. Signed on behalf of the Committee 
by Thomas Willis Clk. Memorandum for Charles Willets Upon making a further inquiry we found that the tract of Land 
Friends had in view at Onondago contained 180 Acres and the man had 
not concluded to sell it, if he should the price would not be less than 
3000$ Found another price for sale containing about 54 Acres will situate 
on the road that leads to the Indian Setlement, and adjoining their land 
price 10$ per Acre with some Improvements Another tract lying east of the former tract containing 40 Acres 
ajoining the Indian land with some Improvements price 650 Dollars Charles Willets Letter from the 
Northern Missionary Society to the Indian Committee To the General Meeting of Friends in the City of New York, 
or such Committee as may have the manajement of missionary concerns 
Respected Friends The Northern Missionary Society have no pleasure in being under 
the necessity of communicating to you any improprieties on the part of 
any of your members, and aspecially of those who, under the patronage of 
your Society, are employed as missionaries among the Indians. The situation of the poor pagans has been to us for a long 
time a subject of deep commisseration, and we felt bound by the most impor- 
tant considerations to ameliorate their condition by every means within our 
power. The most direct means of accomplishing this was, in our opinion, 
the sending among them the precious Gospel of our Lord Jesus Christ, and 
affording school-instruction to their children; and this, at a great expence, 
we have for several years carried into effect, and are happy to believe with 
considerable success, as it respects many individual Indians. A missiona- 
ry is to this day supported among the Oniedas under the direction of 
this society. But we are not alone in feeling for the distresses of these benighted 
people--their situation has been felt and acknowledged by others and amongst 
these by the society of Friends; and we sincerely rejoice in every attempt 
which has been made, or is now making, to give them the habits of industry, 
sobriety, moral and religious princile. We cannont, therefore, but regret that 
any thing should have taken place of a character, to say the least of it, so im- 
prudent, and so contrary to christian meekness and decorum. The opposition 
made to the discharge of the duties of our missionary was doubtless calculated 
to weaken the influence of any exertions which can be made either by your 
society or our own, and of course will be long remembered with great concern. The whole is submitted to the discretion of your society, praying 
the Great Head of the church to forgive whatever is amiss in the conduct of any 
of his professed desciples, and to hasten the blessed period, when he will mani- 
fest the glory of his Kingdom in the universal spread of his religion, and the 
enlightening of those who sit in darkness and the shadow of death. Signed by order Samuel Blatchford President of the N Missionary 
Society 
William Neill Society 
Secretary Lansingburgh 
 February 27, 1812 Wm. Jenkins ' 
(the Missionary) 
charge against 
Friends The Board of Directors of the Northern Missionary Society in 
Albany, having received information of some very improper conduct 
on the part of certain persons of the Society of Friends towards their 
missionary William Jenkins , requested from him a statement 
of the circumstances, with a view not only to their own satisfaction, 
but from a wish to lay the Affair before the meeting of Friends, 
presuming that such conduct would be discountenanced by them 
and the evil complained of redressed. The following is the statement 
which the Board of Directors have received. Sometime in June 1809 I was invited to preach at the South 
settlement by a number of Indians living in that place. The third 
or fourth sabbath in which I attended, I found it my duty to baptize 
the children of two Indians belonging to that settlement and in 
order to avoid giving offense if I could any wise prevent it, I previously 
called on two persons called Quakers, who, I understood, had been living 
for a few months in that place. They entertained me very kindly in their 
house, where we talked with freedom about the objects of our missions, and 
harmoniously agreed that we should, as far as we could, assist each other 
in promoting the good of the Indians: that we should not cavil or 
dispute with each other in the presence of Indians about our different 
opinions, but conscientiously do our duty with all the harmony possible I then mentioned the request of the Indians to me, and the duties 
I should likely have to perform among them; such as preaching, bap- 
tising, visiting &c all which they seemed to agree with and particular- 
ly expressed their approbation of my preaching in that settlement, 
and it being sabbath morning, and the time in which I had appointed 
to preach there, the two Friends went along with me, and, as I thought, 
in order to assist me, blew the horn (as usual) in order to collect the 
Indians--but as soon as they were collected the Quaker woman began 
before them to find fault with my principles, and to justify her own. 
Hereby, I saw that she had already forgotton our agreement, but I 
thought it my duty to let her see that I still remembered it, and 
therefore immediately walked with a number of Indians into the 
house where we were to hold meeting. The Indians immediate- 
ly of their own accord began to sing a Psalm, and I believe with 
the intention of putting a stop to further conversation with the 
Quaker, who had likewise followed us into the meeting. A large 
number of Indians were collected. After the prayer I read Rom. 16 and 26 
verse. I had spoken to them from the same text on the two preceeding 
sabbaths; The first day on the necessity of a revelation from God in 
order to our knowing and doing the will of God--the second day on the 
manner of our receiving that revelation and its certainty--and this 
day on some of the important things contained in this revelation which 
it concerned: all men to know and be acquainted with: nor do I 
know in the former or in this discourse of any expression which could give offence to the Quakers; however, 
after the discourse, I requested the parents to present their children 
to be baptized, and the instant in which I did so, the woman started 
up, like the man among the tombs, crying stop--the poor innocents 
if baptized will be ruined--they will be damned if baptized--it was 
such ministers as him who crucified Jesus Christ--he preaches for 
hire--I have thousands of dollors to give Indians, but if they 
hear such damnable doctrine--I will go and leave them These 
expressions I distinctly recollect, but she continued using similar 
language all the time I was addressing the people on the natures of 
baptism, the parents of the children to be baptized--whilst I was at 
prayer, when baptising the children and during a prayer after 
baptism. She several times intreated some Indians who understood 
English to interpret for her, but none of them would do it. I distinct- 
ly heard some of the Indians order her to be gone, and all seemed heartily 
to disapprove of her conduct. After singing and pronouncing the blessing 
I said. Brothers, I have done as directed by God's book, and what I am 
bound to do, though People should rage against me. This was all I 
 said. I immediately sett off for meeting at the castle, having likewise 
to preach at Squasalow in the evening. I had no time to lose. After 
the above affair I was told that these Quakers bribed the Chiefs to 
order that none of that settlement should attend me there, but 
should go to hear me at the Castle, and that the same men should 
tell me this who had invited me--several of them have since come 
frequently to the castle, but I understood that the Quakers with some other 
white people, have done all they could to persuade them from coming. 
and a certain character is engaged in this work, who, from his profession 
and the name he bears ought to think such a conduct an indeliable 
disgrace to him (Signed) William Jenkins (Oneida) Draft 
of 
Letter 
to 
Missionary 
Society 
1812 Respected Friends, Your Letter dated 27th Feb. 1812 with 
the statement of William Jenkins respecting a circum- 
stance that occured in 1809, between him & a person sta- 
tioned at Oneida under our appointment, was laid 
before us at our last Meet. We acknowledge the kind 
 & respectful manner in which you communicate 
your sentiments on the subject, & with you we 
cannot but sincerely regret, that any thing should 
have taken place calculated to produce a misun- 
derstanding or have a tendency to weaken the 
influence of those who are engaged, either by 
your society or our own, in promoting the general 
welfare of the poor natives. But when we 
consider the peculiarly responsible situation that 
agents are placed in, by residing amongst a peo- 
ple not fully acquainted with the 
habits, customs & language of White people, it 
is reasonable to expect difficulties; & indeed it is 
rather matter of surprise and cause of thankful- 
ness, that they have not more frequently occured 
 With respect to the circumstances stated by Wm. 
Jenkins, we may remark, that we had no 
information of them untill we received your 
letter. Had these charges been brought forward at 
an earlier period, it would doubtless have been much 
easier to ascertain how far they are correct, for when 
we reflect that nearly three years have elapsed since 
the occurance; & that to prove facts recoursd must 
be had to imperfect interpreters, the difficulties atten- 
ding an investigation at this time are obvious. Yet under all these considerations, we if you believe it 
best to be done and shall hold ourselves in readiness 
to meet any appointment you may choose to 
make on the occasion Before we close this communication we assure 
 respectfully to suggest whether the true inter 
est of this people, for whom good we are mutually 
concerned will not be better promoted & tha christian 
love & harmony so desirable to be witnessed amongst 
fellow professors of the gospel of our Lord & Savior 
Jesus Christ, more probably preserved by encouraging 
those placed either by you or us amongst the natives 
to cultivate a pririt of love, Charity & tenderness 
for each other than by invvestigating charges so personal 
at so late a period. That you with us may be influenced in all 
our conduct toward these poor benighted people by 
that Holy & Divine Spirit that should goovern all 
our actions & which aloneis able to direct ou 
aught is the sincere desire of That you with us may be influenced in all 
our conduct towards people 
for whose good we are mutually concerned by 
that Christian love and harmony so desirable 
to be witnessed amongst the fellow professors 
of the gospel of our Lord and Saviour Jesus 
Christ whose holy and divine spirit should 
govern all our actions which alone is 
able to direct us aright is the sincere desire 
of Order to give obtain informaiton 
on the subject we 
have had a personal interview with the party complained 
of in your letter & from her statement are 
to believe that the subject matter has been greatly 
misrepresented to you Signed by direct. & on behalf of the Committee 
of the Yearly Meet. of the Religious Society of Friends held 
in New York appointed to attend to the promotion of 
the welfare of the Indian Natives. 27 of 3 Mo Account of Oxen and farming Utensils furnished 
to the Onondago Tribe $--Cts 1 Yoke of Oxen & Yoke 73--25 1 Ditto 70--0 2 Chains 2 & pins 2 staples & ring 
weight 47 1/2 at 1/10 pen 10--88 2 Ploughs & 6 hoes 21--75 2 setts harrow teeth & 2 augurs 12--16 188--04 The above Account I have received 
from Joseph Frost . Received the 19th of 4th Mo. 1812 
The Articles being furnished by the Committy 
together; Charles Willets . Dear Friend 
Samuel Parsons We attended to the Concern of Friends 
Respecting the gore of Land lately sold by the Christian 
Party to the State lying near the heart of the south or 
Pagon Settlement, at the Oneida, in Counsel we meet with 
Joseph & Sarah Tolkiott & Phebe Field , which was very agreable to us 
We found them very Desireous to make an exchange of land, so 
We proseeded and surveyed it, found it had ben surveyed into 
lots, and found Famelys on them, which was Disagreable to the Indians 
it appeared also to us that it would prove very Injurous to them 
unless an exchange could be made--they have signd a memorial 
prepared as Directed, they ware well pleased and united--gave it 
up entirely into the Care of Friends and Desired they would do the 
best they could for them--Joseph Tolkiott takes charge of the 
memorial and survey, the Spining and Weaving presents a 
pleasing Prospect think well of its being encouraged--we allso 
feel Desireous of having the same promoted at Onondaga 5th Mo. 10th 1812 Newhartford, from thy Friend 
Joseph Frost N.B. there has ben Deliverd to the school at the Oneida 
5 foot wheels 1 great wheel 2 reals 1 Hatchet and about 87lb 
of flax Committee on Indian affairs, with Absalom Hatfield . Dr. 1810 
4 Mo. 26 To Balance due 267.58 1811 
4 Mo. 1 To One year & a half Salary to. 9 Mo.1st 375-- To paid for seed of different kinds 79.88 To 3 pr. of Oxen 218.38 To a gratuitous allowance for the use of the Indians 50-- To the blacksmiths bill 38.59 To 1 doz. of spelling books 4.30 To Tho. McCalls board for two months & a half 15-- To Amount of wages and board for an assistant 
Teacher 28-- To Amo. of a farming Mill for cleaning & screening 20-- To Amo. of Ruths expences to and from New York on 
Indian Concerns 28-- To an error in Blacksmiths a/c. for shoeing Oxen 1.50 1126.23 1811 
11 Mo. 9 To Bal. due from Oafc 308.45 To Salary for 6 mo's to 3 mo. 1. 1812 125-- To Blacksmiths a/c to 5 mo. 14 1812 20.3 453.48 To Balance of Oafc 117.48 Cr. By Amount of Cash at different times 803.78 By Cash paid Ruth when in NYork on a/c of her expences 14-- By Balance to n a/c 308.45 $1126.23 1811 
11 Mo. 9 By Cash paid his Dft. on J. Murray Jr. 308-- By D. paid him by the Indians on a/c of the money 
advanced by the Committee for repairing Saw Mill 28-- By Balance due A. H. 117.48 453.48 Errors Excepted 
New York 5th Month 1812 Dear Friend 
Sam. Parsons we have visited the Natives at Stockbridge and 
tho Mary Peters was not not at home, we Conversed with Eleizabeth 
and some others, and upon Consideration of the subject it apeared 
to me a Difficulty might arise from placing to much property 
in the hands of a few & for them to Dispose of and divide among the 
others, all that kind of property (of small articles) which is pleasing to 
them being placed in their hands, to be devided as above: the temptation 
may be to strong for their week minds, and they reserving to themselves 
more then they give to others--this might produce enmity and 
Divitions among themselvs--it now springs in my mind, that a Dinner 
of hearbs with Contentment is better then Stalled oxen and Contention therwith 
the more I consider the subject the more important it apears to me 
the Concern of Friends I reverantly belieave to spring from that 
love which breaths peace and good will to all men. Some of us only 
hearing of this it may have prodused in us pitifull Desires and a 
willingness to do them good and while we endeavour to premote their 
hapiness we may make them more Miserable. I think I know by 
experience that by viseting them in their destitute situation (compareable 
to white people) it has produced in me a willingness to do that for them 
which I have since seen would have ben to their disadvantage at present & to society 
I find it requires the wisdom of the Serpant to learn their dispositions 
and know what they can bare, and the harmlessness of the Dove to 
make a right application. I feel the need of more strength and wisdom 
to direct me when I go among them therefore I desire Friends may 
not depend much upon me, great care is Meidfull (it seems to me) Least 
things are crouded upon them faster then they can bare, and by doing 
much for them they depend on it, and so not help themselves 
another thing which I have Considered a little has prodused 
some concern on my mind Respecting a Famely's living among 
them, many things present to view, which when Duely considered 
will make the undertaking apear a great one, serounded as these People 
are with People of Different Denominations who we may beleave 
to be under as heavy a yoke & as Dark a Cloud as the Natives; these will 
be watching and looking at a famely placed in so public a situation 
and will be viseted by Mishonrys and others of information--some we 
may beleave will inquire seriously, others will seek an oration against 
us--as these things have turned in my mind great care has apeared 
to be needfull--now as it Respects their agricultureal improvements 
I beleave upon examination it will apear that those who have not had 
a famely to enstruct them, have improved as fast as those that have 
had this advantage; not that I impute this to any Neglect in those 
who have lived among them--I only mention things as they 
apear to me. That the Commity may consider what steps would be best 
to take in . I still beleave it would be a safe set if a select 
Committy to Cosist of not less then three ware to be apointed who would 
be willing to mak those Natives a thourrough viset and gain what 
information they can and their prospects be laid before the Commity 
for further Consideration all which I in love Submit 
from thy affectionate Friend Joseph Frost Newhartford 16th of 5 Month 1812 A Coppy of a Letter to Joseph Frost from the Natives of 
Newstockbridge Newstockbridge 5th Mo. 22 1812 Respected friend This will serve to inform thee that 
agreably to thy instructions we call'd a council yesterday & there 
ware many colected of the most understanding women in this Town 
together with some of the principal Chiefs of the Nation: & they 
unanimously manifested their anxiety for having a Spnning School 
established in our said Town; There ware a number who have Chril- 
dren who ware so anxious that they promised to attend themselves 
in order that as soon as they become acquainted with the art they 
could then teach their Chrildren themselves; We have agreed that 
Mary Dockstoder (alias Peters) should teach the said part of spinning 
& for none to have the privilege but those who are intirely ignorant 
of the same; It is not our expectation that many at present will 
attend on acount of the hurrying time of business but a number from 
seven to twelve thirteen years will attend & others so soon as they get 
through planting &c; Elisabeth Seth has agreably to thy instructions 
Destributed the two bushels of flaxseed among ten famelies. We would further add in regard to said spining school that we have 
agreed upon twelve to attend said shool but there 
are many more would be willing to attend 
provided they could be accommodatied for said 
business. We also were united in thinking that 
we had very great reasons to be thankful to that 
great and good Spirit for opening the
heart of our white brethren and sisters to give 
not only their good advice unto us from time 
to time; but likewise for the repeated favours 
they have confered upon us. We would wish to be remembered to the Mem- 
bers composing the Committee and our sincere 
and hearty thanks for their continued thanks 
remembrance of us and shall ever remain 
thine and theirs respectfully. Joseph Shauguthqueat Barth. Calvin , Town Clark Elizabeth Seth Mary Pye Catharine Littleman Elizabeth Pye Lydia Hendrick Eunice Queeny Lucy M Hussekun N.B. It is farther agreed 
theat the wheels shall be 
brought and kept at one house 
and be under the care and 
superintendance of the 
Instructess 
John Sergeant Esteemed Friend 
Samuel Parsons I have this day Receivd from Thomas Dean an 
acount and statement of the Brothertown Indians, as followeth 
The Brothertown Indians Possess a tract of land containing 9390 Acres 
which is Devided into 149 Lots from fifty to one Hundred acres each 
The number of Inhabitance are about 302 there are 55 Males of 21 
years old and upwards and 67 Females 21 and upwards, they have 4 who 
profess to be Carpenters, two Blacksmiths, 4 Shoemakers 2 Taylors, 5 
Weavers, tho they do not all follow their Trades steadely--they have 
one grist still which belongs to the Tribe, and two sawmills which belongs 
to individuals, they have sixteen fraimed Houses and 18 fraimed Barns 
they Manufacture among themselves at least 322 ya. of Woollen Cloath 
and 605 yds of lining Cloth in a year they have five Looms--and 
they are generally supplyed wi woollen and Lining Spining Wheels 
Axes hoes Sythes &c.. it is Calculated they have about 2000 acres of 
improved Land, on which they keep about 90 Cows 30 Horses 16 yoke of 
oxen 93 young Cattle 88 Sheep and a great number of Swine--
the Land also Produces 2870 bushels of Wheat, 5695 bushels of corn 
 700 bushels of Rye 1866 bushels of oats 95 bushels of Peas 3450 of 
Patatoes and about 290 Tuns of hay. It may however be proper 
to observe that about one half of the above produce is raised on 
shares by White People on their Land; they have 21 Ploughs 17 
sleds, 3 Carts, and 3 Waggons which belongs to the Indians... I expected this would would have ben made out so that I 
could have forwarded it with the other and alltho I have taken Considerable 
pains yet I am afraid the delay has ben a disappointment to Friends 
but I hope to excuesed seeing & did not Receive thy Letter untill one 
week after the Committy set off for home which made considerable 
trouble for me: from thy sincere Friend Joseph Frost 
 Newhartford 21st of the 12 Month 1812 Statement of the Oneida Tribe including both 
parties. The south settlements being under the care of friends 
the north part under the care of the missionary society. Number of inhabitants in both parties 1011 Do...in south settlements 440 Whole number of families 115 south settlement 51 Acres of land in both parties 25000 south settlement 19000 Acres under improvements 1200 south settlement 500 Bushels of wheat in both parties 3000 south settlement 1200 Do. corn... 4000 south settlement 1840 Number of horses 100 south settlement 25 Do. oxen with chains & yokes 24 south settlement 12 steers 2 Yrs old 30 south settlement 18 cows 65 south settlement 33 young cattle 100 south settlement 60 hogs 240 south settlement 100 Number of waggons 10 south settlement 2 One cart in the north settlement, none in the south A few sheep in the north part, south settlement 40 Number of ploughs 34 south settlement 10 drags 11 south settlement 4 Framed houses 14 south settlement 6 Do. barns 12 south settlement 6 1 Saw mill in south settlement 1 Carpenter in the north part In the south settlement there are 5 foot wheels, 3 great ones & 
2 reels--about 16 or 18 of their women & girls have been learning 
to spin some of whom have acquired a pretty good knowledge. Annuity for the whole Tribe about $7000 A Statement of Newstockbridge Tribe No. of Persons including 39 --475 
they Possess six Mills Square of Land except 
eighteen hundred acres Leased out 
they have improved about 1200 acres of land 
on which they have two saw Mills and one 
grist Mill 8 fraimed Houses & 7 framed Barns 
the remainder of their building are built of 
Logs & Barke; they raised in the year 1811 about 
500 bushels of wheat and about 2000 bushels of Corn 
allso a com 
fortable 
supply of 
Potatoes & 
Beens with 
other vegeta- 
bles 
they have 26 horses and 20 pares of oxen and 52 
Cows and 44 young Cattle: 56 sheep and about 
fifty Hoggs they have furnished them by Friend. 5 foot 
Wheels 3 great wheels 2 reals on which 35 of their Women 
and girls have ben Learning to spin and some of 
them have acquired a prity good knoledge of the art 
who all seem to be well pleased and seem to be desireous 
to become parfect in said art. This Tribe receives an 
annuity of 350 Dollars from the United States and from 
the State of New York 200 Dollars to be applyed for schools 
Blacksmiths Mills and Poor This I beleave to be a 
pritty acrate statement Joseph Frost Newhartford 30 of 11th Month 1812 NB Dear Friend Samuel Parsons I would jest Mention 
to thee that in my opinion there would a great benefit 
arise from their being furnished with more raw materials 
and inplyments of Husbandry not only in this but in all 
the tribe; thou may verbaly state to the Comitty alltho I have 
of them, they have about 12000 acres of Land are about 250 in No. have about 
5 or 6 hundred acres improved, raised the present season about 450 bushels 
of wheat 1400 bushels of corn a considerable quantity of Beens Potatoes Squashes 
&c they 6 pair of oxen about 10 Cows some young Cattle 4 Plows 2 Drags 
one cart Brothertown 27th of 1st Mo. 1813 Esteemed Friend 
Samuel Parsons Understanding the Committy expect to meet the 8th of 2nd Mo. 
we after consulting the subject, felt it our duty to com- 
municate the situation of the poor Natives under Friends 
care, as to the Onondagos they appear to have Nearly a supply 
of Grain for themselves, but their Cattle must (to all appearance) 
one quarter of them die for want of hay and other foders unless they 
are helped soon--one yoke of the oxen belonging to the Committy 
strayed away soon after James Mott G Seamon & C Willitts was 
the last we heard they had ben gone 2 Months or more then had not 
ben heard of tho a great pains had ben taken,--supposed to be 
off in some --as it respects Brothertown Stockbridge and 
Oneida they will be in Great want of Bread, the Corn being cut off 
which was their main Dependence many of the poor people will 
suffer unless assisted, two yoke of old oxen belonging to the Com. 
was sent to Joseph Frost from Oneida worn down very thin he rec. 
them some time in 11th 18/11 they are sold on one years cred. to the 
best Market could be obtained--as it Respects Absalom & Ruth 
Hatfield he continues very ill unable to walk to the barn to 
take care of his own flock this has ben his situation for nearly two years 
past, and their situation is truly a trajec one we feel much for 
them beleave they require the simpathy of Friends--but when we 
take into view the concern of Friends for the instruction of the 
poor Indians in Husbandry &c we become feelingly exercised 
and it is no new thing with us we have ben looking for others to become 
under a simaler exercise and it is no small releaf to our minds to find 
some are taking a feeling part and looking into the real situation 
of things. We desire Friends would suffer us to Communicate a fea- 
 while we humbly hope we are actuated by no other motive 
then in union with the concern of Friends for the Good of the poor 
Natives. The situation of Absalom is such that it appears to us 
that they are unable to answer the expected views of the Committy 
all tho we feel tenderly for them and wish them so treated as not to 
hurt their tender tried minds, yet we have beleaved for some time 
past that seting asyde their ability, some other measure might 
be adapted which would be more advantage to the poor Natives, 
now seeing it is attended with so many difficulties and such 
Great expence for a Famely's living among them we have beleaved 
that if these difficulties could be removed and the money layd out 
to a better advantage for these Dear People the Committy would feel 
it their Duty with us to adopt such a plan. Now we have thought 
that if Akers Wrothbone (he living neerest) or some other person should 
spend all the time he could aford for one hundred dollars in teaching 
them in the art of Husbandry taking care of their tools &c and at suitable times to work with 
them in the season of gitting in their seed of different kinds this sum 
would inable him to spend at least 3 days in a Week through the 
season which would be of Great use to these people this would 
answer in part the place of a Famely and remove some of the 
attendant Difficulties, and save to the Committy at least two- 
hundred dollars which sum might the be lay'd out to a good advantage 
in precuring implements of Husbandry and keeping them in repare 
and in purchising wool flax and seed of various kind, this would 
be another great advantage to thes poor People--besides they could 
have the Farm Now ocupied by Friends which would be 
another advantage to them in precuring the Comforts of life allso 
they might have the and tools now made use of by Friends 
to cultivate Sd. Farm, as it respects the spining school we would 
Recommend the same plan adobted as at Newstockbridge--there 
are several Oneida Women who are well acquainted with the art of 
Spining and neting who we have no doubt would be pleased to have so 
much Notice taken of them as to be imployed (for a small reward) in teaching 
their Nation the same art, they would have this advantage of explain- 
ing things to them in language they could understand; now it Seems 
to us that if some such plan as above should be adobted it would more 
then supply the place of a Famely--the views of the Committy better 
answered by the poor people's receiving a greater advantage--besids 
save Friends from this evil report which we have heard some say 
the Friends are there to get their living out of the poor Indians 
This alls (in our oppinion) would be the most effectual step to remove 
the like suspitions of the Indians and gain their confidence and 
remove all those attendant difficulties of a Famelys living among them 
and save a Famely from that tried situation. All which we humbly 
submit for consideration. Desiring above all Dear Friends 
that we might all be ingaged for that Sperit which will unite 
us together as in one Sperit and one mind this would be a good 
prepariation for teaching others. Respecting the Land which 
Friends have talked of assisting the Oneidas to exchange 
for lands laying further back from their settlement those 
people are often inquiring of us about it wishing to 
know if Friends have or can arange it any 
way for their Benifet, it seems they will be very 
much disoppointed unless this exchange can be made 
we have understood the Land was to be disposed of this 
winter from thy affectionate Friends John Dean 
Joseph Frost NB Thomas Dean has made provision 
for Brothertown to supply them with Bread 
so that it is hoped they will not suffer much 
in Consequence of the general scarceity Respected Friend 
John Murry Jun. I have ben expecting some further 
Direction Respecting the school for spining among the Natives 
or some arangments made by the Commitee for the Cotinueing 
and further prosecuting the said art among them--which they 
seem desireous of and I beleave would be useful to them James Mott and I viseted the Oneidas and Absalom & Ruth 
found Absalom quite unwell and unable to move after consulting 
with them and considering of the subject--seeing they had some grain 
on the ground and if Absalom had ben well enough to move they had no 
land to go to nor house but must hire; we felt a sympathy for them 
and concluded for them to stay and occupy the Farm and tools and take 
care of themselves in the best manner they could, and leave the Care and 
not fortague themselves in their situation with the concerns of the Indians 
untill Absalom should be better or they hear from the Committee the Indians seemed desireous to have friend continue to help 
and instruct them they wanted to have their tools repared which we 
gave orders to be done, Bred Corn they said was very scarse among them 
and they had no seed Desired Friends to think of them--we gave them 
incouragement, they seemed impateciant to know about their land 
whether an exchange with the Governor could be mad or not it appears there is two yoke of oxen wanted one for Oneida 
and one for Onondaga--besides some tools John Jacobs (a peace maker) with some others from Newstockbridge 
have call'd on me gave their approbation for what they saw in the spining 
school desired to have it continued wished Friends to think of them poor 
men and see if they did not want help and instruction to; said they 
ware quite tired of their Missionary. It has ben very sickly among the Oneidas about 80 have died within a year 
(as they informed us) above 30 in the South or Pagan I have sent an acount of all the articles and expences as delivered 
to each Tribe, James Mott will present it when our mind 
are turn'd towards the poor Natives we feel the want of Counsel 
and help, a viset on this acount and the benefit of the Indians 
would be very acceptable. from thy affectionate Friend Joseph Frost Newhartford 10th of 5 Mo 1813 Amount of sums rec. by Absalom Hatfield bro. over 233.37 am. of notes taken for a horse 50.-- balances in values of a Cow 13.-- 296.37 pd. Ruth 5 m. 28. 1813 21.-- Balance of expenditures & salary 317.37 from the other side 476.19 476.19 expendid repair ploughs & 
summer of 1813 3.53 479 72 317.37 $162.35 Ruth 's expences in 1813 
 28.-- such compensation as the 
Committee shall allow 6 m. salary 162. 35 
28 
83.33 
$273.68 due Ruth Hatfield 250 
62.50 
250 
83.33 Account of the money Paid in 1812 For the Indians Cash Paid one 8 paid 0 12 6 Cash 5 quarter auger 5/ one four. quarter 4/ 0 9 0 Cash two sithes at 9/ per sith 0 18 0 Cash Paid Sickle 5/ 0 5 0 Cash Paid a hired man to teach in the Chool 
Two month & a quarter at $11/ per month 9 100 0 1812 
7 mo 11 Cash 11 pounds of wool at 3/6 per pound 1 18 6. Cash 6 pound of Cotton at 2/ per pound 0 12 0 Cash one pare of Cards at 8/ per 0 8 0 Cash ten pounds of flax 1/ per pound 0 10 0 Cash two Coyrs of paper 2/ per Coyr 0 4 0 Cash thre ink stands 1/ per stand 0 3 0 Cash Paid 5/ pare of nedles 14 pense per 0 1 8 Cash Paid for a Spinning Loom & parster 0 14 0 Cash Paid expences 6/ 0 6 0 7 mo 20 Cash Paid Cradle & heal Ling 14/ 0 14 0 Cash Paid 3 Rakes 2/ per Rake 6/ 0 6 0 Cash Paid 4 Duson quils 1/6 0 1 6 Cash 4 pounds of flax 1/ per 0 4 0 Cash Paid 5/ to assist in the Chool 0 5 0 8 mo 10th Cash Paid w/hand In the Chool one month 
and five days at $13 per month 6 4 0 11 mo 28 Cost of Driving the oxen to Joseph Frost 0 10 0 Cash paid for meding a Wheel 4/6 0 4 6 Cash paid Repareing the Barn plank & Bords 1 6 0 Carpenters work 7/ 0 7 0 6 mo 2 1812 Cash paid $7 of Interest onacout of a note. 
I was Bound for on account of the mill. 2 16 0 Friends is twenty one Dollars Which 
I have lost in my Indian trade Which I 
Plase here for your Consideration. 00 00 0 Blacksmith B &c 2 00 0 Carpenters Work plows and yoke 100 0 41 11 8 5 mo. 29 To Balance due me last settlement in 5 mo. 1812. 47. 4 -- To one Years Salery 100 -- To Cash over allowd..on the $27.76 on the 
 1 13 11 190 9 7 $476.19 Account of the money Received From the Comitty In 1812 5 m 26 
1812 Recived By mi Wife $20 6 mo 13 
1812 Recived By Draft $150 7 mo 8 
1812 Receved of Joseph Frost $6 8 mo 17 
1812 Received of Joseph Frost $50 Thereis twenty thre Dollars and Seventy six cents 
Which I Received of the Indians on the Count 
of the Mill I Expeced John murry likewise received of the Indians for sead $7.37 5 mo 29 238 37 Rec. New York 5th m 28. 1813 from John Murray 
Twenty One Dollars on this Account. 
$21 Ruth Hatfield 
476.19 
233.37 
242.82 Thomas Dean Statement relating to Brothertown Indians By request of James Mott . I make the following 
statement being the reason & cause of my 
takeing a Lease of Land belonging Isaac & Jane 
Wobby in Brothertown. Whin I agreed with the superintendant 
of the affairs of the Brothertown Indians. It was 
agreed on by Tho. Cody & Henry McNire that 
I should have the privoledg of the immovement 
on Lots No. 15 & 16 in said Town for my accomodation 
in addition to my former sallery which has not 
been the case. I have only had the land a part of 
the time since I have been in Brothertown 
although the superintendants has allowd me a 
part of the rent of the said Land yet I have been 
very much for the want of pasture 
& meadow Land not having a pasture to put a 
horse in and I have had nearly all my hay to 
buy for 2 or 3 years--which was very expensive and 
inconvenint. But I should not have complained 
of the imbarresments I was under for I knew that 
it was not all together in the control of the Super 
-intendants to furnish me with the land promised 
for my accomodation nor should I have taken a 
lease of Isaac Wobby had I not thot it was for the 
benefit of Brothertown. On account of the follow- 
ing circumstance (viz) Isaac Wobbly was always disatis 
-fyed with the Indians and their government--and in 
the winter of 1810-11 he & Thomas Isaac petitioned the 
legislature to be naturalized or made subject to the Laws 
of the state as other citizen are subject to and there was 
an act passed accordingly absolving them from all 
Laws and regulations enjoined on the Brothertown Indions 
and made them ameanable to the same Laws and 
entitled to the same privolidges as other citizens 
are entitled to and confirmed the Lands assumed 
to them by the superintendants &c to them and 
their heirs respectively for ever with out the 
power of atination except by devise and did not 
impair their right to the unappropriated Land or 
to the Annuity to be paid to said Indions. 
In conciquence of said art Isaac Wobbly got credot 
and run into debt and soon became subject to many 
Lawsuits and cost which brot him into imbaresment 
and difficulty & in the fall of 1815 he informed me 
that he intended to lease out his land & wished me 
to take it I declined and advised him not to 
let it our but in the spring of 1816 he leased 
it our to John Cotteral for 20 Years for the rent 
of 180 Dollars per Anum & got 2 years rent in 
advance Wobby was still in debt & had no resorces 
to pay his debts. there was several suits brot 
against him which he could not defend and in 
the fall he told me he was determined to 
sell or dispose of his land or a part of it and 
to leave B. Town I advised him to the conterary 
but he percisted in his determination and petitioned 
the Legislature to authorise him to alinate his 
land. & the bill passed the Assembly and he had reason 
to believe it would pass the senate: he requested me to 
buy his Lot near the school house as he was determined 
to part with it I advised the peacemakers to take it 
and pay him out of the annuity but they declined 
and thot there was more that wanted to sell then to 
buy--some of thim advised me to buy it and take up 
J Cotterals Lease as Cotteral had put on two tenants 
which ware complained of as intruders on Indian land 
and the attorney gave it as his opinion that they 
could not be removed off--and Wobby said that 
if I would not take it he would sell it to some one 
that would take it--or he would lease it for a long 
term of years so I agreed to buy it if the bill did 
pass & to give him 1700 Dollars to be paid in 
certain instalments--the bill did not pass the 
senate and I had paid Wabby the first instalment 
or took up executions & paid off judgements for him 
to that amt. and took a Lease from him & his 
wife for the Land and furnished him with a team 
money &c to moove with. & I expect to pay him the 
balance when he git an act passed to him 
to give a deed--or if he devises it to me his heirs 
will receive the amt. due--I believe there can be 
but little doubt about the vallidity of the Lease 
or at least I have none, or I should not have 
taken it or paid any money. Though I did not take 
it with a view of speculation I considered that it 
is as much money as it is worth in the state of 
repair it was in when I took it. I could have sold 
my right in it for the money I was to give for it 
but I did not buy it to sell to any one with out it was to the 
Indions or the superintendants under the 23 section of the 
Act entitled an act relative to the different tribes & 
Nations of Indions within this state passed 10th April 
1813 & I have been willing to sell it to them on 
the same conditions as I baught it. I have been informed that some of the 
committee who visited Brothertown expressed great 
concern on account of my agreeing for the Lot 
They may be informed that if the superintendent 
& peace makers doth not conclude to take it as 
above stated; and they have a prefferance that 
some other person should own the Lot and will 
inform me of the same I will endeavor to gratify thim im- 
mediately as there is a person who wants to buy 
it and will pay for the improvement I have made James Mott T. Dean P.S. It may not be a miss to prevent future unea 
-siness to mention that Tho. Isaac informed me 
that he intended to sell his Lot. And I have been 
informed he has been offered $2000 for it I have 
no doubt he will sell it before spring--& I have 
been informed several others wishes to sell and I think 
likely will before long if the Governor is disposed to 
buy as he is authorised to purchase from the Stockbridge 
and Brothertown Indions in behalf of the state such part 
of their reservation & lands as they may be desireous of silling 
By the 4 section of the act relative to the vilage of Onieda 
and other purposes--passed 8th April 1815 to Joseph Frost and James Moot the Indians Requested me to write 
a Reply to an address delivered them 
the other day by friends. -- 
to write all that was said would fill 
a mumber of sheets of paper I thairfore 
have taken the heads of it. 
thay Receivd the advice with thankfullnes 
they stated that a grate number 
 of thair peaple had not tasted strong 
liquer for thirteen years past and 
thay Beleave that you had 
asisted them and Enabled them 
to keep from it and would Continue 
so to Due as long as thay tride to 
keep from it. thay also stated that thay had made 
sum progrees in Cultivating 
thair lands thay acnoleged the 
assistance of friends as to helping 
them to oxen and farming uatesels 
thay acnolegd that thay had don 
Rong in not keeping the oxen 
Better that thay wair now Better 
provided with hay and if the 
frinds see fit to let them have 
oxen thay would try to dow Better 
thay also stated that thay wanted 
to Bild a saw mill and if frinds 
wair willing to let them have 
the mill given on a Credit that 
thay would pay them and if the 
frinds would send on a mill write 
to lay out the work thay Could 
dew all the work them selves 
except the Runing geears and 
the pitching the watter if sun one 
would show them thay said 
that that thay Could hew the timber 
make the mantisis and tennantery 
and Bild the dam and would pay 
for it as fast as the mill Could arn it 
thay then would want sum friend to 
take Charge of the mill and saw 
and sell Boards for them and take 
his pay out of it and all so pay 
for the irons and work. the mill seat is about three miles 
from thair villige adjining the white 
people thair is pine timber and white wood and Clary thay 
Requsted an answar to this my wife gets no Better I desier 
to be remembered 
your friend Eph. Webster onondago 
 August the 24th 1815 Letter from Stockbridge Indians 
1 mo 2. 1815 Brothers & Sisters attend We feel thankful to the great & good Spirit 
that he still puts it into the hearts of a number of our white brethren 
& Sisters belonging to the religious society of people called Quakers or friends, to 
wish to have the chain of friendship strengthened, which bound our 
fathers & yours together: & we feel thankful to you for the good advice 
comprehended in your address to us & to our men. We heartily join 
with you in believing that, it is not the will of the 
great Spirit, that the children of men should destroy & kill 
each other like the wild beasts of the forest. Brothers & Sisters, We are sensible that not only most of our men, 
but likewise many of our women, have that great enimy to con- 
tend with called ardent spirits the bane & ruin of all Indians: 
& many bad meaning white people being fully sensible of our 
people's weakness therein, have made use of that baneful 
material in drawing our men into their intriagues. They 
have by that means got possession of a great part of our Township 
& we are sensible that if they are not removed in a short time, 
we are a ruined people. Brothers & Sisters, We are sensible that our lands are good & that 
if our men will only follow your advice, with regard to culti- 
vating the same, & to the raising of domestic animals, they 
would do much better than they can by hunting the bear 
& deer. And we heartily join with you, in wishing that our 
men would leave off the drinking of ardent spirits: & we will 
use our utmost endeavors to persuade them to leave off the 
evil practice, & to cultivate the ground & raise grain cattle 
sheep & flax, & we on the other hand will endeavor as we 
have already began to learn to spin & make cloth. Brothers & Sisters, From the repeated admonitions we have received 
from those you have been pleased to send to visit us so great a distance, 
together, with other very great favors, manifests to us, that of all other denom- 
inations you who are called Quakers are our greatest friends. You have 
ever manifested your friendship not in words only, but in deeds 
likewise. You have been the means of addings greatly to the growth 
of civilization among us. Many of our people are daily experience- 
ing the good effects, of being taught the art of spinning, which has 
been brought about by your bestowing to us spinning wheels wool flax 
&c. together with the assiduity of Mary Doxtader alias Peters, who 
was brought up under your care & instruction, & has given us 
great satisfaction with regard to her faithfulness in said business. Several of our youth have also been sent to different semenaries for instruction, but 
none have made so great proficiencies in the inglish language, as those two, who 
have been brought up under your tuition, namely Jn. Quinney & Solomon Hen- 
drick, the latter being engaged in one of our schools & gives general satisfaction. Brothers & Sisters, It would make our talk too lengthy to enumerate all the favors we 
have received from you, therefore must conclude by telling of you, that your 
red sisters are poor, & all we can do is, to return you our hearty & sincere thanks, 
& to promise you, that we will endeavor to follow your good counsels giv- 
en to us repeatedly: & we hope & pray that the great & good Spirit will reward you 
according to your good works. Brothers & Sisters, With our best respectss & unfeigned love, we bid you farewell. Mary Pye Elizabeth Seth Lucy Abrams Jacob Naunechplough Hendrick Aupaumat Eunice Paupquotch-chiem Catharine Motoxew Hannah Checks New-Stockbridge 
1st moth 2nd 1815 To the religious society of people called Quakers of friends in general 
residing in the State of New York: & to those in particular who 
sent their address to us & to our men dated New York, 5th month 1815 New Hartford 12. Mo. 22. 1815 Esteened Friends 
G. Seaman. John 
Murray & T. Willis I rec. yours of 11th instant, last 
evening. William Rathborne left the school at Oneida 
in the fall, and there has been none kept since 
and indeed there are so few children attends as soon as 
the weather becomes cold, that it is discouraging to attempt 
to keep it up during the winter, I will confer with Wm. 
Rathorne, and such of the commtee as are hereabouts, & 
endeavour to procure a teacher against the spring. the inclosed letter which ought to have been laid before 
committee at their last meeting, will prove by its date 
neglect or forgetfulness somewhere, perhaps Joseph Frost and 
myself, may as well share the blame between us, I must own 
I received it seasonable to have forwarded it to the committee, it 
having been delivered to me when J. Frost went to view his new 
land, some time in the fall, no opportunity then presenting to 
forward it, it slipt my memory when there was one. Is is not 
a matter of sufficient importance to call together such of the 
committee as are convenient, and give Webster an answer 
the few of us of the committee in this neighbourhood, are quite 
in favour of their being assisted in some way that they may 
have a saw mill, thinking it will be a means of furnishing 
them with boards and timber in an easy way, that may tend to 
encourage them in providing themselves with better houses and 
barns,--and tho these are our sentiments we did not think ourselves 
warranted to grant their request, being of too much importance 
for our small number. The white inhabitants who have got in among the Stockbridge 
Indians, and taken their lands on lease, to their great prjudice; 
I fear will not be removed soon, withour considerable exertion, they 
use so much art and contrivance to get the chiefs in favour of their 
continuing. For altho they have been proceded against as the law directs, yet 
by their influence with the chiefs, the matter has been so represented 
to the governor that he and the attorney general have directed that 
further proceedings against them be stoped for the present. 
and the probability is, that the chiefs will address the Legislature 
requesting a law to permit them to remain. nearly 100 families has 
already got in among this nation. Lydia's Alfred is I fear declining, he had a turn of the influenza, and 
does not get recovered from it as I wish to see him. She joins me in 
love to thyself, wife and daughter, and desires to be remembered to Robert 
Bowne and wife with much sympathy. Thy friend James Mott Information 
from 
Friends in 
Canada 
respecting 
Indians 
1816 About 25 Families of Mohocks head of Bay of Canton 
has a chuch--Capt. Isaac a good farmer--others more 
or less intemperate--Government contemplate giving 
them Land--what they now have is on long lease-- Cortunewaga near Montreal--Roman Catholics-- Massasagoes--most live near Young Streit or 
near Lake Simco--wander about--some few raise Corn-- 
lazy, dirty, idle & intemperate--traders say several are 
honest and punctual in paying their debts which 
is mostly done in peltry--very few engaged in War-- 
inoffensive; not much given to violent resentments, but 
mostly quiet and well behaved when sober--wander from Lake 
Simcoe of Huron to Bay of Canton distance 300 Miles--are con- 
siderably numerous and are the original inhabitants-- 
other Tribes procured their Land from them and 
the Government purchase of them--and pay them 
an annuity--Government carefull in preventing 
bad Whites defrauding them and are punished 
if they buy Guns of Kettles &v. of the Indians--
public agents is appointed to protect them--there 
agents reside at York Kingston &c. they collect large 
quantities of Furs--not a war like people--most 
remarkably hospitable and kind to strangers-- Grand River--Mohocks and other Indians--has a 
tract 12 Miles wide & 40 Miles long--some farmers--many 
hundred families--Norwich Friends nearest to them-- Friends give an opinion that Friends in London 
might possibly influence the British Government to 
recommend to the Governor or Parliment of Canada some plans for ameliorating the Condition 
of the Indians in that province--or in such other 
way as Friends there may advise-- 
Enquire if the Gov. or Parliment can grant Lands a person was drowned--his Brother a justice lamented his loss and mourned much on the occasion, a 
Massasago Indian called on a Friend and told him to go to the Man and tell him that it was the 
will of the great spirit and that it was very wrong to mourn and that he ought to submit to it 
quietly otherways it would grieve the Great Spirit as it looked like finding fault with him Newhartford 3 mo 16th 1816 Dear Friends 
John Murry jr. & 
Sam. Parsons Alltho I have not writen for some 
time yet the subject of Indian affairs still rests 
on my mind, the Onondaga tribe have often 
Requested some assistance in building them a 
sawmill, which subject has occupied my mind and 
the minds of Friends here who feel a concern for 
them, but there being no way opening to us 
sufficiant to make a Propersition to the Committee 
untill of late therefore it has ben delayed. Ehraim 
Webster as well as Friends here have thought it might be 
of Great Use to them--and Ehraim Webster has had 
some encouragement to his proposel which was-- 
that if Friends should see it right to assist the Indians 
and do a part, he and the Indians would do the other 
part, that there was a Man who lived adjoining near 
where the Mill aught to be built who is a Millright 
and was friendly to the Indians and would do the Mill 
work and teach the Indians how to tend and keep the 
Mill in repare--it was proposed to E. Webster to assertain 
from the Millright the prabibel expense, and let us know 
and we would Communicate to some of the Committee 
 at New York and as soon as we Rec. an answare we would let 
him know--E Webster is of opinion and so am I--that this 
Mill if it could be built would be of great utility to them 
perhaps as general a benifit as any thing Freinds could 
at present do for them--This bill we have not rec. but 
if Friends should feel it right to do something to encourage 
them in building sd. Mill I have thought to stipulate 
a particular sum would be well--and I have thought of two 
hundred dollars. This sum would pay for the Irons & geering 
the Indians could more conveniantly do the rest 
I should be glad if conveniant to have a bill 
of all the Money which has ben paid to me 
or that I have drew for on acount of Indian affairs 
and inclose it in the answare to this directed to James 
Mott or me. I should be very Glad to receive an 
Answare before James Mott sets off for New York which 
will be about the middle of 4th mo so that things may 
be a little arranged before he leaves. Affectionately your Friend Joseph Frost Speech of Cataraugus Indians 1815 Cattaraugus 4th mo 4th 1816 Esteemed Friend 
Thomas Eddy The Indians of Cattaraugus have requested 
me to forward the following speech to be presented to the 
Indian Committee of N. York in reply to an address 
circulated last year among the different Tribes of Indians 
in this state--in complyance with their request I 
have taken the liberty to direct it to thy Care. It is pleasing to observe that through the various 
difficulties that attend the situations of the Indians 
a disposition continues to prevail among the Sineca 
Nation to avail themselves of the comforts of civilized 
life 
I am very respectfully 
Thy Friend Jacob Taylor Indian Committee 
of N York 
Brothers 
Not long since we have had the pleasure 
of reciveing one of your printed speeches addressed to 
the Indians residing in the state of N York altho not par- 
ticularly directed to our Village yet we feel disposed to make 
some reply to your friendly advice. Brothers We agree with you in the belief that the Care and Queries. What tribes of Indians are settled in the Province 
of Upper Canada whose conditions is pretty well 
known to Friends that reside in that country. Describe nearly the geographical limits of 
each tribe. Does each of the tribes or do any of them possess 
land, & by what kind of tenure. What is the population of each tribe as nearly 
as can be judgd. How long have they been settled in their present 
location. From whence did they imigrate What progress have they made in agriculture. Which of them depend principally on hunting. Do their resources in the Chace diminish. Describe the condition of each tribe, with respect 
to the comforts of life. Mention the character of each of tribe, with 
regard to temper or disposition, moral honesty, 
industry, temperance, relative condition of the women, 
religious belief &c Are they stationary or migratory What progress have they made in Civilization. How far are they exposed to the of 
designing white men. What has government done for their relief Have any considerable efforts been made by 
individuals of Societies to ameliorate their con- 
dition. Have missionaries been among them either 
permanently or temporarily. What effects have 
they produced. 
 Have any Schools been kept among them. Have they learnt the domestic arts of spinning 
weaving or knitting Have they any mills. Do any considerable numbers of them understand 
english. Is it likely that any of the tribes would 
receive cordially the efforts of Friends to 
instruct them in the Arts of Civilization. Would the government of the upper province 
be friendly to such a measure. Is it probable that a Committee chosen by the 
half years meeting & supplied with funds for 
the purpose would have it in their power to 
render efficient aid to any of the tribes. Are they generally addiced to Spirituous 
liquors. Did any or all of the tribes within the reach of Friends take part in the 
last War. S Pe Norwich 7th Mo 15th 1816 Dear Friends I rec. your very interesting communication of 6th Mo 
third. pr the Hands of Hugh Webster . on a subject that has revol- 
ved with weight on my mind at times ever since I settled in the 
vicinity of the six nations of Indians on Grand River, I live about 20 
Miles westardly from the Mohawk village. the Oneida Coyuga 
Onondaga, Delaware and Tuskrora's live down the River about 30 
Miles in length. I have felt it my duty to embrace 
every opportunity to open and keep open a very friendly understand- 
ing with their Chiefs, and many others, and they have uniformly ma- 
nifested, great civility and respect toward me, I have entertained a 
hope, that at some time of other, this fair understanding and free 
intercourse might facilitate, the laudable and humane concern 
prevalent among friends, toward this scattered, disappointed and 
oppressed People, whose welfare lays near my heart I have also been favored to sustain the confidence of the executive 
and other departments of this Government. so far as on a late inter- 
view among many other marks of indulgence, in presenting sundry 
requests in behalf of others, one of which was a petition in favor 
of sundry late emigrants from the U.S. for special Liscences to become 
Land holders on becoming Legally known as subjects. Friends & others 
The Governor after perusing my papers, pleasantly told me to come 
before the Council as well prepared as possible, for I wish (said he) 
to Grant all you ask for and a little more and accordingly did order 
a free admission to all of them and further signed his mandate to 
certain Majistrates to grant the necessary qualification to all such 
as affirm'd. who only produced a Line to them directly from me 
in their favor without an application to the Executive, quite be- 
yond the Circular orders Isued as it repects those from whom an 
oath is expected. this was an essential indulgence. Hence 
you see my situation delicate, and responsible and from what 
has happened of late years under the present Administration of 
your Government from the beginning of their restrictive measures 
down to the bursting out and Termination of the late war in all its 
progress, the distressing invasions, vexations and troubles with which 
this provence has been afflicted. That I can assure you, 
this Government is not overloaded with implicit confidence in the 
disposition of amity and undisguised integrity on the part of the 
U States. hence every proposition from that quarter that 
can be possibly construed as having any Political bearings in its 
effects or Tendency will be examined with a very scrutinizing Eye 
you will at once see that your propositions, under the most 
disinterested views, and with intentions perfectly landable unless we 
complained with some evidence of this concern having no recent 
Date--as also an explicit avowal of the ultimate view motive 
and exciting cause of this concern, it will be easy for a sus- 
picios apprehension to arrise--that the hand of Joab is in 
this thing, to nutralize as many of the natives as possible here 
against a future Day. Wherefore before I Lay this subject 
before Government here or make any formal overture to the 
Chiefs or heads of the Indian departments to enable me to answer 
your Queries, I conceive it will be necessary, for me to receive 
from you a full statement, of the grouds and origin of the 
concern, the length of time it has been maturing, what at- 
tempts have been made upon several tribes in the States 
and the various success attending the concern; as also the present exertions 
from the same source, now in actual operation. This will 
perfectly obviate an impression of its being a local concern only 
comprising Canada--as also preventing an impression of its 
being secretly connected with political calculations--either of 
which at this time would probably, frustrate the views of 
friends in the premises and seriously impede 
a cordial cooperation of Government here, which I apprehend 
would be the case, if the views & intentions of friends were once rightly un- 
derstood here I beg leave to suggest that if one or more of the Committee 
having this subject at heart could see it right (after you 
should feel easy to communicate agreeable to my 
request) to accompany the Concern it would lighten the 
responsibility on my shoulders and I trust we might safely 
calculate on a favorable issue for much will depend on 
a proper introduction of the subject both as it respects 
Government and also the peculiar objects of the concern 
every thing in my power to promote the solid Interest 
of this depressed people, I trust will be at the disposal of 
that benevolent principle from which the concern has 
originated I conclude in much friendship Peter Lossing 
To Tomas Eddy 
John Griscom Norwich U. Canada 2 mo 10th 1817 Dear Friend I rec. thy kind communication Vz. E Moore 
on the Indian concern--may say, It was far from my 
intention by what I wrote the smallest descourage. 
in the way of an extension of care to the poor Natives in 
this Land, but only that the concern might be proceeded in with 
all possible caution--for The natives who are numerous 
perhaps 2000 on Grand River composed of part of the 6 Na- 
tions--& a settlement of Mohawks in the vecinity of Adolphus 
Town I apprehend would be very grateful for any friendly 
and interference from Friends--those on G River I am 
acquainted with, have some imperfect notion of 
cultivation in Agriculture & civilization--one Tribe the Mohawk 
generally profess Christianity--under the care of a Clergyman who 
under a salary from G. visits them occasionally and administers 
what they call Ordinances but I apprehend--its influence has had 
very trifling effects except a little formality--its like People like Print 
A number of White People have occasionally for a few years settle 
amongst them--and with scarcely an exception they have been 
of abandoned Character--their Example has powerfully corrupted 
& continues to corrupt their Moral Character encourage Drunkenness 
profanity Debauchery chicanry & every vice--Government has 
been very Liberal in annually supplying them when pressed 
with want but even Government has almost become discou- 
raged with them--for Aid seems only to render 
many of them less provident & more proflegate I have had 
several interviews with some of the principle chiefs who seem 
disheartened and talk of leaving the country on account of the bad 
effects of the wicked White peoples influence among them. I have 
also confered with some of the Deputy Agents for Indian affairs 
and am of the mind that a few friends settled amongst them 
And a judicious Committee to cooperate with 
them and occasionally Represent their case to 
Government--which has the power to order out 
from amongst them--such as should be represented 
as improper persons to reside amongst them and 
to see that Existing Laws against selling ardent spi- 
rits or bartering Whisky with them were put 
in force or prevail with Government (which 
I should esteem most advisable) to appoint some 
judicious Agent to constantly reside in their 
vicinity whose business it should be to recognise 
all abuses of good order from the Whites--and 
so cooperate with such Committee & Friends 
settled amongst them--I concieve much might 
be done in this way & I have no Idea but a pro- 
position of this Nature would be well recieved 
by our Government as well as be very grateful 
to the better sort among the Poor Indians I am with every Sentiment of 
Esteem & Affection to 
thee & Dear Hannah E. 
To Thomas Eddy Peter Lossing I would suggest whether our half years 
Meeting were requested to Appoint a stand- 
ing Committee to act in the Capacity 
above alluded to & to correspond with your 
Body it would not be likely to have 
a desirable effect-- as proper first 
step in the concern here Speech of John Sky 9 mo 1817 Brothers helped him along across Lake M 
 glad to see him & all he 
object of his visit. We never expect him an 
happy to see us & desire us till our 
women & children. has gone to 
his introduction he will begin with his busi- 
ness. Brothers you have been speaking to Indian 
every year encoureg thim to . You 
 to lern Indians. to think Indians 
ought to learn hunting, & take to civilizd habits 
you advice to be very good. You have 
encouragd nations beyond his residence & 
his nations have heard of it all. This nation 
think of advice very good. & they wish 
to take of advice & becom industrious. You have often told us drink is the ruin 
of Indians, & they now believe it, & they 
have agreed to leave drink, & become in- 
dustrious. The chiefs & warriours met & con- 
cluded to take advice. We have had great many words from frds 
& never had oppertuity to make & 
they have now concludid to send him to 
& good speech helps along, & now wishes to 
have fair talk with fds & take back their 
answer. You see yr frd 
Onondaga & Onieda. All nations beyond here 
will know ar result as well as his own. Their 
warriors have agreed to become Industrious. You
have always given good advice. They now see 
drink is displeas to great & Good 
Spirit. they are now more than they 
have been. Brothers I mention that warriors at tone 
wanta have agreed to vecome industrious. I will 
now mention some things we stand in need of. 
His nation determined to let frds know 
their mind. They consider advice of frds good 
& with a little assistance they hope to do much 
better. number of you back 
if we well you would assist us. The 
nation wou do better. You have told us we 
should please Farm & cultivate our land. we 
have begun this spring to build a saw mill. We find upon begin many things 
plows, harrows. Since we began Saw mill 
warriors agreed to build it themselves. & when 
ready they will let our brothers know about the Iron 
works. They have endeavourd to build the 
mill. The always encourgd us Indians to 
prep there land. & they have agreed to help their 
land & lay hold of Industry. Brothers. perhaps you have heard that 
some reports have that propositions have 
been made to sell their lands. Some white 
people have possesd them going to white 
but they have concluded not to leave the lands 
perhaps brethren your have been unea 
-sy at this reports, but you may rest satisfied 
we ahve taken a firm resolution not to go. 
If any thing more occurs he will let us know. 
I will learn it to you to your own breasts. 
Indean mind are small. dont see so far as 
their fds. whatevr you give we shall make 
good use of it. What I have let you know at 
this time comes from chiefs & warriors 
Onon & oniedas. We are not 
inclined to but leave it to your 
own breasts. We have horses & cattle but want 
tools. We see now we can't live by hunting 
Industry is necessary. Onondaga 
Brothers & Sisters 
Good Spirit preserv us 
till this Wher w Seneca 
our nation more industrious. Women take 
to spinning two more wheels wanted 
pistun broke & mill dam. Philadelphia 11th Mo 28th 1816 
 (From Indian Committee of Phila.) Thomas Eddy & 
Samuel Parsons 
Esteemed Friends The Committee appointed by our Yearly 
Meeting for promoting the gradual Civilization and 
Improvement of the Indian Natives, have been much 
excercised on viewing the peculiar situation in which 
the Seneca Nation is now placed--their Right to 
the Land which they inhabit must be admitted by all; 
but a number of influential persons have acquired 
an exclusive preemption to become the purchasers thereof, 
who are under no obligation to acquire the consent of 
the individual owners, many of whom with much 
labour and some at no small cost have erected comfortable 
dwelling Houses with Stables &c, cleared Farms which 
they occupy and cultivate; yet a few chiefs without 
even the knowledge of these their Brethren, according 
to the common mode of holding Indian Treaties may 
sell the whole, & yet those very Chiefs have neither Right 
or Title to an acre more Land than any other Family 
of the Nation--for the Indian Law in the distribution 
of national property is that all share alike, and 
they hold in joint Tenancy under the same received 
custom Should the Indians be dispossessed of their present 
residence and have to remove further West, there is scarce a 
doubt they would have for white neighbours a profligate 
people compared with those amongst whom they now 
reside--in short such a step appears likely to effect their 
ruin as a nation The Land in question is withing your State, and 
your Legislature did several years since secure to the 
Brotherton Indians the Tract on which they now reside; 
if any mode could be devised by which the Alleghany 
and Cattarogus Reservations with a part of the Buffaloe 
could be permanantly secured to the Seneca Nation it 
might be rendering them an almost incalculable 
benefit--we hope there is no danger of an immediate 
Sale, as from the tenor of our last advices from that 
Country there appears a general aversion to it, and 
were the Nation at large to be consulted and their judgement 
to govern we should have little anxiety as to the result-- 
but where a few individuals not remarkable for their 
industry of sobriety, may be tampered with, and a hasty 
indiscreet act of theirs dispossess the whole Nation of 
all their Territory, it occasions uneasiness and we know 
not how soon such an event will take place. We are informed your Committee for the Improvement &c 
of the Indian Natives meet next week, should you 
believe the import of this proper to engage their 
attention you are at liberty to lay it before them-- 
we are a sub Committee appointed to obtain such 
information as is likely to be useful on this interesting 
subject--we should like to receive from you the 
heads of the Act securing the Brothertons Land 
with any advice which presents, in time to lay 
the same before our general Committee which 
stands adjourned to the 19th of next month on 
whose behalf we are Your Friends Tho. Stewardson Thomas Wistar Isaac Bonsall New York 5 mo 22 1817 To Friends in London Dear Friends We have been appointed by the Com- 
mittee of the Y.M. of New York on Indian Affairs to com- 
municate to you, &, as you may see fit, to other Friends 
or to the Meeting for Sufferings in London some impres- 
sions that have been entertained by the Committee in re- 
lation to the Indians in Upper Canada. From information given to our Committee by 
friends who have traveled considerably thru in the upper 
province, on religious appointments services, as well as the more 
 direct Statements containd in letters from that quarter 
we are persuaded that some of the tribes in that country 
are very suitable objects for benevolent exertion. One of 
those tribes, (the Messasagues,) whose habits are migratory 
& unsettled, are described as holding a very low rank 
in the Scale of human intelligence; and their sufferings 
in the & hardships are in consequence extremely severe. There 
is also a body of Indians settled mostly on Grand river 
composd of the remains of the Six nations, & likewise an 
establishment of Mohawks in the vicinity of Adolphus 
where friends reside. These tribes it is believed would be 
grateful for any aid on the part of Friends to Ameliorate their 
condition, and to enable them to depend less upon their antient 
habits of procuring subsistance, which is becoming more and 
more precarious. The accompanying extracts of letters from 
Peter Lossing an intelligent Friend who resides in Upper Cana- 
da & who has been addresd on this subject, will furmish 
more particular information relative to the condition of 
the tribes last mentiond. It is difficult to say how far Friends of 
this, or of the neighbouring Yearly Meetings, might be dis- 
posd to instruct themselves in any attempt to improve the 
condition of the Indians in Upper Canada. It is obvious, 
however, that it would be necessary, as a previous step, to 
conciliate the good will of the Canadian government. So far 
as fully to satisfy its members that the motives of friends 
were wholly disinterested, & entirely unconnected with na- 
tional controversies & national prejudices. Hence it has 
been our decided opinion, that, if any thing is done, the 
way had better be opened by Friends in London, in whatever 
mode to them shall appear most advisable. We are aware that there are very numerous & urgent 
calls upon the Philanthropy of Friends almost every where. 
And whether at such a time as the present, it would be expedient 
to undertake a measure of the kind now suggested, we feel our- 
selves incompetent to decide. But we are inclined to believe 
that with such assistance & personal cooperation as the Friends 
who reside in upper Canada might be able to afford much good 
could be done at a moderate expence. We hold it to be a 
self evident truth that with respect to the adult Indians, or at 
least, with thou who are advanced in life, no radical change 
can be expected in habits that have been sanctiond by 
custom, and interwoven with all the faculties of body & mind. 
Our expectations of benefit, rest, therefore, with the youth. If 
schools were established among them, & their children of both 
sexes were instructed in the english language* *Schools upon the Lancastrian plan would probably be more eligible., and, at the same 
time, (as we think it would be practicable) exercised in some of 
the Mechanic Arts & in the tillage of the ground, a founda- 
tion might be laid for a gradual & important change in 
their ideas & habits. It appears highly probable too, from 
the Statement of P Lossing , that the residence among them, of 
a judicious friend, under with the protection approbation of the government, 
might be very useful, not only as a teacher & adviser, but as an 
instrument to counteract the pernicious agency of the profli
gate & unprincipled whites to whom they are exposed. But the design of this letter is to present this Sub- 
ject to your notice, & if you judge proper, to the views of 
other friends in London, without wishing to dictate 
the measures proper to be pursued. If upon due 
consideration it should appear to be of sufficient weight 
to engage the attention of the Society in your land 
there will always, we trust, be found a willingness 
on the part of Friends of America to do whatever is reasonably in our their 
power to promote the welfare of this depressed 
 portion of the human family. with great regard 
we are your affectionate friends Onondaga castle Sept 10 1817 Dear Friend With pleasure I inform 
the that the Onondagoes are are Pleasd 
with the scheeme of giting into Civili- 
zed habits they have don well so far 
I hope the will not only have the 
countenance and aid of the soceity 
of friends in the manefacture 
of cloth but also in agraculture 
it seem are omen for good that 
in different pleaces and of different 
demonination unite in their bene- 
volent exertion to halp the poorrest 
people I sent this by a senaca Chief 
I should concider at letter 
from you a favor Mary Dockstater yarn now on hand 
 To make of Cotton & Linen 55.7its of wollen cloth 18. do Beside felling about 21 runs--and 
of Linen 20--runs 
The above cloth & yarn were spun in 
my school during the last year. Mary Dockstater New Stockbridge. 1st Mo 1st 1816 Acors Rathbone 5 mo 11. 1816 Dear friends I Receved a few 
Lines from you some time Past and 
it bing atime of sickness in my 
family the letter was Lost or mis Lade 
so that I am not able to answer it so per- 
ticular as I should wish 
I have not been able to find stiddy 
master my son stay at the shool at the 
Oneida while it was time for him to be 
gin work at Clothing business his school 
gradual deminished before he left it to one 
or two some of the indians say that they are 
afraid it will make there Children as bad as white 
folks if they send them to school but some 
are willing to send and want ther Chil 
dren should have Learning but mos of those 
are the grateer part of there time out at work 
in Different parts of the country the women seem to be spirited in Learning to 
make Cloth and thank friends for there in 
coragement and there are upwards of 20 
that have sowed and are Preparing to sow 
flax I have Procure the Looms other 
articles as the sub Commitee Directed and 
Shall send my account in the faul or 
soner if oppertunity offers should 
have sent it now if I had not forgot 
to bring it with me when I came from 
home I am of opinion that if some small fame 
ly could go and liv at the Oneida that are 
tidy smart farmers that can spin and 
weve will be use full if thy keep there 
own gadin Clean from your Friend Acors Rathbun of Verona To the sub Comt. 
for Indianaffares 
whose names I have 
forgoten Colman Pahten 16 of 5 Mo 1816 Verona 5th Mo 27th 1817 Dear friends the Committee 
for Indian affairs, I have had some conferences 
with the Chiefs of the Oneida tribe, those whom friends 
have had the care of. They acknowlege our kindness in giving them 
seed, and furnishing them with teams to do their plowing 
this trying season; several of thier Nation have lost their 
oxen owing to the severe past winter, and are una- 
ble to buy more, and they request the use of two 
yoke more; which I think will be of great inco- 
ragement as some of them are clearing and often 
who have not yet sowed any English grain see how 
much better off those are that have, wish to be enabled 
to sow themselves. The cart of a yoke of oxen with 
thier apparatus will be at least $100 in the spring of the 
year, and about 15 less in the fall, being the cost of wintering 
[The anual expence of wintering oxen is generally 
that sum $15]. Their increase of Sheep has 
been more than I expected some have a score of old 
sheep and a number of lambs and they have made 
considerable woolen cloth the past season. I 
offered to pay for the Dressing of the first peace of 
cloth each family would make the bill of which 
I have charged in my account. If friends disapprove of 
passing for dressing the first peace each family makes of desire 
them to note it in the next Letter Acors Rathbun PS pleas to write as soon as convenient Indian Committee Dz. To balence Due when forwarded last account $37--26 To plow irons 6-- To need 14/-- Loom harness 10/-- 3-- To Cash paid Nancy in full for last years 
wages for inst'ing women in spinning &c 2--50 To three days attending on Comms request in 
examining circumstances of Indians 6-- To 1 day on Indian's business 1-- To paid Mary Doestater $18 in full for last years wages 18-- To 68 bushels potatoes a 6/-- per bushel 51-- To wintering 2 yoke of oxen a $12 24-- To 6 1/2 bushes 1 seed corn a $3 18--75 To 2 days attendance on Indian business 3-- To paying Mary Dockstater $6 in advance 
for present year's wages 6-- To paid dressing of John Aron Smith 's 
Sister's Cloth her name forgot 7 3/4 yds 2--75 To Do Jacob Smith 's 20 1/4 yds 5--82 1/2 To Do Moses Cornelius 13 1/4 yds 4--70 $189--78 1/2 Cr by Cash for my order 50-- by Cash Do 100-- Due $39--78 1/2 PS Charles Willits arrived here last 7th day and 
is gone to Onondaga, being well and desired 
his family might be informed of it if convenient To John Griscam Acors Rathbun Friend John Griscam Pleas to Pay Horsefield & 
Mott one hundred & Eighty Dollars and Charge 
the Same to my account for indian affares Verona 9th of 6th Mo. 1817 Acors Rathbun Accepted 
Please pay the above in my act 
Jn Barrow 
To Jn Dodgson Address of Indian Chiefs at Tonawanda. 
1817 The Chiefs of the People of the village of Tonnawanta 
to all the good People to whom these presents may come 
greeting
Brethren & friends Our dearly beloved Brother John Sky 
(the bearer of this) has this day started from our Village 
at Tonnawanta on a journey to New York City to 
visit our good friends the Quakers at that place who 
have for some length of time manifested a friendly 
disposition towards us. The Object of this visit is to 
Obtain advice & instructions from those good people 
relative to our future conduct & behaviour which 
we are fully persuaded will be highly beneficial 
to us and to our people--And is is our hearty 
desire & request that all our white brethren with 
whom our brother Sky may have any intercourse 
on his journey, may treat him with friendship 
& hospitality, and with that tenderness & consider- 
ation that a stranger not understanding the 
language of the country might wish or expect 
from a civilized & Chistian People Dated at the Village of Tonnawanta 
September 14th 1817 our marks Top X Johnson X Jemy Johnson X Ottaieta X Blue Sky X Peter Baldwin X 
Interpreter Address from Stockbridge Indians 
dated 12 Sept. 1817 To the Society of Friends at the city of New York. 
Brothers, We have thought it is our duty to address a few words unto 
you in order to brighten that friendship which your forefathers 
and ours have always maintained; and which we, their 
children are still fondly cherishing under the auspi- 
ces of the Great and Good Spirit. We have this day received information, that our Western 
Friends the Seneca Nation have recently agreed to adopt the 
good path, which leads to civilization & which has been very 
often pointed out for them by friendly White People, but 
particularly by friends, who have always manifested 
a tender regard for the welfare of Indians &c. The main body of the Senecas have for years paste, repeat- 
edly rejected the friendly offers, which you have made to them 
that is, that they should endeavour to follow the path of civili- 
zed life. However we have now rejoiced to hear that they will 
now endeavour to follow husbandry, and have now send 
a messenger from one of their tribe to notify you of their 
determinations, & to crave your advice & assistence. 
Two other Indians we have understood will accompa- 
ney him, one from the Onandaga tribe & the other from 
Oneida. We sincerely hope that they will persevere in their 
determinations to follow the good path, which will render 
them happy and comfortable. We moreover hope that 
friends will render them their assistence in this lauda- 
ble work or beginning. We would further inform you that our people have 
lately found the good effects of husbandry, which they 
have particularly practiced these many years since. We believe there has never been so much english grain 
raised by our people as it has been this season. 
The corn in general very promising at present 
and have reason to will turn out abundantly 
if the frosts do not off again. We 
feel happy to state that our young men improve greatly 
in husbandry and that they love to labor much within 
one year since. Many are now preparing to their fields 
in order to sow wheat & other winter grain. We owe in a great degree these late changes to your 
friendly advice which you have repeatedly given us. We have reason to thank the great Spirit, that he has 
pleased to put it in the minds of Friends to visit us 
often--and hope that they will continue their visits. We now send our salutations to you all, in which 
our women join us 
 Hendrick Aupaumut Joseph Quinney John Metorsen Abnir. W. Hendrick Signed in of the Nation. Solomon U. Hendrick 
Clk. New Stockbridge 
 Sept. 12th 1817 Onondaga March the 13, 1819 This Certifies that I have visited the Indiuns 
at the Onandaga Castle and instructed there 
 and was much pleased with their indusry 
and ingenuity and am firmly convinced that if 
they ware sutiably furnished with an instructer 
that in a very short time they would learn 
comfort in manufacturing cloth and other 
materials for domestic use Joseph W. Bruister 
Treasurer 
of a Society 
lately formed 
for the benefit 
ofthe Indians 
 
of a Society 
Lately formed 
for the Benefit 
of the Indians 
 
To Isaac Hicks 
Thomas Eddy & 
Robt. & 
J. Collins 
N. York New York 9th Mo. 23rd. 1817 Esteemed Friends Your Letter by John Sky , a Chief 
of the Senaca Nation of Indians, was handed us, and 
the Committee on Indians affairs have had a conference 
with Sky --he stated generally, that he was appointed to 
inform us, that the Nation had held a Council lately, 
and had become sensible of the necessity of 
Sobriety and Industry, and were very desirous of the assis- 
tance of Friends to enable them to cultivate their Lands raise 
Cattle & Sheep &c. and also stated, that at the place he resides, 
Tonawanto Village, the Indians propose building a Saw Mill 
and wanted us to furnish them the Mill Irons. It would be very 
desirable to assist these poor people, but it is attended with 
considerable difficulty on account of their remote 
situation, which makes it very inconvenient for us to visit them. 
Unless they are visited, and suitable advice afforded to them, 
we should allways be at a loss to know anything of their 
general conduct, or in what way assistance might be given 
most beneficial and usefull. From our knowledge 
of Indians, we are satisfied it requires great caution and care 
in assisting them, otherways it may often injure instead 
of helping them--on this account we think it would be most 
prudent to do it rather sparingly, and then if they increase 
in sobriety and industry we may be encouraged to do 
more. We should be very glad if two or more Friends from 
your place would be encouraged as soon as convenient to pay them a friendly 
visit, impart such advice as you may judge suitable, and in- 
quire into their general conduct, and how far there is en- 
couragement to hope that they will improve themselves 
in farming and civilization. If you should with 
sufficient encouragement, you are at liberty to supply 
them to the value of Fifty dollars with any kind of farming utensils, or such other articles 
as you may think most to their advantage. If the above sum should be wanted it will be paid 
you by Wm. Kibbre Cashier of the Bank at Canandagua, 
on you giving him a Bill for the same on Richland R. 
Lawrence. The Stockbridge, Onieda, & Onandago Indians 
under the care of the Committee, have of late made consi- 
derable improvement in raising grain and farming 
generally, and the number of Women engaged in spin- 
ing and weaving Cloth, have very much increased, 
and some of them have made more than 100 yds Cloth this 
year. For your information and government we inclose 
a Copy of an address we sent by Sky to the Senaca 
Nation. We are 
Your Affectionate Friends 
To Jos Comstock 
Jno. Battey 
Caleb McCombre 
David Baker 
Ira Lapham 
Daniel Lapham PS. We should be pleased to hear from you on 
the subject of this Letter as soon as convenient. Letters to Friends in Farmington. April 15. 1818 By A number of the Committee on Indian Concerns 
who were together Yesterday, and to whom your Letter of 3 mo. 4 
was shown desired to say, that Your attention to the subject 
and the guarded care manifested was agreeable. 
It afforded satisfaction to hear that the 
Indians you visited at Tonywanta appeared to 
be in comfortable and improving circumstances. 
It was also noticed that you had agreed to expend 
for their benefit Fifty Dollars, authorized 
by a former Letter; and that you purpared 
to pay them another visit. Altho it is uncertain 
whether way will open for Our Committee 
hereafter to give attention to those 
Indians yet should you beleive the expenditure of 
the further Sum of Fifty Dollars would be 
particularly useful to them at the present 
time, you are authorized to apply it according- 
ly; and to draw for the money in the same 
way as before, or have it refunded in any other way that 
may suit you. We are your affectionate friends 
 To &c. Brother Town 1 Mo. 20th 1819 Beloved friend As I am desirious for the wellfair of 
the Indians tribes and seeing their situation very trying and dan- 
gerous and more so since they have sold their land and part of them are 
gone with their families down to white River and the land they exp- 
ected was sold before they got down and the money they sold their land 
for here was put into John Serjants Jun . hands to be paid to them as they 
wanted it & there was about a duzen Indians went down with him when they sold 
the land and they spent $700 in coming from Albany to Stockbrige and 
they that moved down took a bout $1500 with them that by the superinten- 
dants account from all their enquire & solomon Hendrick says the same 
that theirs $3000 they can give no account of what is become of it 
they did not call on John serjant Jun. but enquired of the peace 
makers and those that they knew any thing about how the money 
was laid out or spent and could git no other information that the 
superintendants and solomon as well as they are much dissatisfi- 
ed and the tribe in general and think of pirtssoning to the assembly to 
revoke the sale of the 200 acres & the old orchard sold to John serjant 
Jun. Solomon Hendrick told me that the town did not give their consent 
to sell it but Cap. Hendrick had fifty Dollars as a bribe & Jacob 
Conhapot had the promise of Eight but got but four which he did not 
like it made him tell that John serjant Jun. had given them that money 
to sell him the land John Petoytar & some others that was down when they 
did sell the land he did not know whether they had any money or the 
promise of any but consented to the sale of the land. 
They Called a counsel and sent for Thomas Dean to meet them he 
went and they were very desirous for him to go down to Washington to 
apply to Congress for some of land that the Dilawars had Promised them 
but had now sold it Thomas thought the prospect was poor and advis'd 
them not send or go but John serjant Jun. incouraged to go and offered 
hi servis to go and for incouragment told them he was well acquainted 
with the old Presidents Jefferson & Matison and the present one and 
many of the Congress that he thought he could be of great servis to 
to them but they did not agree to send him they called another counsel to 
consult whether he should go ot not. John serjant Jun. brought prousion and made 
a great feast and when the table was all ready to set down to he says to 
them all now all of you that are for my going to Washington hold up your 
hand and you shall pertake of feast and they generaly held of the hand 
for him to go this solomon told me. a year ago the old man Jn. serjant 
got out of the $100 for their yuse as he and got an order from the peace makers for 
one hundred & thirty on the superinendants but as the peace makers had 
drew orders on them for more money then would be due in one & a half 
years they refused my son Thomas had been down to the asembly two 
winter on their business bore his own expenc and part of theirs to the amount of 
forty one dollars the peace makers sent for him to come and git his money 
when he went John serjant told him he had the money but could not 
spare it but he would get an order from the peace makers and would give him 
an order on the superintendants but they would not exept his order for they see 
his policy to get all his own orders and his sons answer, first they told Thomas 
if he would get an order from the peace makers they would answer it the first 
money that come into their hands, & he has got the order. we understand by accounts 
from Albany that John serjant & Capt. Hendrick has applied to the assembly for a years 
annuity in advance we expected they would apply and directed the lawyer to 
write to the Governer not to comply with their request as the mony is much wan- 
ted in town to pay off those that kept the poor when they were over there was a great 
Complaint a poor Widow that had kept a sick man untill his death to the amount 
of fifteen dollars and all the money the land was sold for was gone and many 
of them suffering for want now they paid the poor widow seven Dollars to relieve 
present wants in advance thinking that better then to spend it in going to washing- 
ton in that expencive way in the stage that thou may see that those that go 
on business are not concern'd for the good of the nation but to gratify their 
in drinking that they will in courage to fell more land to make business for them 
and John serjant to them if it brakes up the town for we fear he gits to 
large a share and think theres need for him or boath father & son to be brought 
to a settlement but as those that are authorised to bring them to an account are 
easily bribed that unless some that feels for their prosperity and good I have my 
fears that the poor things will be broke up and many of them have their dwellings 
sold and they no place left to cindle their fire but it appear there is a door open 
for friends to step in by the Gouverner Speech to recommend them to be 
put under the care of religious socsities to superintend for them and see that 
they are not imposed upon by white people and whare they see the need of legistative 
interference to apply for their assistance that I think as friends have to attend the 
assembly they may see if their can be any thing done in that way that will be for 
their good for I think if their cannot the prospect is very gloomy for us to be 
of much use as the Indians boath in Brother Town and Stockbridge will many of them 
join with the white people to hasten their destruction I have been the more 
perticular in information believing this is the last oppertunity we shall have 
to apply to the assembly that that will avail much Hank Soloman told me and 
appeared to concerned that John sergent would brake up the town and I 
for their prosperity I have ventured to inform thee altho in a very broken 
way but my age & weakness may plead an excuse altho I always think an ex- 
cuse of very little use the writing will speak for itself. the above account that Soloman give that he intendid to make void the 
purchase of the land & old orchard by pertitioning to assemly the stackbrige 
peace makers and superintendants have nett and they nor Soloman did not men- 
tion anything about pertitioning that I think it will be best to say nothing 
about it. we are in tolrable helth exept Thomas wife who 
had been put to bed more in five weeks remains weak & feble I am
as well as can be expected & have preformed the visit to all the 
families but four and them left by reason of rough traviling and it 
remains so very warm & muddy I hope I shall not tire thy patience shall conclude after desiring my best love to Hannah Eddy and 
all enquiring friends they Husband in perticular remaining thy 
assured friend John Dean New York 4th June 1818 Respected friend 
Thomas Eddy 
(from Thos. L. Ogden In the accidental conversation which lately 
took place between us in Pine Street you requested that I would 
reduce to writing the ideas which I then expressed on the subject 
of the Indian Reservations. I proceed now to comply with your 
request. I will begin by remarking that the title to all the 
Lands in this State is founded on the right of discovery or con- 
quest and is derived from the Dutch Government, the Crown of 
Great Britain, or (since the revolution) from the State of New York. 
Titles not deduced from one of these sources are deemed of no 
validity in our Courts of Justice: those derived from the Indians 
are not in any manner recognized. In fact, a grant of the 
fee simple from the Government carries with it the exclusive 
right of treating with the Indians for the Lands which are the 
subject of it; and without such grant, no person can acquire 
from them any legal right or title whatever. This Doctrine has 
prevailed in our Courts from the first settlement of the Country 
under the British Government and has been recently confirmed 
by the concurring opinions of our most able Lawyers. All our 
Northern & Western Lands held under Grants from the Govern- 
ment have accordingly been the subject of continual bargain 
and sale from the revolution to the present time without refe- 
rence to the Indian possessions. It is true that it was the policy 
of Great Britain before, as it has been of this country since, the 
Revolution, not to dispossess the native occupants by force, but 
to treat with them for the Land they occupy. It is evident however 
that these negotiations refer to the possession and not to the title; 
for whether we look to the transactions of the present or of former 
days it must be obvious that the prices paid to the Indians 
are but nominal equivalents for the lands they relinquish; the 
real consideration being that paid for the fee simple. With respect to the particular Tract of Country in which the 
Reservations in question are situate, the title as you may recollect 
was disputed between the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and 
the State of New York, each claiming under Grants or Charters from 
the Crown of England. In the year 1786 a Convention was held for 
a settlement of these differeces, which resulted in a cession by 
New York to Massachusetts of the right of Soil and all other 
right, except that of Sovereignty and Jurisdiction, in the whole 
Tract now called the Genesee Country, the right of holding 
Treaties with the native Indians for the extinguishment of 
their claims and of granting that right to Purchasers under 
them, being expressly reserved to Massachusetts. Under this Convention and before any negotiation with 
the Indians, Massachusetts sold the fee simple of all the 
Lands in this Tract of Country, part to Gorham and Phelps 
and part, including these Reservations, to Robert Morris , 
who again sold to the Holland Company and others. In 
the year 1797 and subsequent to this last sale, the Indians 
released to the different proprietors the great bulk of 
Morris's purchase. The present Reservations are not in- 
cluded in that release, but remain, as to the Indian claim, 
in the same situation as they were, when sold by the State 
of Massachusetts; and as such, were sold, after the Treaty of 
1797, by the Holland Company to David A. Ogden , who has 
since sold, in like manner, to various purchasers under him. It results from what has been said that the Indians have 
a mere right of possession in these Reservations, which they 
are incapable of conveying, except to the proprietor of the fee: 
and that, without his consent, no arrangement can be 
accomplished, by which to change or modify their present 
tenure. In making these remarks, I do not wish to be 
understood as intimating a disinclination on the part 
of the proprietors, to concur in any reasonable plan calcu- 
lated to ameliorate the condition of the Indians:on the contrary 
I am persuaded that such a plan would receive their ready 
co-operation. For, whatever prejudices may be entertained 
on this subject, I can conidently assure you, that they 
are disposed not to oppress or injure this unfortunate 
race of People, but to act towards them with Equity and 
Kindness. At the same time, I do not hesitate to declare 
my entire conviction, that no material progress can be 
made in the great and benevolent purpose of changing 
their habits and pursuits, until they shall be removed 
to a greater distance from Settlements. Experience has 
shewn conclusively, that wherever Indians have easy 
opportunities of Intercourse with White People, their Men 
become Drunkards, and their Women Prostituted; that 
all the virtues belonging to savage life are extinguished 
and the low vices of our worst states of Society adopted. 
The condition of the Indians in the neighbourhood of 
Buffalo affords a strikin illustration of this Truth. 
Their depravity is offensive to common decency, and those 
especially among the Females who profess to become Con- 
verts to the Christian Faith, are said to be the most aban- 
doned and shameless in their intercourse with the White Men. Under the circumstances in which they are now 
placed, it seems to me, that the true Interests of the Indians 
will be best promoted, either by removing them to a remote 
situation, prossessing the requisite advantages of soil and 
climate, where they shall be protected by the Government 
and secured from the near approach of White Settlement 
or by concentrating them on one of the reservations they 
now occupy. In the latter situation they would be under the 
more immediate care and inspectionof those who may be 
disposed to take the charge of their instruction; but whether 
this advantage would not be counterbalanced by the 
continual approaches of Settlers, deserves consideration. 
If not, the reserved Lands on the Allegany, amounting to 
upwards of 20,000 Acres appear to me best calculated for 
their residence. These Lands are very fertile, they skirt 
both banks of the river for a great distance, and lie at the 
foot of high and rough mountains, which are little calcu- 
lated to invite settlements. There the Indians would be 
in a manner insulated; and their annuities (increased 
by the sale of the other Tracts) would furnish means to 
provide Clothing, Farming Implements, and other com- 
forts connected with civilized life. As the General Gov
ernment have offered the Indians a Tract of Country 
to the South West, understood to be very favourably situ- 
ated, and a great part of the Nation seems bent on remo- 
val, it would perhaps be most advisable, even if they 
should accept that offer, that one of the reservations be 
retained for the accomodation of those who may be averse 
to that measure, and such as incline to remain, may be 
allowed to contiunue on the Lands they cultivate till they find 
it convenient to leave them. The comparative advantages 
of the old and new Establishments will be ascertained in the 
course of a few years, and the fostering care of the benevolent 
can then be bestowed on that which may be found most eligible. In the general view which you and other friends of 
these Indians may take of their condition and prospects 
it would be improvided to overlook those considerations 
of Public Policy and convenience which are inseparably 
connected with the subject. The sentiments contained 
in President Monroe 's Message, as well as those undertood 
to be entertained by our State Government seem to forbid 
equally the long continuance of a state of things by which 
an extensive Wilderness is to be preserved in the heart of 
Population and Improvement, and a property which to 
add to the public resources and prosperity is made to 
interfere with both. Individual feelings and interests 
are in unison with the public policy on this question, and 
so plain and palpable is the necessity of the speedy removal 
of the Indians from the Buffalo and Tonnewanta Reservations 
that there would be no difficulty in now selling them in detail 
and at extravagant prices. In fact a large and powerful 
Company has offered to purchase the legal title to one of 
them, with a view to take possession of the Lands not actually 
cultivated by the Indians, and to hold in defiance of their 
claim; but it was not thought right by my Brother, to 
expose the Indians to the collisions and encroachments, 
which such a Sale would necessarily subject them to, 
and the offer was therefore declined. I am very respectfully, 
Your assured friend T. L. Ogden 
Thomas Eddy Esq. Albany 30th March 1819 My friend The communications under date 
of the 19th inst. were duly received, and disposed 
of as intended. I should of reply'd 
sooner, but for the hope of having something 
to say that would enliven hope, not so is the 
fact, the session being near a close, I do 
not believe any thing will be done for these 
poor injured people. your visit to 
this place and suggestions, I an induced 
to believe have had beneficial effects 
on some. with esteem and respect W. Bowne 
Richd R. Lawrence The brave David Hill one of the Ononda-
go tribe of Indians is on his way to New 
York on business for his Nation with some 
Gentlem. Quakers in New York--he is a very 
decent sober Man, and as he has taken his 
seat into the Stage I have given him this 
statement to intitle him to repect from 
the passengers Albany March 19th 1819 Isaac Dirmiston --Agent 
for Indian affairs Albany 3 Mo 19th 1819 Esteemed Friends 
Richard R Lawrence 
& Allen Clap David Hill the subject of the 
 petition, one of the Onondaga Indians, in com- 
pany with Eleazor Williams missionary to the Oneida 
Indians, say they were advised to Call on some friends 
in Albany in order to get advice respecting the 
property of the Sd. David Hill going to New York to solicit 
friends in person as he had though of doing, yet 
considering it a very considerable undertaking, and was 
willing to return if friends here advised thereto and 
if they would undertake to forward the petition 
with the certificates and recommendations the 
said David Hill states that Gidion Simson and 
other friends stay'd at his house this last season who 
might be consulted. And the Missionary E Williams 
states that he knows D Hill well, and that he is 
a very smart man for business and that he seems 
to have good judgment in what he undertakes 
and further that he believes it would be likely to have 
a very good effect on other young men of his tribe 
if he was incoraged and enabled to prosecute business 
to advantage, he think the subject under consider- 
ation and having in view the Interests friends had 
taken to improve the conditions of the Indians 
together with their being disposed to look up to 
friends for their advice and assistance, that at 
least it might not be amis to forwar his pitition 
as it might be taken unkind by that people 
if we did not. A line address'd to E Williams 
Missionary to the Oneida Indians as to David 
Hill the pititioner might be as well as he 
wishes to know friends minds on the subject Your Assured Friends Thomas Gould 
Abraham Staples Brothers & Friends at Different times when you 
Visited the Onondaga Nation you Recommened 
to them to Cultivate their Lands I 
Belong to the Onnondaga Nation & I am 
happy to inform you that I am one 
who have followed your advice I have 
Cultivated and Improved as much as I 
was able, but in Consequence of my 
having nothing to begin with I have made 
but little progress, Brothers 
I am a young man but still I wish to 
act like an old man I Beleive that man 
is wise when he Endeavours to get his 
living by Cultivating the land which the 
Great Spirit has Given us Brothers 
Now hear, it is my wish to Cultivate 
more land but I must be assisted in order 
to do this by some friends who are Interested 
in the welfare and prosperity of the Indians 
it is more than five years I have struggled 
to Get along in improving my land but for 
want of a suitable team I have Laboured 
under Great Disadvantages Brothers 
Now Listen to the petition of David Hill 
the subscriber of this, and hear his prayer 
which is that some of the sosiety of friends 
which have Heretofore been very friendly 
to the Indians, will help him to a yoke 
of Oxen on a Credit of two years, he is 
willing to pay one half in one year unless 
some misfortune befall him and the whole 
at the Expiration of the time afore Mentioned 
her has no wish to have the Cattle Gratis 
but wishes by this assistance to show you 
what he can do in that time if Prosperd 
If the friend feel willing to supply him 
with Chains and Yoke they shall also be 
paid for them, this is the sincere 
Request of your Indian friend who has 
always had a Desire to follow you 
Good Advice David X his mark Hill Albany March 17th 1819. I here certify, that David Hill , is a young man 
of good habits and very industrious. I heartly wish 
his success to all his undertakings. Eleazer Williams 
Missionary to the 
Oneida Indians Acors. Rathbun To the Committee to Superintend Indians D. 1818 
5. 5th $ To 26 1/2 bush. peas for Onida & Stockbridge a 8/ $26 50 To 3 at 9/ 3. 3.8. To 22 1/2 bush. oats at 3/ 8. 43 To 36 3/4 of potatoes a 2/6 11 49. To 79 1/2 bush. seed wheat a 14/ 34 1.3 To 8 3/4 bush. corn a 16/ 1.7. 50 To 2 bush. flax seed at 16/ 4 -- To 1 peck beans 4 31. To 47 lb flax a 6. 8.9 To 30 lb wool a 4/ 15 -- To Carding and oiling wool 2 16. 1/2 819 
5th To paid for garden seeds 4. 8.4 To for school bilt for 4. 7.5 To paid Mary Doxstator 3 -- To 5 bush. flax seed for Onida & Stockbridge a 12/ 7. 50 To 1 yoke of oxen 80 -- To 1 105 -- To 2 Chains 8. -- To 1 yoke of Oxen 80 -- To 10 bush. Potatoes at 3/ --delivered to 11 persons 3 7.5 To 1 1/2 bush. peas at 3/ 5 1. 50 To 1/4 bush seed corn a 8/ 1. 2.5 To cash paid for knitting needles 1. 50 5 mo 15 To 12 days my own time a 10/ 15 -- 20 To paid Mary Doxstator for potatoes and seed corn 7. 00 To 1 yoke Oxen 8.0 -- To 1 cow and provisions deliverd Philenor Hunt 
To which account has been forwarde 3.9. 7.5 $566 63 1819 
6. 29 To balance credited 86 56 Contra Cr. 1818 
5. 5th By balance on hand $53 32 6. 4 By draft 75 75 1819 
2. By cash of P. Hunt by L Mott 13 -- 2. 3 -- 5. draft on John Murray 35 -- 5. By favour of J. Grant 300 -- 6. 29 Balance charged 86 56 $566 63 $566 63 Letter from Philadelphia Committee, 
with copy of a Letter from James Munroe to the Indians 
1819 Dear Friends Your letter of the 8th instant, was received this morning, 
and in reply to which we will observe, That at the present very interesting 
Crisis of Indian Affairs, and particularly as relating to those Indians, who 
yet retain reservations of land within the Massachusetts claim, we apprehend 
every step contemplated by their friends, ought to be maturely considered and 
examined, before acting on, least what may appear of advantage to these poor 
and much oppress'd part ot the human family, should in its ultimate result 
prove to be quite the contrary. For instance, those Indians are now under 
the care & protection of the United States, as will be seen in the Treaty, contained 
in the pamphlet forwarded to Rich. Mott last week, should they be prematurely 
placed under the intire direction & management of the State Legislature, is 
there not danger to be apprehended that the influence of the Speculators 
in the last remnant of their land, would be more likely to obtain their 
object, than if the Indians remained as they are at present situated? 
Again--Would not a division of the land of these Indians be more 
likely to produce among them the obvious necessity of having a few laws 
instituted for their regulation, and thus induce them to apply to the 
competent authority, for such as should appear indispensable, and which 
would of course be more congenial to their feelings and sense of propriety, than 
if they should be presented with a code of regulations, and informed that they 
must conform to the requisitions therein contained, without feeling the 
necessity of such compliance? Has not experience proved the danger there exists in oppointing 
agents & Commissioners by law, to the care of Indian lands? see the 
sentiments of the Indians on this subject 3rd paragraph 17th page in the 
pamphlet already noted--and if we are correctly informed, the transactions 
now in operation with either the Brothertown, Stockbridge or Oneida 
Indians and one of their care takers, is not void of admonition on 
on this delicate subject. There is, and it is gratefull to us in observing it, a general 
sensation felt, on behalf of the Aborigines of our Country--but this may 
subside--we wish to make use of the favourable opportunity, to effect 
some permanent advantage to the natives, without requiring from 
Government anything but what Justice demands. It does not appear 
to us that those Indians who are the immediate subjects of this Communi- 
cation, require much, if any pecuniary aid at this time from Government 
provided the annuities paid to them were applied as they ought to be. Our Society have engaged in this important Concern, under 
an apprehendsion of Religious duty, and in the prosection of which, 
they have been careful not to mix with the policy or the funds of the 
Government--and we have been well satisfied, many times, that this 
and this only, was safe ground for us to move on, and are induced to believe 
that it remains, and will remain, so to be. Under these views, we feel easy to rest the subject, as it relates 
to the Indians on the Holland Purchase, for the present, and suggest the 
propriety of a full and free Conference being at a suitable time had 
with your and our Committees, in which a plan may be digested matured 
& adopted, calculated to effect the results so desirable to us all. You have kindly invited us to a free communication of our 
sentiments, and we have accordingly, used much freedom & candor in 
the foregoing, in order that we may have a clear & distinct understanding 
of each others sentiments--believing that it will require not only the 
unity of sentiment, but the Cooperation of exertion in the friends of 
the Indians, to secure to them, the small, the very small, pittance 
of the great abundance of land which they or their Ancestors 
once possess'd. My Red Children, I am glad to learn by your friends 
Samuel Bettle , Thomas Wistar , Thomas Stewardson and John Cook , that you 
no longer live in that miserable and destitute state which you once 
did. They say that most of you have become sober, and industrious; 
that you have got good houses to live in, and that by cultivating the 
ground and raising cattle, you have now a plenty to eat. This is to 
me very good news--as I shall always rejoice to hear of the 
happiness of my red Children My Red Children 
You cannot become civilized 'till you have 
advanced one step further, you know that among my white children 
each one has his own land separate from all others. You ought to do 
the same; you ought to divide your land among families, in 
lots sufficiently large to maintain a Family according to its size. 
Your good friends the Quakers, would, no doubt, enable you 
to make a just and equitable division. By this dividing your 
land, each one could then say, this is mine; and he would 
have inducements to put up good houses on it, and improve 
his land by Cultivation. My Red Children 
I have annexed the seal of the United 
States to this talk, so that you may know it comes from your father 
the President sign'd James Monroe 15 Jan 1819 
 To the Seneca Indians 
living on the Alleghany Reservation (It is desirable no copies of this should be permitted to be taken at present) We subjoin a Copy of the writing received from the President 
of the United States, and are affectionately, your friends Thomas Eddy Richard Mott Tho. Stewardson Thomas Wistar Philadelphia 1 Mo. 10 1819 At a Yearly Meeting held in NewYork 5m 1819, Zebulon &. Trip were 
at their request released from the appointment 
to attend to the concern for the civilization 
of the Indian Natives. & Joseph Mott , Caleb 
McCamber, Joseph Brintnell , Edward 
Young & James Derbyshire were added 
to the Committee. Extracted from the 
minutes Samuel Parsons Clerk Address of an Oneida Chief. 
1 mo. 1819 Part of an address of an Indian Chief of Oneida (named 
Peter the great the second ) to some Friends who had been in 
council with the tribe in regard to the state of things among 
them relating to a civilized life. Brothers--It is impossible for us to express the 
gratitude we feel for the friendship which you have manif- 
ested towards us and for this we raise our hearts and 
hands by way of thanksgiving to Him, who swells in the realms of light 
and glory. The above sentence the interpreter 
took down in writing immediately after it was delivered to 
us, by the above named chief and what follows it from rec- 
ollection. We also feel thankful to the 
great & good spirit for the good counsel you have given us 
as relates to our temporal concerns, which we hope to put 
in practice. We feel more especially thankful for the 
counsel you gave us, when you spoke of the kingdom of 
God, a pure kingdom, your words gladdened our hearts 
we believe with you that there is such a kingdom were 
all the good of all nations will meet together and where no 
wicked will come. We believe with you, one God 
made all nations and wants all to be happy. Brothers, The kindness you and your society have long man- 
ifested to us poor Indians, is remembered with warm hearts 
we look up to you, as our friends, we want our warmest 
respects to be given to our brethren the committee in 
New York and tell them their kindness in leading us, by 
the hand, and the good counsel we have received shall 
not stop here but we shall convey it to the Seneca Nation 
one of their tribe is now with us. It was then asked them 
if they wished the care of the committee continued towards 
them, after a short conference in their own language, the 
Chief replied, We want the committee to know we feel very 
thankful for what they have done, we do not wish to be 
beggars, we have not a conscience to ask for more, yet if they 
see it right to instruct or assist us in any way, for 
good, we shall recieve it with the greatest kindness. 6th mo. 1819. Above two hundred present Address of Stockbridge Indians to N. York Committee 
6mo 1819 Brothers 
The Muhhuonnuk Nation give their salutations 
to their friends, who have taken pains to follow the 
long path, that leads from their fire place hith- 
er Brothers, 
Be it known to you, that we as a Nation 
feel glad, that the great & good Spirit has 
put such love in your hearts as to be willing, 
to take such a long journey to pay us a friendly visit. Brothers, 
When you arrived at our fire place and 
opened your mouth, your words gladened 
our hearts, for which we feel thankful 
to the great & good Spirit. Brothers, 
you have given us many good counsels 
both for our temporal & spiritual good, for 
which we now thank you. We esteen it a great blessing to have 
such fiends as you & your societies are who 
have maintained friendship with not only 
our nation, but different tribes of our col- 
our also. Brothers, 
Be assured that we have swallow'd 
down all your words, and we hope by the help 
of the good Spirit, we may yet be enabled to fol- 
low the good path which you have pointed 
out for us--and we hope you will not be 
discouraged, but exersise patience & continue to lead 
us by the hand longer. Brothers, 
Be it known to you, that many of 
your colour siting around our dish & diping out 
therefrom, and taking all the advantages 
they possibly can of our ignorance, their 
eyes being wide open. Of course therefore 
we stand in very great need of such a character 
as you made mention of to us to sit by us for our 
instruction & may the great Spirit protect you 
through your long journey safe back to your fire place. Farewell Hendrick Aupaumut Jacob Kunkopot Jacob Checkthankuns Abner W. Hendrick Barth. Calvin Solomon U. Hendrick New Stockbridge 
30th June 1819. Signed in behalf of our Tribe. Respected Friend The Brothertown Indians appear to be rather 
improving amongst the young people, Stockbridge 
we know how it is with them fild with white people--
the Oneidas their appears a great disposition to work & 
improve their land especially the south settlement-- 
respecting the Onondagoes concerning the saw Mill 
appears to be fully settled with Ephraim Webster 
he has given it up to the Indians, he did observe he thoug- 
ht they had ought to allow him something. I told him 
as he had got some of their land that the Indians might 
have the saw Mill which he, consented too, & there appears 
as much unity with Webster & the Indians as ever. 
Mary from Stockbridge & her step Father has gone to 
in order to stay this season--which I do most cordially 
unite with, & believe they will be very usefull to them 
I may observe to the that I have been very much 
favoured in getting along this far for all which I 
have great cares to be thankfull for. Onondago 19th of 5th Mo. 1820 Thy Friend Charles Willits To the Committee on Indian affairs at N. York 
 Dear Friends, In compliance with the request of Red Jackit 
one of the chiefs of the six nations of Indians, I have 
undertaken to represent to you the wishes of the indians 
residing at Tontewanda, communicated to me and 
several other friends of Farmington at a conference 
with us the part summer or faul. He stated that for a long 
time he had been strongly opposed to their becoming 
civilized or christianized, but that of late he had become 
convinced, as both fishing and hunting, in that part of the 
country, was nearly at an end, that unless they went to work 
and adopted the habits of civilized life, they must starve 
He stated also that some feint attempts had been made 
both by the indians and families towards their civilization but without much ef- 
fect, and that now it was necessary for both friends & 
indians to be in earnest. As a necessary step towards 
the accomplishment of it he conceived it would be 
proper to establish a school, for the education of their chil- 
dren at or near Tontewanda village. He further stated that from long experience they had 
become convinced that full confidence might be placed 
in the society, and enjoined it on us to make their 
sentiments known. Some time previous to the conference above mentioned 
I went in company with three other friends, to visit the in- 
dians at the abovementioned place, at their particular 
request. From what we observed while there of their regular 
deportment, the improvements they had made, as well as 
the prudent use they have made of the tools that were given 
to them by friends, we were induced to believe that the 
present is a favorable time for friends to lend them 
some assistance. It may be proper to state, that the indians residing 
at Tontewanda, (four hundred and sixty in number) 
say that there are best two or three intemperate persons 
amongst them, and that there is no doubt but it is 
nearly correct. Your Friend. Abraham Lapham Farmington 4th mo 18th 1821 Philadelphia 3d Mo. 23d 1819 Thomas Eddy & Rich. Mott 
Dear Friends Your Letter of 8th Ins. is received and as 
our Committee on Indian Affairs met last week its 
contents were communicated to that body and we were 
desired to answer it--when we invited a conferrence we 
wished it to have taken place before any application 
was made to your Legislature, that the views and intentions 
of each Committee might have been fully understood; our 
field of labour is within the limits of your State and 
whilst your State Legislature permitted those Indians 
under our care to remain quietly subject to the immediate 
direction of the Superintendant appointed by the Executive 
of the United States, our communications were to that 
Department, to which we continue to furnish occasional 
accounts of what has been done and our future prospects, 
and have received encouragement to continue our labours; 
but of late there is a disposition manifest on the part 
of your State to Legislate on the subject, and we feel 
solicitous if any Act is passed it may be such as will 
promote rather than retard their civilization. we 
think if some leading characters in your State were by 
an Act of your Government to have for their neighbours 
a large number of immoral and profligate families and 
were prevented from removing themselves or their children 
to any other part of the State to avoid such contaminating 
example, they would think their case a trying one, and 
is not what is proposed by your House of Assembly to 
induce the several Indian tribes within your State to 
concentrate themselves in some suitable situationto that 
effect--there is much said in the Newspapers of the evil 
conduct of many of the Indians in your State, and should 
they be as bad as represented, it would be improper to 
encourage those who are sober and orderly to receive them 
on their reservations. this is a delicate subject of 
Legislation, but as the Session must now be drawing 
towards a close, we are willing to suggest whether a 
more convenient time for a joint conferrence than 
during the sitting of our Yearly Meeting cannot be agreed 
on, so many Committees meet just previous to the 
Yearly Meeting, and many necessarily between the sitting 
thereof that little time could be allotted to this subject. Such of our friends as feel a concern to attend our 
Yearly Meeting we shall be glad to see, but think this 
subject had better be defer'd to another time. 
Your Affectionate Friends Tho. Stewardson 
Thomas Wistar New York 5th month 31st 1822 Stockbridge, Oneida, Brothertown &c 
To our Brethren of the Onandago Tribes & other 
Indian Nations in the State of New York 
Friends and Brothers We often think of our Indian Brothers 
and feel strong desires that you may under the care 
and direction of the Great and Good Spirit improve 
in Sobriety and Industry. Brothers 
We have often endeavoured to press on your 
minds that if you would be willing to improve 
your situation it would very much promote your 
welfare. We are desirous that some of your young 
men would learn the Blacksmith Business and 
our friend and Brother Adin Correy accompanied 
by his wife being willing to reside amongst you for 
the purpose of instructing some of your young men in 
that Art and such other things as may be usefull, we 
desire you to receive them as our friends and your 
friends and that you will open your ears and listen 
to such advice as they may give you, which we hope 
may tend to brighten the Chain of Friendship between 
you and us, and trust on your parts you will shew 
them all the kindness and attention in your power. Brothers 
We recommend you to the protection 
of the Great Spirit and hope you will remember the 
good advice we have often given you and that you will 
allways believe us your good and faithfull friends. Complaint 
of 
Indians 
to 
Bishop Hobart 
1821 To our Father the Bishop John H Hobert 
Father We have received your communication dated 
at Utica and have taken the advice you therein 
gave us, We have waited the return of Mr. Williams 
but he gives us no satisfaction, We are satisfied that 
he is engaged in the service of a speculating company 
who have for their object the routing of the Indians 
from their plantations. We are able to prove that a 
letter has been seen from the Cashier of the Bank at 
Geneva purporting to be an answer to one sent to 
him by Mr. Williams in which an application had 
been made to draw 250 Dollars in the name of a certain 
Company (which we forbear to name at this time) 
stating that the company would comply with his 
request only on condition of his removing the Indians Father 
We have no disposition to complain unreason- 
ably we wish to do right and we wanted to be treated 
honourably by others and espetially by our Minister 
we have lost our confidence in him we are afraid he 
is not honest We had left in the hands of judge Miller 
& Nathan Williams after building our Meeting house 372 
Dollars out of which we have been furnished with 
a bell for our Meeting house at 154 Doll, including 
transportation and ten Doll. for hanging it, The 
rest of the money Mr. Williams by some means or 
other has obtained without our approbation and 
renders no account for it We had designed that 
money to pay for building our Missionary house 
by Mr. Williams pretended that there was no 
money left and we have had to pay 200 Doll. out of our 
annuity for that Building but we have since aserta- 
ined how the business stands. Father, 
Mr. Williams is taking every measure to 
deceive us to bring us to the Necessity of having 
the Land of our Nativity He has sent a Message 
to Buffalo to state to the Indians there that the Oneida 
 Tribe is preparing to go to Green Bay when we have 
no such intention there are a fiew individuals among 
us and very fiew who are agreed with his plan He 
seems determined to rule the Six Nations but we 
are determined not to be ruled by a man of so much 
intrigue Father, 
We are not a little astonished at the conduct 
of the man you have sent us for a Teacher We had 
no expectation that he would or could use the Oneida 
Nation as he has done but we think we have now 
found him out and all his plans, He is not contented 
in the place where you sent him but he wants to 
rule and have the command of the whole six nations Father 
We wish you to take away this man and give 
us one that is a true Minister of the Gospel we 
dont want a Man that is a speculator for a 
Minister we want a Man that will attend to the 
duties of his holy office and look to good of our 
souls and be content in his station We have no 
design of renouncing our religion we are established 
in the faith, but we want a good Minister to go 
before us, We have many pious old people among 
us whose feelings are much wounded with the cond- 
uct of Mr. Williams they say they never knew an minis- 
ter conduct as he has done before. Father 
We are sory to find that these things have a bad 
affect in the minds of the Indians of other Tribes 
and prejudices them against receiving the Gospel 
They say that they are better off without it than 
we are with it while we are all confusion among 
us they remain in peace Father 
We consider ourselves an independant Nation 
and when we get ready to imigrate we will take 
measures among ourselves to secure a Country where 
we think best, We dont want a man to come 
from some other Tribe to persuade and compel us 
to go where he says is best, we wish to choose for 
ourselves we have the right and no man shall take 
it from us and we consider it an insult for any 
man to attempt such a thing. We think we have 
used Mr. Williams in every respect well, We have 
furnished him with Grain hay and wood besides 
presents in Meat &c eversince he has lived here 
He has also drawn his share in our annuities every 
year and we have given him 150 Acres of Land valued 
at 1500 Doll. and besides all this he receives annualy 
seventy Dollars which is the rent of Lands we have 
let out in Westmoreland which was appropriated by the 
Nation for the suport of the Mission at this place 
The Oneida Nation has always stood like a great Tree 
firmly rooted and with great branches which is not 
to be removed and has always been considered so by the 
General Government, Mr. Williams has complained 
much that he could not live unless we should give him 
more Dollars that the Bishop gave him but little 
But we think if he had been a true chrisian he 
would have been contented Mr. Wlliams told us 
before he started his journey that the Bishop had 
directed him to go and that he would go if he 
had to go through a lake of fire Mr. Williams 
had always told the Nation that they ware not 
worthy to speak to the bishop but we have pres- 
umed to address him as a friend and father Father 
We would come to a close by stating that 
the Chiefs of both parties are assembled and unite in 
this request to you for aid in this time of Trial 
We hope you will give us a gracious hearing and 
relieve your Obedient Children from this burthen of 
Grief of which we complain. Farewell.
 Antony his X mark Obsequate Thomas X Swamp John X Cornelius Hendrick X Smith John X Thompson Moses X Schuyler Moses X Obsequate Thomas X Summer William X Schuyler Martin Dinney Peter his X mark Summer Capt. his X mark Peter Jacob X Otot sait Antony X Ta wa qua cah lock qua Abram X Wat sa tate William X Cornelius Hendrick X Schuyler Nicholas X Cah vat coon ter Jacob X Antony Matinus X White Adam X Scanadoah Jacob X Doxtader Thomas X Webster Signed in the presence 
of Robert Powell Oneida Castle 
 Nov. 12th 1821 To the Society of Friends convened in a 
Yearly meeting in the City of New York & elsewhere. 
The subscribers, being the Society of the 
Females of New Stockbridge send their salutations to you. 
Friends, Brothers & Sisters, In compliance of our most 
fervent desires we come now to fulfil the same & in order 
thereto, we have requested & send our loved friend Mary 
Dostader to transmit it to you. Being deeply im- 
pressed with the sense of our obligation to the Society 
of Friends for many favors conferred on our Tribe, as 
well as the invaluable art of spinning & manufac- 
toring our own clothing taught us, we would more 
(were it in our power) than barely express & 
return you our most hearty and sincere thanks. Each 
year, yea, daily we have great reasons to thank the 
Great & Good Spirit, in that he had, in compassionate 
regard for his poor red children, put it into your hearts 
at the first, to unto us those good things which 
are so admirably calculated to promote our conve- 
nience & happiness here. And, we have the utmost 
assurance they shall never be forgotten but will 
prove the greatest benefit to our latest generations. We would likewise return you our warmest 
thanks for the good counsels you have ever given us. 
Altho we regret to say to you, we have made but 
a feeble progress in the time of Rectitiude & Duty, yet 
we are not discouraged; but are determined to perserve 
--May we ever find and interest in your prayers. We are likewise gratefully sensible for the contin- 
ation of your patronage to our Indian girls. We have 
pleasing anticipations respecting their future usefullness. Our 
prospects are britened by the example of our friend Mary 
who was brought up among Friends. She is a pattern 
to us in all the various branches, of femenine duty 
In short, she is, as a parent constantly overseeing & 
guiding us: & seems to have pure desires for our true 
Interests. We therefore recommend her with that 
confidence, that she will meet that reception among 
every sentiment of respect & esteem your friends & Sisters--Farewell. Lucy her X mark Abrams Sarah her X mark Rhodes Hannah her X mark Konkapot Mary Pye Eunice Abrams Suriey her X Davad Catharine Littleman Hannah her X Schoiakaim Elizabeth ohlkoohquh Eshter Littleman New Stockbridge 
 May 3rd 1822 Our friend Adin T Cory attended the Monthly 
Meeting of Scipio 14th of 11 Mo. 1822 with a certificate 
of removal for himself and wife dated in 9 Mo.. 
He suggested to the Meeting the propriety of allowing 
him the priviledge of holding metings among the 
indians when he felt his mind drawn to it which 
was granted. In an interview with him he informed 
me that they arrived at Onondaga 4 or 5 weeks 
previous--that the principal chief gave up his 
frame house for their use; and that the principal 
men manifested a disposition to promote his views. 
That they had agreed to draw to the Saw-mill this 
winter a sufficient number of logs to erect a 
building of sufficient size for a spinning room, 
a loom room, and a school room. At his request 
I furnished him with eighty Dollars to procure 
blacksmiths tools, Iron and Steel, and a set of 
wheelright tools. He expressed a desire that a suitable 
woman might be employed to instruct the children 
in spelling and reading but I did not feel myself 
authorized to instruct him to procure one until I 
had consulted the visiting committee. Altho authorized to furnish wool to the 
Onondaga tribe, I did not do it, believing that 
it would be of very little use to them, unless some 
person qualified to instruct them resided with them. It appears by Adin's statement that he has completely 
gained the confidence of the indians, which they have 
manifested by consulting him on all important subjects, 
more particularly in relation to purchases and sales, and 
by deposition with him notes of hand for collection. We 
have conclu to promote the cultivation of flax, and 
have engaged seed. I suggested to Adin the propriety 
of proposing to them, the application of a part of their 
annuity to the purchase of sheep, which he approved 
of, and it will accordingly be done. Preparatory 
thereto they will be encouraged to enclose a suitable 
piece of land to afford them pastur'd. Adin 
was impressed with the belief that the onondaga 
tribe possessed 14 yoke of Oxen exclusive of those 
belonging to friends. The old pair of Oxen 
spoken of in last spring's report has been exchanged 
for a young pair, and the difference paid by the 
indians. This tribe possesses a good seat for carding 
machines and a fulling Mill, and it is believed that 
they will be willing to appropriate a part of their 
annuity for their erection when their situation 
may require it. Wm. S Burling 12 Mo 4th 1822 
To the visiting committee 
on the Indian concern PS. The Onondaga's have assured Adin that 
when the present supply of Iron & Steel 
become exhausted, a sufficient portion of their 
annuity shall be applied to the purchase 
of more. Veron 5th Mo. 9th 1824 Beloved Friend Thomas Willis Thy letter of the 12th Mo. Last Duely Come 
to hand and I manely attend to the busy 
ness of the oxen before with the ad 
vice of some friends have sold three od oxen and the 
other I left with metinas Dana for his 
to use with an od ox of his the first I sold 
was a lame ox in the Latter part of the 
10 month 1822 for $20 the other 2 in 11th 1823 
$39 50/100 which is out at use I thought if the 
Committee were willing to Lay out the mon 
ey in sheep and Lone them to some of the 
most prudent of the oneidas for them to have 
the wooll and the in Creas I find a few are 
wishing to keep sheep I dont think it 
best to give to any but only to Lent for one 
or two years as may 
most useful the sober part of the oneida 
tribe oft express there thankfulness for friends 
attention to them there fields and houses 
look incouraging enough to Reward friend for 
there trouble I am sure I feal sadisfyed in 
beleaving our Labour is not Lost Acors Rathbun PS. I have sent $60 to V Hicks From 
Tonawanda 
Tribe To the great council of our white brothers the Quakers 
in New York. Brothers 
We met together with our 
brother in council this evening. We thank the great Spirit 
that we have new together once more. We are going to 
say a few words. Our brother called here last winter-- 
we were sorry we could not talk with him because 
there was no interpreter at that time, and we could not 
hear anything that he wished to say. And afterwards 
when he was gone, we thought we would like to have 
said something if we had had an interpreter. And 
now our brother is come we will say all things. 
It is a number of Years since we have heard from you 
You told us to learn to work every time. We are very 
glad. The great Spirit sent you here to give us this 
good advice. You gave us some tools to work 
with, which has been a great help to us, and our young 
men, warriors, begin to work with them. We divided 
the tools amongst us, and some of them are worn 
our. We tell you the reason why they are worn out, 
because we divided them amongst our Young warriors, 
and that makes them ware out quicker. We are thank 
ful because we think the great Spirit make you a mind 
to give them to us. We think we gain a good deal. We 
know different now from what we used to. Brothers 
We will tell you how many cattle and tools 
we have. We have sixty four Yolk of Oxen--and thirty 
one Ploughs and two drags. We thought Brothers we woud 
tell you how much trouble we have because we have 
not got tools enough. We have to wait for one another 
We have to drag with bushes instead of Drags because so 
many hurry. You very often, when you come our want 
to know how many tools we want. We never say any 
thing--We thought of it--We thought you know all 
about it. This time we thought we would let you know 
what tools we have. If you wish to help us to some more 
we are very glad. Brothers, You often, when you come out here 
told us we had better leave off drinking the bad liquor 
We did very often. We talked with our Young warriors to quit 
they most all did--some wont believe . We hope we 
shall get strength before long. Brothers, You often give us 
good council and advice to keep our land. We united, all 
our nation, to keep this land, and to lay our bones on it 
and our childrens too. Brothers, we look to you! we wish 
you to come and instruct us, because You know our 
darkness. And learn and children to read and till the ground 
and our women to spin and make cloth. We wish if you 
will to take three of our boys and learn them, one to be 
a Blacksmith and two to read and write. We want them 
sent away off. We wish to hear from you. We want to 
know what you think about what we say. John Fopp Blue sky Capt. Jimmy Jimmy Johnson John Luke Chiefs of the 
Seneca 
Indians at 
Tonnewanta Creek Dated at 
Tonnewonta Village 
the 18th of 5th Mo. 1826 Communicated to 
Charles Willis & 
Jesse P. Haines Copies of Letters in relation to Treaty with 
the Seneca Nation, at Buffalo--Red Jacket , &c 
1827 Canandaigua 20th April 1827.
Sir, A copy of Letter to Col. Thomas L. McKinney 
from Joseph Parrish , sub Agent I received some time ago your letter of the 5th inst. covering 
the copy of a Remonstrance of Red Jacket and other Indians of the 
Seneca Nation to Gov. Clinton against the late treaty of Cession 
entered into between the Seneca Nation and the owners of the 
Pre-emptive Right of their Reservations. I would have replied sooner to your communications, but 
the state of my health had been suvh as to feel it out of my 
power to attend to any business until now. I have been acquainted with all the negotiations 
which have taken place for the last Eight or ten years 
between the Proprietors of the Preemptive Right and the Indians 
and have been present at various meetings of the Indians for 
the consideration of the same. The matter was fully and de- 
liberately discussed among the Indians at various Councils; 
and when the treaty was concluded at Buffalo in August last 
it was done with as much unanimity and as much to the 
satisfaction of the influential Chiefs & Nations as any treaty I 
have ever witnessed. It was signed & assented to by every 
chief who was present & by Red Jacket as well as the . He had opposed it, but when at last the terms of the Purchase 
were agreed to, he was not only willing, but insisted on his right 
to put his name to the treaty. Since the treaty was concludid Red 
Jacket urged on by the white people living in the Ficinity of the Reservations 
has started various objections to it and has been doing every thing in his 
power to prevent its going into effect. But this conduct of his is dis- 
approved of by the rest of the Chiefs, who are perfectly satisfied with the 
sale they have made & complain bitterly that Red Jacket should have 
influence enought to interpose any difficulties to the great and respectable 
body of the nation. I received two days ago a communication from the principal 
chiefs of the nation in which they complain very much of the conduct 
of Red Jacket and declare that the statements he makes respecting the late 
treaty are utterly unfounded and that they are determined that it shall 
be carried into effect. As I have stated before, I have been acquainted with all 
the negotiations between the proprietors & the Indians respecting this 
purchase and have no hesitation in saying that it has been conduc- 
ted with perfect fairness, openness and propriety and that it met, & 
ought to have met the approbation of every chief whose opinion and 
influence were of any weight. No threats or menaces or bribes 
were made use of to my knowledge: but as in every case of the kind 
certain gratuities were made after the conclusion of the treaty to the prin- 
cipal chiefs. This is a matter of course in all purchases from the 
Indians as is well known to the United States, and it is Expected 
by the nation that their Chiefs are to receive presents on all such 
occasions. Red Jackets conduct in this business as in almost every other in 
which he now engages is extremely offensive to the other chiefs. And he 
is urged to this opposition by white people who are libing in the 
neighborhood of the Reservations and whose interest is concerned in 
preventing a sale of them. But I am satisfied that Red Jackets 
complaints against the treaty are entirely unfounded and that the 
interest of the Seneca Nation as well as its wishes will be consulted 
in carrying it into Effect. I remain, very respectfully 
Your most obt. humb. servt. 
To Thomas L. McKinney Esq. Canandaigua. July 6th 1827. 
Sir, I received your letter of the 26th ultimo with the 
enclosed memorial from Red Jacket and others on the subject 
of a treaty concluded last summer at Buffaloe between the 
Seneca Nation of Indians and the owners of the preeptive 
right. In answer to it I beg leave to state in addition to 
the enclosed copy of a letter to Col. Thomas McKinney , 
dated the 20th of April last. That soon after Judge 
Forward received his authorization to act as a Commissi- 
oner on the part of the United States at a treaty to be 
held between the Seneca Nation of indians and the 
owner of the preemptive right, he appointed the 11th 
day of september as the day for holding the same. 
That five days thereafter I arrived at Buffaloe for 
the purpose of making a distribution of the auunity in 
goods from the U. States to the Indians, agreeably to 
an appointment which I had made with the chiefs 
of the Seneca Nation to meet them on the 15th of 
September previously to the making of the aforesaid 
appointment by Judge Forward . That previous going 
to Buffaloe I was particularly requested by the proprietors 
of the pre-emptive right at the of Judge Forward , 
not to be present at, or interfere with the depending nego- 
tiation--to which I replied that, having made an appoint- 
ment to meet the Indians for the purpose above mentioned, 
I must be there until 15th. That after arriving at Buffaloe for the purpose of 
making the distribution of goods, I was requested by 
John Greig , dsg. agent for the proprietors to remain 
during the negotiation, in order to see that the Indians 
perfectfully understood the interpretations made by the 
persons employed by the said proprietors and then acting 
as Interpreters, namely Horatio James , Gillis Clute & 
Jacob Jamison , and that accordingly I was present at all 
the public councils held thereafter until the conclusion 
of the treaty. That during the negotiation I had no private 
conversations with the Indians and did not know of 
any promises or being made to any of the 
Chiefs. That the Charge contained in the memorial 
of Red Jacket , that I told the Indians if they did 
not sell, it would be a serious thing to them is utterly 
and absolutely false. That finally I am fully persuaded 
that the dissatisfaction of Red Jacket and others in 
regard to the said sale of their lands arises from 
the interference of white people residing in the 
neighborhood; who fron interested motives would wish 
to have the treaty set aside, are desirous for the 
same reason, to get me out of the office of sub- 
agent. I have the honor to be 
&c &c signed Jasper Parrish 
sub agent 
Hon. James Barbour 
Sec. of War. Letters in relation to the Treaty Department of War, 
Off: Ind: Affaires, 
14th August 1827. 
Gentlemen, I have the honor, by direction of the 
Secretary of War, to acknowledge the receipt 
of your letter of the 8th instant, enclosing a com- 
munication from Mess. Parsons and Hicks , rela- 
tive to the proceedings at the late treaty with the 
Seneca Indians in New York. The treaty referred to was held with the appro- 
bation of the Department, and Judge Forward was duly 
authorized to attend it, on the part of the Government, 
and the Secretary directs me to enclose to you for 
your information, the enclosed copies of letters received 
from Judge Forward and Capt. Parrish , the sub Indian 
agent, which, it is believed, contain a correct statement 
of the proceedings at said treaty, and afford a satis- 
factory vindication of their fairness. I have the honor to be, 
Your Mo. Obd. Serv. Sam. S. Hamilton . 
To Mess. 
P. E. Thomas 
Tho. Ellicott 
Balt. Buffalo, January 30th 1827 To the President of the 
United States. Sir, On the thirty first day of August last, 
a treaty was concluded between the Seneca nation of Indians, 
and the proprietors of the preemptive right, to their reservations 
of land within the state of New York. One copy was made 
for the United States, one for the state of Massachusetts, one 
for the proprietors, and one for the Chiefs of the Senecas; 
all of which were lodged with me as escrows, to take effect 
and to be delivered, as soon as the grantees should secure 
in the public stocks or funds of the United States, an 
annual annuity or income, of two thousand five hundred 
and eighty three dollars, to and for the benefit of the said 
Seneca Nation of Indians. I am now informed by the agents or trustees of the proprie- 
tors, that they are prepared to carry the treaty into effect, 
and to that end, I have been requested to forward you a 
copy thereof, which I have the honor herewith to 
enclose. The treaty was attended and executed by all the 
principal, and even minor chiefs of the tribe, 
with the exception of one or two, who were absent at 
the time. Dr. Jacob Jimeson , an educated native, 
also a young man of great worth, and of highly respecta- 
ble literary attainments, officiated as principal inter- 
preter, and was employed by me as such, in consequence 
of the perfect knowledge which he possessed of the English, 
as well as his native language. The proposals made by 
the agent of the proprietors, to the Chiefs in council, 
were fully explained to them; and they were distinctly ad- 
vised by me, that if a sale was made, it must be a 
voluntary act on their part, as they were at perfect liberty, 
to sell their lands or to retain them, as they should 
under the circumstances think expedient and proper. Red Jacket , opposed the sale, of any of the Indian 
lands, from commencement of the negotiation. There- 
fore, after the treaty was committed to writing, and 
ready to be executed, he was advised by me, that 
if on mature reflection, his opinion should remain 
unchanged, he ought not to sign it, as his name 
and seal would be evidence of approbation, and 
could not be contradicted. It was there read, 
article by article, in presence of myself, W. N. 
Gosham, superintendent on the part of Massachu- 
setts. Horatio Jones , interpreter, Jasper Parrish , agents, 
and interpreted by Dr. Jimeson , by whom no part of 
it could have been misunderstood. Having been 
there read, explained, and declared to be satisfactory, 
it was executed by every one of the chiefs present. Having understood that Red Jacket , together 
with a number of the Tonewanta Indians (most of 
whom are not Chiefs) had procured a remonstrance 
to be drawn at Butavia, a village about forty 
miles East of this place; which remonstrance 
they had signed, and caused to be forwarded to 
the seat of Government, I thought it my duty thus 
briefly to state the facts in relation to the treaty, 
and in which every person present will fully con- 
cur. I was aware at the time, that a few of the 
Indians who were scattered over the small reservations 
upon the Genesee river, and a part of the Tonnewan- 
tas, were opposed to the proceeding; but they compose 
a very small proportion of the tribe, and have very 
little weight in its councils. As it regards these 
people, I am satisfied the sale is a beneficial 
one, and believe the stipulated annuity, equal to 
the fair value of the lands sold, including the 
amount paid for the preemption right. I beg to be 
advised of the receipt of the treaty, and of the 
fulfilment of the Conditions thereof, on the part 
of the grantees. I have the honor &. 
(signed)Oliver Forward .Commissioner. Copy Buffalo July 20th 1827 
Sir, I had the honor of receiving from 
Sam. S. Hamilton Esquire, enclosed by your order, 
the memorial of Red Jacket and others, complaining 
of the proceedings at the late Treaty with the Seneca Indians, 
to which tribe I presume all of the signers belong. The memorial purports to have been 
made and signed at the Council House of the nation; 
but there has been no council at that place for such 
purpose. Red Jacket however, did as I am informed, 
assemble his adherents upon the Tennewanta reser- 
vation, to advise upon the subject of (breaking up as 
he termed it) the treaty. The memorial might 
have been made and signed at that time; but I 
strongly suspect it was subsequently done at the Village 
of Balania. Who the author was I am at a loss to con- 
jecture. It could not have been Mr. Adams , in 
whose presence it appears to have been signed, because 
he is a man of very moderate literary attainments, 
much less indeed than the grammar & orthography of 
the production disclosed. There are but few of the signers who 
are known to me as chiefs; and all of them must have 
been grossly imposed upon, by some designing villian, 
with a view to embarrass the executive, as well as to harrass 
and injure the proprietors. In addition to this, it must 
have been done by some person totally ignorant of the 
Indians, or destitute of all regard for veracity, if an 
opinion in that respect can be formed from the ab- 
surdity of the statements which were made. It will 
be seen from the memorial, that 2606 are opposed to 
the Treaty--430 in favor of it--3036 in all, who must 
be at least old enough, to express an opinion as to 
the advantages and disadvantages resulting from the 
sale of their lands, when in truth, the whole seneca 
nation does not number 3000 souls. In regard to the language imputed 
to me, I can only say, it was never used, now did I 
ever hold a private conversation with Red Jacket upon 
the subject of the Treaty, as stated by him: but a 
short time previous to the assemblage of the Chiefs, I 
did something in the manner set forth, decline an interview 
for reasons obvious to every one, who knows the man as 
well as I do. No threats were used to induce a sale, 
nor did Mr. Greig intimate a wish or expectiation of 
purchasing, but by the voluntary consent of the chiefs, 
who were distinctly informed, and well understood, that 
the Government would protect them in their possessions. 
They had no apprehension of an ultimate failure of 
that protection, nor was there on the part of Mr. Greig , 
the remotest insinuation, that coercive measures would 
be resulted to. I heard none of the expressions alledged 
to have been made by Mess. Parrish Jones & Clute , and 
my implicit belief is, the charges against them have 
no foundation in truth. Doc. Jamieson , an educated native 
of great respectability attended the treaty, and was employ- 
ed by me as an interpreter. He is now at Green 
Bay with a number of the Seneca Chiefs, and will 
probably attend the treaty, to be held by Governor 
Cass in the vicinity of that place. Soon as he 
returns, you will be more fully informed, relative 
to the complaints of Red Jacket and his associates. 
As to the charge of bribery, I know nothing, nor do 
I beleive a word of it. Small annuities might have been 
allowed the principal chiefs; but the payment of such 
gratuities, I believe has been practised under every 
treaty with Indian tribes of this state, since the organ- 
ization of its government. It is a subject well un- 
derstood by them, and no chief has participated so 
extensively in such largesses, as Red Jacket himself. 
Allowances here may have been stipulated, as there were 
at the Treaty of 1797, butMr. Greig as a man of the 
most unquestionable integrity; and I speak with 
great confidence when I say, he sooned have spurned 
the idea of offering a dollar to Red Jacket or to any 
other Chief, in the shape of a bribe: and I trust it 
will not for a moment be believed, that money 
was solicited at his hands, or proffered by him as 
the wages of corruption. It is true, that Red Jacket was 
opposed 
opposed to the sale of the Indian Lands, and every part 
of them; and it is equally true, that he finally assented 
to the sale, and is among those who executed the deed 
of cession. My letter of the 30th of January last, 
which accompanied the treaty transmitted to the President, 
explains the course taken, to insure a thorough knowledge 
of its contents, on part of the chiefs, and to that I refer 
you for information. Upon the whole subject, there 
was great unanimity of sentiment among the chiefs-- 
The proceedings were frank, open, fair and satisfactory to 
the contracting parties. The Indians have in good faith, 
quietly and readily fulfilled the terms of their contract, 
so far as they have been called upon to act; & notwithstanding 
in their memorial, they are made to utter murmers loud and deep, to sanction falshoods of the most 
extraordinary character, and to express a most decided 
determination not, to receive the pay for their lands, 
yet when the agent came to settle the annuities of the 
nation, all were received without difficulty or complaint. Indian settlements surrounded by a 
white population, like those in the state of New York, 
are always annoyed by the very dregs of civilized 
society, who are often found hanging upon the skirts 
of the chiefs, and in some instances, are the associates 
of the most abandoned of that unfortunate people. 
From considerations of gain, others more respectable 
are induced, to excite their jealousies and awaken 
their apprehensions, by misrepresenting the objects of 
the Government, as well as the conduct of its agents. They advise councils, write Indian- 
talks or speeches for them, which seldom, if ever 
fail of betraying the feelings and vicios of the author. Had there been no such men, the 
memorial in question would never have been 
heard of, not the statements it contains have been 
fabricated. I have the honor to be 
Sir, with very great 
respect Your Obt. Serv. 
Signed, Oliver Forward 
Hon: James Barbour . REPORT ON INDIAN CONCERNS, 
Submitted at Ohio Yearly Meeting, held at Mt. Pleasant, on 7th of 9th mo. 1837. The Committee on Indian Concerns report, that, at their 
concluding sitting, at the time of our last Yearly Meeting, 
they appointed a committee to attend and sit with the Com- 
mittee of Indians, at the time of their approaching Yearly 
Meeting; and by a copy of the minutes of that Committee, 
and the report of our friends who attended, it appears that 
the Committees of the several Yearly Meetings are harmo- 
niously united in the prosecution of the benevolent object. 
An interesting account of the proceedings of the Committee 
of Indiana since last year, has been lately received--and in 
order that the most material parts of their communication 
may be spread before the Yearly Meeting, the following 
extracts are made from it, viz. Early in the spring of the present year, we received an 
account of the donation of Dr. Unthank having been receiv- 
ed by our Agent in Cincinnati, and on the receipt of which 
information, we immediately proceed to purchase house- 
hold and kitchen furniture, farming utensils, a quantity of 
provisions, &c. in order to enable us to carry into execution 
the plan of operations agreed upon. We also employed a 
family, Moses Pearson and wife, Friends, as Superintend- 
ents, and employed a young woman (a Friend) to assist in 
the family. By the report of a deputation who recently 
visisted the Indians, you will observe that a young man (a 
Friend) has been employed as a Teacher for a time: and 
we have a Committee appointed to employ another teacher 
to be in readiness to take his place, when the time for which 
he has engaged shall have expired. Our deputation to visit 
the Indians, made the following report, together with a letter 
received form our Superintendent since their return. The 
Report is as follows, viz. We have attended to the appoint- 
ment, and agree to report, that on arriving at the intended 
establishment, we found that Moses Pearson and family had 
been there about five days, were all well, but in an uncom- 
fortable situation in consequence of the house not being 
, and the goods that had been shipped not having 
then come to hand. The Superintendent had purchased about 
five acres of corn, and theg were busily engaged in working 
amongst it. We engaged Elias Newby (a Friend) as 
Teacher, &c. for the term of four months, at twenty four 
dollars per month--and if his relations approved of his re- 
maining until next Spring, he was to stay and receive twen- 
ty dollars per month. Owing to the situation of the house 
and family, we thought it best not to convene the Indians 
in council there; but we had an interview with them at 
their Council House, in presence of the Agent, who had a 
considerable number of them collected on business. They 
appeared much pleased with the opportunity of meeting 
with us; they generally looked well, spoke highly of their 
country, and from what we could learn from seeing many
of their farms, and the information received otherwise, we 
conclude that they are in a much better way of living than 
they were in Ohio. They appeared much more sensible 
of the advantages of civilization, and many of them mani- 
fest a disposition to excel their neighbors in agriculture.-- 
On conferring with them respecting a school, they appeared 
to be much pleased, and said they would furnish as many 
children as we wanted, when the house and teacher were 
ready to receive them. There are two missionaries amongst them--a Methodist 
and a Baptist. It might probably be interesting to the committee, to be 
informed of the cause of the Indians being convened by the 
agent; which was, to lay before them a proposition from 
the Government, the substance of which was, that govern- 
ment was willing, with their approbation, to lay off a large 
tract of country sufficient to contain a number of Nations 
of Indians, and to give them a warrantee deed for the same, 
(describing the boundaries)--that said tract of country 
should be known by the title of Indians' Country--that no 
white man should have any right within the said bounda- 
ries, except his business was sanctioned be government--
that the Indians should have the privilege of making their own 
laws (recommending some laws which it was thought best 
for them to enact)--that government would be at the ex- 
pense of building them a good substantial council house-- 
that each nation should send one or more of their number, 
yearly, to said house, there to confer on such subjects as they 
may be interested in--that they should annually elect one of 
their number to congress, there to remain during the ses- 
sion, to represent the whole of the nations residing in their 
country--that government would pay all expenses in going 
to, while remaining at, and returning from, the seat of gov- 
ernment. The Agent informed us the proposition had 
been submitted to several nations, and that they had agreed 
to them without hesitation, although the Shawnese did not 
accede to the propositions at that time, but set a time when 
they would give him an answer. On our parting with John Perry , the head chief, he spoke 
as follows, viz.: When you get home, tell my Friends, 
the Quakers, that I am their friend, and shall be as long as
I live, and when I am laid in the ground, I hope my chil- 
dren will be your friends. When we lived in Ohil, where 
we could get game, I thought not worth the while to send my 
children to school, and I sent none; but now we live where 
we cannot get game, I want my children to go to school, 
and learn to work too. The following is an extract of the letter alluded to from 
the Superintendent of the establishment, dated 12th of 7th 
last, viz.: We attended the council of the Shawnese to- 
day, and they have answered the Agent, and informed him 
that, after deliberating on the subjects laid before them, 
they were willing the propositions should be put exe- 
cution as soon as practicable, and they have signed an a- 
greement to that effect to go before conress. The Shaw- 
nese also states, while in the council, that they had confer- 
red together respecting the two Missionaries that are with 
them--that they had come to the conclusion to info 
them that they knew the Quakers were their friends-- 
when they went to move away from amongst them, they 
left all, and took nothing away with them; and this they 
knew that they were friends, and that the Quakers 
had sent on their Teachers (pointing at Elias Newby and 
myself) to learn their children, and that they wished THEM 
to learn their children--that they wished (one of the Mis- 
sionaries mentioned) to move his mission out amongst another 
tribe of Indians; and the other, to move his mission some- 
where else. They seem to put full confidence in friends doing 
all they stand in need of in the way of Education. My 
feelings are easier conceived than described, when I con- 
sider the limited situation of our funds, the confidence the 
Indians have in us, and the backward situation of our school, 
and that they are dismissing the Missionaries to make way 
for us. Several of the Indians have spoken to me, to know 
how soon the school will commence, and appear anxious 
how soon. In taking into consideration the peculiarly in- 
teresting state of the concern at present, by which it ap- 
pears that the objects of our concern are in a prosperous 
condition as regards their agricultural pursuits--that they 
are so anxious to have their children educated by Friends, 
that they have dismissed the Missionaries to make way 
for us--and having been, at this time, made remewedly sen- 
sible of the obligations resting upon us, not only to instruct 
them in the truths of the Chrisitan Religion, but also to 
give them assistance in literary and agricultural pursuits; 
the Committee, under a solemn consideration of the sub- 
ject, unite in proposing to the Yearly Meeting, that liberal 
contributions in aid of the funds be entered into, in order to 
enable us to carry on this interesting and benevolent work, 
with a hope that a blessing will attend our labours therein. Signed on behalf of the Committee. 
JONAH HOLE , Clerk. 9th Mo., 7th, 1837.
 observing that you feel a clear inter- 
est in the welfare of the Indian natives 
I have copied the epistle on the report of 
our Comm. which can readily be separated 
before presenting to the meeting! If your field of New York 3th Mo 22. 1837 My Dear friend 
Elijah Coffin In our Meeting for Sufferings recently 
held in this City a concern arose in relation to the 
poor oppressed Indians of our Country. The result of which 
was the appointing a Committee of inquiry into their situation, and to report 
at our next Mtg. how Friends of our Yearly Meeting 
can be of service to them, and particularly those west 
of the Mississippi, being one of that Committee, I 
was requested to ask thee for such information as 
is in thy power to give, in consequence of the seperation 
the funds set apart for the ameleration of the Indian 
Tribes fell into the hands of the , and from 
that time our Yearly Mtg has done nothing for them those 
who was formerly under their care in this State 
some has removed to the far West, and the re= 
mainder seems to be dwindled down to a very few The following queries I want answered as full as 
is in thy power with the assistance of any other friend 
or friends thee thinks proper to consult What is the present situation of the Indian Tribes 
West of the River Mississippi under the care of friends Are any of the other Tribes there cared for by Christian 
Societies or by Missionaries 
 Do friends cooperate with the Agents of the general 
Government for the civilization and instruction of the 
Indians has the Government any objections to agents from 
our Society residing among the Indians in the capacity 
of instructors and overseers Could friends render the Indians more service 
by a coopporation with you, than by acting apart or
by their own Agents What other Tribes than those west of the 
Mississipi can Friends render assistance, and if any 
where are they situated What good in thy opinion would result 
from a combined effort of the Yearly Meetings, in 
this concern, by appointing agents to reside among 
the Indians, or otherwise as might be thought most 
advisable We shall be obliged for any other information thee have 
it in thy power to communicate Can thee send me a copy of the Map which thee 
shewd me, when I was in Richmond, shewing the location 
of the Indians, shewing also those under the care of 
Friends, I presume thee can draw it on a part of 
the Letter--should like to have the report of the 
committee on Indian Affairs of your Yearly Meeting 
I think it was publishd with the proceedings of 
the Meeting Correspondence with Indiana respecting Indians west of 
the Mississippi--1837 Richmond, Ind. 10th Mo. 13th 1837. John R. Willis 
Dear friend Thy letter of 4 mo. 19 was received in due 
time, and several Friends were consulted on the subjects 
of it. Wishing however to have the matter more fully inves- 
tigated previous to an answer being made, a delay until 6 mo. 
1. was concluded on, about which time our meeting for 
suffering met. I was sick at the time, and sent the letter 
to the meeting; it was mislaid among the members; and 
I was totally at a loss about it until the late meeting 
(a few days past) when I found the letter again. I hope 
this may explain to thee the cause of the vexatious delay. The Indian concern is one of deep interest, and I look 
upon it that much good can be done to this people, by 
the right kind of labours from Friends. No people as 
I think possess the confidence of the Indians to the 
same extent as Friends; and so far as Friends have 
kept themselves apart from the heat of party politics, 
none, as I believe, could have greater influence with 
the Govenment in this matter. The Government has 
been kind to our people, and has shown a decided dis- 
position to countenance their efforts. Secretary , 
of the War Department, in particular. The Commissioners 
and other agents of the Government are frequently 
corrupt; and seem to feel themselves set up to get the 
best bargain out to their people (the Indians) that they 
can, too little regarding, in many cases, as I fear, that 
some Christian principles of doing as they would be done 
unto. The question of the removing of the Indians to the far 
west, is one of a very interesting nature. Located in the 
middle of the organised states, they are thrown into continual 
collisions with the surrounding inhabitants, and mutual animosities 
are apt to exist between them. Petitions are raised by the whites 
to have the Indians bought out Government is solicited 
by individuals and by the state legislaters, which is guided by the 
people; State laws are extended over their country by a right 
common to the State Governments, which it is believed the Gen. 
Gov. is bound to maintain. Comm. are appt. to treat with 
the Indians for purchase, &c. &c. till they must yeild. 
All this is an instigation of the people, not a disposition 
of the Gov. originally, until they are under necessity to notice the 
subject from the people. The Gov. being bound in treaties 
to the Indians for their protection, finds itself in difficulties 
and hence the scheme for inducing the Indians to remove 
out of the chatred limits of any state--with a promise 
that their territoy beyond the Mississippi shall never more 
be included in the bounds of any state, but secured to them 
as an undisturbed possission. The map which thou 
mentions in thy letter, and a copy of which I will send thee 
herewith will show thee what progress the Gov. has made 
in their western locations &c. &c. Thou wilt see that the 
territory of the Shawanese is but a small one, compared with 
the mighty west--indeed the tribe is small--say only 
about 1200. On this small tribe the whole forces of 
the philanthropy of Baltimore, Ohio, and Indiana Yearly 
meetings is alone exercised, so far as it concerns Indians. 
Just cast they eye over the map, and see the mighty field 
for labour. We have in the heart of our state a tribe 
of Miami Indians, about 2000 strong--with Friends near 
there or several sides--towards there, it is my opinion that we 
should extend some attention. I answer thy inquiries. 1st In answer to this, I send thee a periodical called 
 Annual Registrar--a work of much information. 2nd The Tribes mostly have missionaries with them. 3rd Friends carry on their operation by permission of the Gov. 
and perhaps it may be said with the co-operation of the Agent 
to a certain extent. They certainly might carry on their operations with 
the co-operation of the Gov. 4. I believe not. 5. So far as our operations are extended, your money would be 
very useful to us--but we apprehend that you could personally 
render us very little assistance. 6. I think there are, several. The Miamis in particular. 7. A combined effort of the Yearly Meetings might be 
productive of much more good, as it would add so much 
strength to the concern--and put those who might be the 
immediate agents of the work in so much more means 
for extending their usefulness. The project of having a kind of general Agent, a 
member of our society, might not be a bad one--but the contrary 
one thing, however--we must suppose the Gov. has confidence 
in it present Agents, therefore it might not be proper for us 
to insinuate much distrust in them, or assume to oversee them, 
but we should render ourselves odious, and have the opposition 
of all. It would, I think be better to enter the field as 
Assistants in the great work of Christianization, and then do 
good as way might open. In love thy friend,Elijah Coffin Will send thee a copy of our Minutes, including Indian Report, as soon as printed. Letter from N. Carolina respecting Indians west of Mississippi--1838 The Epistle received from New York requests that friends 
on this Continent, should come to a joint action, in rendering 
Counsel Protection and Assistance, to the Indian tribes West of 
the Mississippi, and informs, that Mahlon Day is the clerk 
of their committee, with whom we may correspond upon the 
subject. Nathan Mendenhall and Abel Coffin are appointed 
to correspond on behalf of this meeting and report the result 
of their information to next yearly meeting Extracted from the minutes of the yearly meeting of 
friends in North-Carolina the 16th 11 mo 1838
By Nathan Mendenhall clerk 
this year Near James Town Guilford Country N.C. 
Highly Esteemed Stranger 
Mahlon Day We desire any information within thy reach on 
the foregoing, important Subject, there is nothing in our 
possission worthy of communicating, but we doubt assistance 
will not be rendered in due season, or in other words, so soon as 
need, pressing need requires, particularly the Cherokee tribes 
a part of whom, it is said, went from the western part of this state. We wish to be speedily informed if there are Agents or 
trustees, for friends, in any of the Western States, who could 
receive cash and purchase blankets and provisions and forward the 
same by Steamboat, or otherwise, so that such materials can 
be put to the uses intended, however it should be understood 
that we have nothing at our command, yet if need be, we 
think, we could call our meeting for sufferings together for 
the purpose Thy friends Nathan Mendenhall 
Abel Coffin 
(Copy) PS. Our Yearly Meeting was held from the 5th to the 
9th of the 11th month inclusive 1838 Remonstrance of the Chiefs in regard to their removal to the West From the Six Nations. 10 mo 2. 1837 
To the President of the United States We the undersigned Sachems, Chiefs, and Chief Warriors 
of the Six Nations assembled in Council at the Council 
house on Buffalo Creek Reservation in the State of New 
York, Present the following Communication for the 
purpose of saying to our Father the President, That 
I.J.Schermerhorn United States Commissioner, having 
been appointed to remove the New York Indians to the 
West; In July last he passed through all the settle- 
ments of the Six Nations and took with him some of 
our men of his own selection, for the purpose of forming 
An exploring party to the West. This was his own 
delegation and not ours. We consider this an unlawful 
and improper exercise of authority which strikes at the very 
fundamental principles of our laws and treaties. We 
cannot therefore recognize persons so selected as regular 
appointed delegates. Father--We will now explain to you our minds on 
the subject. We have not any desire of again exploring 
the Western Country. The repetition can confer on us 
no benefit inasmuch as we have still the same de- 
termination to remain upon the premises which we now 
hold in the State of New York Father--We have concluded a treaty of peace more than forty 
years ago, which we still adhere to for our guide. In 
that treaty we have mutually stipulated that all our 
national transactions should be performed in open Council. 
This stipulation was agreed to by the parties mutually. 
In that Treaty all secret meetings to transact national 
business are forbidden. Father In that Treaty we agreed that no compulsion should 
be used by either of the parties. But now I.J. Schermerhorn 
has already used as it were force in taking our men to the 
West clandestinely. Furthermore we believe that comm- 
unications have been dispatched to you purporting to be the 
voice of the Six Nations, but which in reality have not been 
acted upon in our Councils. Father-- We sincerely hope that all such (if any there may be) 
may not be considered or treated as the sentiments of the Six 
Nations. We will now acquaint you with our views res- 
pecting the removal of our people west of the Mississippi 
We have resolved to adhere to our present locations to remain 
and lay our bones by the side of our forefathers. We believe we can continue at home and be at 
peace with our neighbours. We have disposed of our lands 
again and again until our seats are reduced so that they 
are now but just sufficient for our children to live on. 
We are now surrounded on every side by the White People. 
We love them and suffer no inconvenience from them; but 
on the Contrary, we desire from them great and permanent 
assistance. They are kind and generous hearted people, 
they treat us kindly. We believe that we have fulfilled our obligations to each other 
and to the treaty of Peace and Friendship which we made. 
We have been born and educated in the same land, we have 
grown up together in brotherly love; We have acquired a 
knowledge of the arts of civilization and of agriculture in a 
great measure from them: We have now many amongst us 
who have built large barns, and who have good waggons 
and other useful implements of agriculture. We have also 
built school and Council houses and convenient Churches: 
We have several saw mills and a grain mill amongst us. 
Our people have made rapid advances already and are still 
progressing in wealth and industry. The moral condition of our people has been visibly 
improving beyond our expectation for the last forty years: 
True we have also immoral and imprincipled men amongst 
us: But this is common with all nations. There is therefore 
no sufficient reason for the whole nation to be removed 
on their account. Father--One more, We have heard your liberal offers 
in connection with your instructions to your agent read 
to us by Judge Stryker . We have understood them well. 
But with all the light thus thrown upon the subject we cannot 
see sufficient reasons for accepting them. We believe that 
our comforts here are better than the Western territory can 
offer us. We know that from the sincerity of their hearts 
our people do not wish to accept, and it would be heart 
rending for us and our people to be induced to do so con- 
trary to our voices and feelings. Father We have been repeatedly assured by all the Presidents 
and even by your predecessor, that the right of choice 
should be left entirely free. That we may go or stay 
as we choose. We believe our new father will follow 
the steps of the wide and good Presidents who have gone 
before: We suppose that the people have elected a good 
and philanthropic man for their chief magistrated 
We therefore hope sincerely, that you will suffer no improper 
means to be used for seducing our people to acquiesee 
in the proposition made by our agent. Father, Permit us now in closind this letter to commend 
your health and soundness of spirit to the care of the great 
Spirit of Heaven. Done in general Council of the 
Six Nations on Buffalo Creek reservation this 2nd day 
of October 1837. In presence of 
Jonathan Hoyt Judge of the county of Erie N.Y.
Moses Bristol M.D. of the city of Buffalo 
Elisha Baker Friends (Hamburgh) 
Charles Meatyard Friends (Hamburgh) 
Elisha D. Baker Friends (Hamburgh) 
Asher Wright (Reverend Missionary) 
 Chiefs Big Kettle Seneca White Gov. Blacksnake Ja. Robinson Jemmy Johnson Black Chief Blue Sky Tunis Halftown Charles O'Beal Jacob Blacksnake Henry Two Guns Wm. Grouse Doxtader Sky Carrier Jacob Bennett Joel Hemlock Paul Two Guns Young Chief Jack Snow John Seneca Sky Pierce James Shongo George Kilbuck Jack Berry Maris B Pierce Joe Snow Oliver Silverheels Walter Thompson Chiefs Isaac Davis George Dennis Geo Silverheels Tho. Runner Jacob Johnson Black Smith John Sky Jesse Spring James Williams John Luke Big Fire George Washington Sam'l Wilson George Lindsay John Tall Chief Mock Charles John General John Bark George Rendiquadit Geo White David White William Gass William Jones John Luke of B Moses Doxtator John Possum Dan'l Sky Geo. Moses Onondago Chiefs Capt Handaga Capt Gold Capt Frost Capt Honnes Onondaga Peter Button George Oneida Chiefs Peter Sumner Jacob Anthony Elijah Williams Moses Schuylar Augustus Cornelius Peter Williams Cayuga Joseph Isaacs Jack Wheelbarrow Asher Wright , the Missionary named in annexed Address to 
the President, died at Buffalo early in 1875--the following 
notice appeared in one of the Newspapers in relation to him. 
Wm. Woods 
8 mo 1875 At the funeral of the Rev. Dr. Asher Wright , a 
venerable missionary among the Seneca Indians, 
who died recently at Buffalo, six of the Seneca 
tribe officiated as pall-bearers, and as the coffin 
was borne up the aisle of the mission church 
they sang a low chant in the Seneca tongue. T. Evans on behalf of Philadelphia Committee 
in relation to removal of Indians 
west of the Mississippi Philad. 2nd Mo. 23. 1838 My dear frd, We yesterday Rec. a letter from 
a number of the chiefs of the Indians Settled on 
the Allegheny Reservation in your State, inform- 
ing that Schemerhorn U.S. agent had been there 
& held a council in which he told them they must 
sell their lands & remove to the West of the Mis- 
sissippi--that the U.S. government was resolved 
to remove them from where they now were--that 
every chief who would influenced 100 persons to agree 
to go, should receive $500 dollars premium, & 
that the government had resolved to stop their 
annuity until they removed westward--that 
those who removed would receive the annuity
but those who did not would get nothing. Aided by the Ogden Company he used 
every exertion to prevail on them to assent to 
the measure, & after having occupied nearly 
the whole time of the Council for 8 days, he 
requested an answer. The chiefs & head men were 
generally determined on staying & told him so. 
He then came into Council--Said the business 
was finished--you have sold all your claimed 
in this State--Here is the treaty made & written 
before you, and are all you have to do is to Sign 
it. He then laid the Treaty on the table & 
called on the chiefs to sign it. The Senecas 
then laid on the table a remonstrance they 
had prepared against his proceedings and 62 
of their chiefs signed it--23 of them who 
were in favour of emigration Signed the treaty 
The commissioner Staid two or three days 
afterward at a tavern, & with the agents of 
the Ogden Co. bribed others to Sign or got 
them drunk & then induced them to do so. 
The Senecas have determined to carry 
their remonstrance to Washington & John 
Robinson, one of the Chiefs is expected here 
soon on his way thither to present it, It 
is signed by 92 Warriors & head men repres- 
enting 700 souls. It is likely our Indian 
Committee will also present a memorial, by a 
deputation, and we have thought that a 
memorial from your Indian Comm. or Mtg for 
Sufferings might be of mere avail as coming 
from Citizens of the State where the Indians 
are & also their reservations. The Oneidas 
Onondagoes, & other tribes in N. York and all 
embraced in the treaty &are all to be 
removed as well as Senecas. Tho'I 
have no prospect that the presenta- 
tion of animials will have any 
beneficial effect yet it seems to me 
as it will probably be the last opportu- 
nity we ought once more to lift up our 
voices to testify against the robbery and 
oppression of this afflicted & presented people. 
Our Comm. meet early next week to 
deliberate on the measue & we should then 
decide probably as to the course. Mean- 
while I was desired to write to thee & Com- 
municate these facts & glad should I be if 
you join us in Memorializing. Please let me hear of your prospects. 
With much love & near sympathy 
in thy many trials I am thy truly 
attached & affectionate frd Tho. Evans 
S. Parsons. Baltimore Committee on Indian affairs--Shawanese tribe, &c. 
Address from Indians to their old Friends, the Quakers of Philadel. To the Committee on Indian Concerns of 
New York Yearly Meeting 
Dear Friends A report & minute of your last yearly 
Meeting on the subject of Indian Concerns, having 
been received by us, has claimed our notice 
and consideration. We are glad to perceive a manifestation 
on your part of Strong interest in the present 
condition and future prospects of the much 
wronged Aborigines of our country. We believe 
them to be prominent and peculiar objects for 
our sympathy and help, and desire that friends 
every where may be strengthened in the pursuance 
of such measures for them assistance and Improve- 
ment as true wisdom may unfold, ever remem- 
bering that to relieve the oppressed is no less a 
part of that charity which is kind,than to 
judge the fatherless and to plead for the widow. We are however detered from joining you in 
your Special concern, as developed in the report 
above alluded to--our hands being full with the 
engagement which we are now carrying on in 
conjunction with Ohio & Indiana Yearly Meetings 
for the civilization and christian Instruction 
of the Shawnese tribe. This engagement has 
been one of long standing--has recapioned much 
spenditure of money and been the subject of 
much pains. We are anxious to continue its 
prosecution still further and in order to do this 
we shall have demands upon us for all the 
funds that are likely to be placed at our dis- 
posal devoted to purposes of this kind. referring you 
to the last paragraph of our Communication addressed to you in the third month last we are your friends Signed on behalf of the committee of Indian 
concerns of Baltimore yearly meeting by 
Sam. Carey Clerk Cold Spring 2nd. 18th. 1838
To our Old Friends the Quakers of Philadelphia Brothers, Our brother the Quaker who resides here with us, was here to day at our 
council in our Council house. Brothers, we consider it our duty to let you know what passed at our General 
Council at Buffalo. We all met Senecas, Onondagos, Cayugas, Tuskororas 
Oneidas and all the rest of the New York Indians, Schemehorn called on some 
of the Indians from Green Bay, to attend the Council, who were all there. 
The United States Commissioner proceeded & opened the Council with these words 
I now open the council of the Six Nations. I am Commissinor of the U.S. I shall 
do the duty assigned me by the President. I was sent to let you know what the 
Government wishes. It is the policy of the Government that all the Indians shall 
remove beyond the Mississippi. Every Chief that will controle 100 souls to remove 
shall receive 500 dollars. He stated that government was very kind to Indians 
it would furnish one years provision money to defray the expence of moving 
them there, build them houses, Mills, Meeting Houses, School houses, Black- 
smiths shops, and furnish them with Missionaries. When you receive this 
offer, all your Annuity will be removed to the far Country, If any Indians remain 
here, They will get no money as there will be no Agent here. But there will be 
one sent to the west--who will attend all your Councils there--you must 
except of this offer--you must go. He occupied the whole time in talking 
for the first eight days of the Council. After we had deliberated on what 
he had said to us--and determined on remaining where we are. The Com- 
missioner said we have finished. You have sold all that you have 
claimed, here is the Treaty made and written before you--and all you 
have to do, is to sign it. He then laid the treaty on the Table, at the 
same time our petition being written we laid that on the table also, the 
Commissioner called on us to sign his paper. The Emigration party to the 
No 23--came forward and signed it. The Commissioner stating it was 
lawful to sign in the presence of the Council. Our petition was 
signed by 62 at the same time. At that time there was a large 
majority of the Cheifs and nearly all the Warriors on our side. The 
Commissioner then said I now close the Council, but my boods shall be 
open all night and 'till after breakfast tomorrow morning. There 
I will leave the reservation, at the time he dismissed the Council he 
removed the books to a Public House in the vicinity, and some of 
our people who had received large sums of money of the Augden Co 
used great exertions to get many of the Cheifs to go to this place and prevailed 
on some, with money--and others under the influence of ardent spirits was 
prevailed on to sign the pretended treaty. They offered large sums of money 
to many of the Cheifs who refused it, and remain uncorrupted by the 
offer of their bribes. We told those who had signed the treaty that the 
council is now closed and you now think you have sold our lands 
but we are determined to hold our rights. You may sell your 
proportion according to your number. But we shall none of our land. 
But the Commissioner did not go as he said. He stayed two days 
after the Council was closed, and his books were open all that time 
and when the Augden Co used all their influence to weaken our 
party by offering large sums of money to induce them to sign the 
treaty--on the third day in the afternoon the Commissioner left the 
reservation, and went to Buffalo, and held a select Council with 
those Indians who had signed the treaty. The Augden Co, knowing 
our Agent had withheld our annuity from us, and that we intended 
to send a delegation to Washington and supposing we should be 
necessiated to hire money to defray the expences of our delegates 
went forward to all those they thought would be likely to accomo- 
date us, and by their influence prevented our getting any for that 
purpose. Brothers, we have no more to say on the foregoing subject Brothers, we and our People are well, and our friends residing 
at Tunesassah are also well. Brothers, our hearts are pained 
therefore we remember you, and aim to let you know our distress 
our necessity induces to ask assistance of our friends. 
We have prevailed on James Robertson to go to Washington for 
us. He will stop and see you on his Journey--in order to be 
advised by you who to apply to at Washington for assistance 
and we think it is not likely we shall be able to raise money 
enough to defray his expences while there--and would ask 
you to lend him as much as he may need. Our Agent says 
we shall have our annuity in the 6th mo. when we got that we will 
pay you, and will pay you what you think is right for the use of it 
we will hold ourselves accountable for whatever amount you may 
think proper to let James Robertson have for that purpose. We 
are determined to stay where we are, and enjoy our old homes 
we hold the same minds we were of when our friends Enoch 
Lewis and Joseph Elkinton visited us last fall. Brothers we beleive 
the love you have felt towards us emenated from the Great Spirit 
and we beg the Great Spirit to preserve you and us, and protect 
us in our rights. There is 16 Cheifs on this reservation, two of 
which have joined the emigration party. The Tonewanda Indi- 
ans are all firmly opposed to selling their land. At Buffalo 
reservation there is a majority of the Cheifs in favour of selling but 
the warriors are mostly opposed to it, the same may be said of Cat- 
taraugus reservation. There has 92 warriors of this reservation 
signed the remonstrance and added the number of each family 
to--making in all 700 souls, the Cheifs having signed it at 
Buffalo. This from your friends and Red Brothers. 
 (Copy) their marks 
 Governor X Blacksnake James X Robertson John X Peirce Sky X Pierce Tunis X Halftown William X Patterson Charles X Obeal George X Killbuck David X Snow Isaac X Halftown Jacob X Blacksmith Moses X Peirce Captain X Jones Robert X Watt Benjamin X Williams Ohio in relation to Shawnese--Indiana on Civilazation, &c. To the Committee of New York Yearly 
Meeting for the protection assistance &c. of the 
Indian Tribes West of the Mississippi. 
Dear Friends The paragraph contained in 
 the Epistle from your Yearly Meeting 
touching the above subject claimed the es- 
pecial notice of our Yearly Meeting and we 
were by minute directed to correspond with 
you relative thereto. You are no doubt already informed 
that in conjunction with the Yearly Meetings of 
Baltimore and Indiana we have long had 
under our care the civilization and Christian 
Instruction of the Shawnee Tribe of Indians. 
And that while in a progressive state of im- 
provement they were removed from this 
State west of the Mississippi. We have however 
thought it right to follow them to their new 
abode,--have erected buildings--placed a fam- 
ily there, and opened a school. You may not 
be aware that in a school thus circumstanced the 
children have to be learned and boarded and Clothed by 
Friends; thus involving a very heavy expense 
especially in a new Country where provisions are 
high. It is caused of deep humiliation and 
sorrow that our efforts to give the young Natives 
a knowledge of letters and of the truths of 
the gospel as contained in the Holy Scriptures 
have not hitherto been efficient for the want 
of adequate means. The whole of the funds 
originally derived from our brethren in England 
being detained in the hands of Hicksites in 
Baltimore. Contributions among ourselves have 
not enabled us to keep a school in the 
mentioned all the year; and until this desirable 
object can be attained we cannot expect our 
labours will be successful This tribe numbers some upwards of 
Twelve hundred of whom two hundred are 
said to be children. It is very certain that 
with our limited means we cannot occupy 
successfully the field of labour which this 
tribe presents; and while we are engaged 
with them they will suffer no others to come 
in. If therefore you see it right to come 
to our aid in this Christian work it will 
be cordial to our feelings, and when explained 
to the Indians acceptable no doubt to them. So far as our knowledge extends the 
Neighbouring Tribes are generally under the care 
of other Religious Societies. It will be acceptable to us to 
hear from you at any time on this interesting 
subject. Signed on behalf of the Committee 
of Ohio Yearly Meeting engaged in Indian 
Civilization held 9th mo 6th 1838Jonah Hole Clerk 
Mahlon Day New York PS. please address Jonah Hole Flushing Belmont 
County Ohio Near Canton Washington County Indiana 1st Month 6th 1839 
Much Esteemed Friend Samuel Parsons Our Meeting for Sufferings having preposed 
on address to the people of the United States & more perticularly 
to our Members in Congress on the Subject of Indian Civilisetion 
and rongs done them by the citizens of the United States, which 
the yearly Meeting approved of and directed 25000 copys to be 
printed and refered the distribution of them to Meeting for Sufferings 
(except one copy for each family belonging to our yearly meeting) 
and that refered the distribution to send five thousand to Washington 
citty to be distributed by the members of congress one thousand in 
each of the states of Elinois, Mosouria, Indiana & Ohio and one 
thousand to each of the Meeting for Sufferings of Baltimore, 
 Philadelphia, New York & New England. And I have 
directed them that one slated for your Meeting for Sufferings to be sent to 
thy care. Thou will please be so kind as to hand them to the meeting 
and inform it that they are sent to friends to be disposed of as 
they may think best. The civiliseation of the Indians is a Subject 
in which friends of our yearly meeting feel a deep Interest our residence 
being nearer the main boddy of them than friends of any other 
yearly meeting and being better informed about the rongs done 
them by the Whites than those living more remote and I am 
firmly of oppinion that the mistreatment of the whites is the 
greatest obstickle in their way against imbracing the christian 
religion. tho they are verry supersticious and much attached to their 
old customs and religion. But as our yearly meeting has appointed 
a committee to corrispond with a like committee of yours on that 
subject I need not say much about it I intend to send thee a 
copy of our minutes as soon as I receive them and then those
(owing to the Ohio being far and frose they have not yet come to hand) 
and then thou will be informed the names of that committee and also will see 
by the report of our Committee on Idian affairs what we one 
doing among them altho we are doing nothing to bost of yet I 
hope that our labours among them will not be intirely in vain 
one great difficulty we labour under is in geting a suitable family 
to reside among them and superintend at our establishment it not 
only requires individuals that are well acquianted with genuine religion 
but also with the proceedings of General government especially as 
relates to the indians and also to be acquainted with human nature 
and it is hard to find those in whom all these qualities is com 
find and indeed it is a great deprivation for any to reside among 
heathons so far distant form the boddy of Society and 
when any do make the Sacrafice of all their friends as to Society 
they ought to have the nearest Simpathy and unity of their 
Boarding School going into operation soon is rather discouridging owing 
to the want of funds. The committee have oppointed to meet the 
first second day in the third month at which time they will be 
informed what money is likely to be raised the present year 
and if the funds will justify it they are desireous to get the 
house raised & inclosed the present year. We are in great need 
of such an institution having I suppose about 12000 children 
within our limits and it being verry difficult to furnish our 
primary schools with suitable teachers & it will be hard to 
remady that dificulty in any other way than by a bording School 
and not only that but for want of such an institution many of friends 
children are sent to county Siminaries and other Schools where 
the example set before them is calculated to lead their minds 
to soar above the Simplisity of the truth as prosessed by us 
But for want of information respecting such institutions some 
seem prejudiced against it apprehending it will only benefit 
the Rich and therefore withhold subscribing tho I have a hope 
as the yearly meeting appointed a committee to solisit sub- 
scriptions in the limits of each quarter who are able to give 
information respecting such a school that much of the preju- 
dice will be removed and the money will be raised 
and the work go on. Thou will see by the minutes of the yearly meeting that there 
was no ministering friends from other yearly meeting of it which I think 
was the first that we have held by ourselves. Tho we were not 
without the company of the great head of the church by his holy 
Spirrit under the influence of which we were enabled 
to tranceact the buisiness in much harmony In love I remain thy friend Wm Hobbs NB I am informed that Dear Elizabeth Robson has landed 
again in America If thou sees her please give her my love 
together with her dear Husband Interview of Cyrus Mendenhall with 
some Stockbridge Indians--1839 Cleveland Ohio 3rd Mo. 6th 1839 Respected Friend Having lately learned that thou art 
one of the Ohio Yearly Meetings Committee on Indian 
Affairs, I take the liberty of addressing thee to call 
your attention to the Stockbridge tribe of Indians, now 
residing on the South side of Winnebago Lake in Wisc- 
onsin Tery. They have resided in that Tery. for the 
last 16 years, to which place they came from one of the 
central Counties of N. York State, & had previously rec. 
some attention from Friends, I think of N.Y. Yearly 
Meeting. I do not know what rule of action the Committee 
have adopted, whether their attention is Confined to 
the Shawanesse & some others formerly in Ohio, or whether 
they would consider themselves at liberty to act for the 
welfare of the Indian wherever they saw an opportu- 
nity to effect any improvement in his conditions, and 
whether he was or not, now accepting the aid of other 
religious Societies. Be this as it may I feel it obli- 
gatory upon me to give thee some account of an interview 
I had with Jn. Quinney , A. E. Quinney & Austin 3 Chiefs 
of this tribe. We accidentally put up at the same Hostel 
in Detroit in the early part of this winter. Perceiving at 
suppertime that I was somewhat peculiarly dressed, A. E. Quinney 
shortly after asked me if I was a member of the society of Friends 
and being answered in the affirmiation invited me to spend 
the evening in their room, which invitation I gladly accepted, 
as Indian Character & Indian welfare have long been subjects 
of the liveliest interest to me. The Talk was commenced 
 by Jno. Quinney with their Characteristic gravity, he said 
that he well remembered the care extended to their Tribe by 
the Society of Friends, when he was young, that it had sent 
amongst them teachers of both sexes who instructed them in 
letters, the men in agriculture & the mechanic arts, and the 
women in the domestic duties of civilized life, that the 
instruction thus afforded had been of inestimable value to 
them, that its effects still existed amongst them, and was exten- 
ding through them to other tribes of Indians, & that the 
Red men felt the most sincere gratitude therefore towards our 
Society. This he expressed in the warmest terms, and conclu- 
ded by desiring me to convey the same to the Society when 
an opportunity offered, and to say to it that the advices and 
instruction of its elder members would now be acceptable. That they would be happy to show to it that its labors had been 
servicable in placing in placing them in their present condi- 
tion which is his own experience is on the rise, & steadily but 
slowly on the advance towards coplete civilization. This they 
seemed anxious should be accellerated. I much regret that I cannot give his words verbation: 
but what I have said must be nearly the substance. The 
manner in which it was delivered was to me satisfactory 
evidence that it proceded from the heart. After they had concluded what seemed to be their object 
in inviting me into their room, we had much, to me, interesting 
conversation, in which they give many of the particulars of 
their situation & some of the internal regulations of their 
tribe, such as its form of government, Legislative Judicial & 
Executive--which are very simple. They have a Presby- 
terian mission amongst them. Those I saw appeared to 
be men of inafficted piety, and the two who spoke our 
Language were very intelligent men. One of them had 
been taught the English language gramatically--& speaks 
it very correctly, though with some hesitation; this he said 
arose from using their own language wholly, amongst themselves; he was 
also so much of a mathemetician as to be able to perform 
plane surverying--which could also be done by 4 others of the 
tribe. Here I think is a field for accomplishing 
much service to the cause of Christianity & Civilization 
and to this wronged and blighted portion of the human race. That it 
properly belongs to Friends at Ohio Yearly Meeting is I think evident 
from the fact that it is of more easy access to them than any others. 
The Committee I have no doubt is fully aware of the importance of the objects Com- 
mitted to their charge & also of the ability of Friends of Ohio 
to do all that may be Exquisite in a preuniary way, to aid it, 
so that I need make no other appeal to its Christian benevolence than to 
inform it, as requested, that the way is open to do good. Should any 
members of the Committee wish to visit this tribe the best way would 
be to embark on one of the Steam Boats which leave this place, during the summer, 
every 2 or 3 days, for Green Bay, which place would be reached in 4 or 5 days at 
a passage expence of 15 or 20 doll. (I think 15) & there they would have to traval about 
30 miles over land by a U. States Military Road to reach the 
place of its residence. I should be glad to hear from thee Letter from Ohio Committee to New York Com. 1839 Near Wilmington Ohio, 3rd Mo. 16th 1839 
Mahlan Day 
Dear friend I herewith forward thee the minutes of 
our late yearly Meeting, by which thou will see 
on page 26 that the meeting appointed a Com- 
mittee to Correspond with like Committies 
of other yearly meetings on the Subject of 
Indian Civilization, in accordance with the 
propositions made in the Epistles from New York 
& New England Yearly Meetings, and that our 
yearly meeting will expect a report next yearly 
Meeting. By direction & on behalf of our 
Committee aforesaid, I hasten to inform thee 
(as we understand thou art Clerk to the 
Committee of your Yearly Meeting) that we 
are ready to receive any communication you 
may please to make to us, and shall look 
with anxiety for the views you have on the 
subject of your appointment, as in our opin- 
ion the subject of Indian Civilization is 
our in which friends aught to manifest in 
spirit of libirality and more enlarged views 
than has somtimes been 
 manifested in this very interesting subject. By reading our Indian report in the minutes 
the Memmorial to Congress, and the address 
on behalf of the Indians, to all of which 
the Committee of your Y. M. is refered, you will 
find that we are still labouring for the Indians 
as way opens--by recent accounts from our Estab- 
lishment the school appears to be in operation & 
the Indians doing well. Please direct litters to Henry Harvey Wilmington 
Clinton County Ohio. 
In love we are your friends 
On behalf of the Com. Henry Harvey Report from Baltimore Committee To the Committee of New York Yearly Meeting charged with 
Indian Concerns.Dear Friends, We were directed by our last 
Yearly Meeting to open a Correspondence with you, as also 
with similar Committees of other Yearly Meetings, with a view 
to promote as way might open for it, & as suggested in your 
Epistle of last year, a more united Action on the part of the Society 
generally for the Civilization & Christian instruction of the Aborigines 
of this country. In compliance with these instructions we now 
address you: More than 40 years have now elapsed 
since the subject was first introduced into Yearly Meetingour , 
& during this period a number of different tribes of Indians 
have been visited & assisted by the Committee having charge of 
the Concern; as early as the year 1797 a deputation visited 
the Indian settlement as far westward as the Sandusky 
river, & returned by the head waters of the Muskingam. We 
addressed a communication to the Wyandots on the Great 
Miami, & the Delawares on the Sandusky, Subsequently 
furnished the Delawares with some Tools, & implements 
of husbandry. The Pottawattamie & Miami Nations 
were visited in 1804, & an establishment formed on the 
Wabash River 32 miles south west of Fort Wayne, where 
the Indians were instucted in Agriculture by Members 
of our Society employed by the Committee to reside among 
them for that purpose. This Establishment continued to 
flourish until 1812 when it was entirely broken up by War 
& the Village burnt. In the year 1809. The Shawanese Tribe 
at Waughpakonatta applied for assistance, they were 
aided in building a Grist Mill in 1811 & in 1819, an establishment 
was formed amongst them for the purpose of instructing them 
further in the arts of cicilization & for the education of their children. 
Two years afterwards friends purchased a farm adjoining 
the Indian Settlement to which the Establishment was 
removed, & the school continued under the care 
of our Superintendant & his family with some interruption 
beyond our Control until the Year 1832; In the school 
the indian Children of bothe sexes were taught the Elementary 
branches of a Common Education; The boys were instructed in 
the practical duties of farming &c & the Girls in sewing 
knitting, spinning, & generally in the business of the family. 
The orderly deportment of the children & their improvement 
were highly satisfactory, During the Period under review the 
Shawanese were furnished by Friends with Ploughs & 
other necessary implements, instructed in the use of them, 
& assisted in various kinds of labour. The Indian Women 
were provided with spinning wheels &c, as also with wool, 
Flax, and other articles, and instructed in such kinds of business 
as was suitable for them. The older Indians were not only 
pleased with the education of their children but they 
themselves made important advances in the habits of Morality, 
industry, & economy: They built themselves good hewn Log 
houses, opened farms, introduced the Plough, raised considerable 
stock & were greatly improved in habits of sobriety: about 
this time (1832) the Shawnese sold their lands at 
Waughpokonatta to the United States, & removing beyond 
the Mississippi settled upon a tract of Excellent land 
on the Kanzas river, near the western boundary of the 
state of Missouri, distant about 700 miles from Cincinnati. 
A united Cooperation between Baltimore & Ohio Yearly Meetings 
in relation to this concern commenced in 1816, & in 1821 
it was extended to Indiana Yearly Meeting, from which time 
to the present the active duties of the Concern have been 
confided to the Committees of Ohio & Indiana: The printed 
copy of the Extracts from the Minutes of our Yearly Meeting 
for 1835 which we herewith send you, contains the present 
plan for the joint operation & government of the Committees 
of the three Yearly Meetings. Under this plan we have 
created the necessary buildings for the accommodation of a 
family & School, & have again opened an Establishment 
among the Shawnese; By recent accounts recieved through 
our friends of Indians respecting the present state of the 
Undertaking, it appears that the Super Intendant has 
raised the past year & taken care of about 200 Dozen 
of wheat, of oats the product of 2 1/2 acres, & put up 8 to 10 tons of 
hay, & has raised on an extent of 6 to 7 acres, Good Corn & 
vegetables sufficient for the use of the family, and that there 
are two horses, four cows, & four young cattle belonging 
to the Establishment. The school was opened 1st of First 
month 1838 & continued for 3 monthes when it was dismiss- 
ed on account if sickness--Average number of children 
15 or 18: The school is again in operation & a meeting 
for Worship is regularly held at the Establishment, & a 
portion of the Holy Scriptures read in the school agreeably 
to the direction given by the Committee. Although during 
the prosecution of this very interesting concern difficulties 
have frequently occured to mar the Work from the Disturbed 
state of the Indian Tribes among themselves, & from the 
unsettled condition of the Indians consequent upon the 
policy of our Government for their removal west of the 
Mississippi, yet we have the satisfaction to believe, 
that important benefits have resulted to them from 
our benevolent & disinterested labour on their 
account, which with the entire confidence they continue 
to repose in Friends furnishes us with sufficient ground 
for active perseverance therein. The Efficient prosecution 
of our undertaking among the Shawnese will necessarily 
involve a considerable annual expenditure of Means 
and it would be cordial to us to have your assistance 
in the continuance & extension among them of the 
advantages of Civilization & Christian Instruction. With a salutaion of Love we remain your 
Friends: Signed by direction & on behalf of a Meeting of 
the Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting charged with 
Indian Concerns held 14th of Third Month 1839 by 
Saml. Carey 
Clerk North Ferrisburgh 11 Mo 9. 1839 
To the Clerk of the Committee on Indian Affairs. 
Dear Friend, David E Knowles , accompanied 
by his wife, both members of Ferrisburgh 
Monthly Meeting & having certificates 
from our M & Q Meetings is about pro- 
ceeding our religious visit to the Cherokee 
and other Indians, west of the Missi- 
sippi; the Q & M Meetings to facilitate 
their proceeding, have each appointed 
a committee to render them such 
advice and assistance as their 
circumstances might seem to require 
and it is with the approbation 
of the Q. M's Committee that we on the 
part of the M. M. Com. address thee 
on the subject. The object we have in view 
in addressing thee, is to introduce 
them to the notice of the Committee 
on Indian affairs, as friends 
who feel a lively interest in the welfare 
of that deeply injured people, 
and should your committee be 
disposed to aid them, we trust 
you will have no cause to regret 
having placed your confidence 
in them Whether it will be advisable for 
D. E. Knowles to officiate as our agent of 
your committee we do not pretend 
to judge, but leave that with him 
and the Com. to arrange as it may 
seem best. We may further add that 
of the esertions of the Q & M M com- 
mittees in raising funds for 
their use in prosecution their under- 
taking, still are comparing, the same 
collected with the extent of the under- 
taking, there appears a deficiency 
which the liberality of other friends 
may acceptably fill up. On the part of the M. M Com. 
Thy Friend 
Henry Miles. P.S. D.E.K . & his wife expect to be in 
New York about the first of next 
month. H.M. Proposed visit of David E. Knowles & wife to the Cherokees. NY 11 Mo 16 1839. 
Esteemed friend, Henry Miles Thy letter of the 9th, inst. 
addressed to Mahlon Day as clerk of the Indian 
Committee of N York Y Meeting, has been 
rec. & laid before a number of the members 
of that committee. Who have instructed 
me to inform thee that the committee has not 
yet received any money to expend in that 
Concern & that they are not prepared to empoly 
an agent at this time. We understand 
the Indians west of the Mississippi are in a very 
unsettled state from various causes, one of which 
appears to be disagreement among themselves, 
which has already led to bloodshed, & it is thought 
quite doubtful whether our friends would at 
present be enabled to travel among the Indians 
with safety or usefulness. Perhaps it may be advisable to pause & consider 
whether this is the best time to visit the Indians 
or not. Thy frd. &c. 
H. Hinsdale. M. Day to-- New York, 4th mo. 1839 Dear Friend 
Samuel Carey , I duly received thy communication on 
behalf of a meeting of the Committee of Baltimore 
Yearly Meeting charged with the Indian Concerns, and 
laid the same before our Committee on the like subject. It appearing from the tenor of the above commu- 
nication, as well as others from Friends of different 
Yearly Meetings on this Continent, that the subject proposed 
by the Yearly Meeting of New York, has not been 
fully understood, I have been directed by our 
Committee to write to thee, for the information of 
the Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting on this 
subject, that it was not the concern of our Yearly 
Meeting to aid any other Yearly Meeting in 
any partial or limited plan for the benefit of 
individual tribes; but to ask the cooperation of 
the Yearly Meetings on this continent in some gene- 
ral and extended plan for the benefit and pro- 
tecyion of all the Indians who have moved to 
reside west of the Mississippi; chiefly, perhaps 
by providing suitable agents to reside among 
them; and endeavor, as far as practicable, to in- 
terpose between the Indians and those whites among 
them, who, as the government agents or otherwise, might 
attempt to frustrate or defeat those portions of the 
Treaties made with the Government of the United 
States, which have in view the civilization and 
welfare of the natives, and to represent their griev- 
ances to the Federal Government. Also to be 
present and aid by advice at any General Council 
which such Indians may hold. Consent of action proposed by New York Yearly Meeting, and 
response from New England--1839 New England Yearly Meeting 6th Mo 1839 The Committee appointed in 1837 and continued last year 
to correspond as way might open with Committees of other 
Yearly Meetings on the condition of the Indians residing 
beyond the Mississippi produced a Report--of which the 
following is the concluding paragraph-- We would propose 
that our Yearly Meeting at this time should as far unite 
with New York Yearly Meeting as to recommend to Friends 
to enter into a voluntary subscription to the amount of $500 
to be appropriated, under the care of such committee as may 
be appointed by this Meeting to have charge of this subject 
to the object specified in the communication from the com- 
mittee on Indian concerns of New York Yearly Meeting --which report was satisfactory to the Meeting and with 
feelings of sympathy for this much injured people, the 
surviving members of the Committee now under appointment 
were continued for another year, to correspond, as way may 
open for it, with similar committees of other Yearly Meetings 
on this interesting concern. And it was concluded 
as proposed by the Committee so far to unite with 
New York Yearly Meeting as to recommend to Friends 
to enter a voluntary subscription at this time 
for the purpose of raising an amount of not less than 
$500--to be placed in the hands of the Committee of 
this Meeting and to be appropriated under their care 
for the objects specified in the report. By direction of our Committee of correspondence 
on Indian concerns I forward thee the above extract 
from the Minutes of our Yearly Meeting with the 
 information that the sum of $500. is now in our 
hands subject to the draft of your committee on Indian 
Concerns whenever way shall open with you to carry into 
effect the proposal contained in your communcation 
to us -- Signed on behalf of the Com. of correspondence on 
Indian Concerns of New England Yearly Meetg 
 Samuel Boyd Toby Clerkb
Providence 8th mo 6th 1839
 To Mahlon Day 
Clerk of the Com. of Indian Concers of 
New York Yr Meetg. Ohio Yearly Meeting's Agency at Kansas River 4 Mo. 12th 1840 
Near Wilmington Ohio Mahalon Day , 
My Dear friend Accompanying this, thou will 
receive a copy of our last Yearly Meeting's Minutes 
I refer thee and your Committee on Indian concerns to 
our report on the corispondance with your and with friends 
of New England Yearly Meeting for their discision in the 
case, thou will find it on page 26. I am just willing 
briefly to state to thee reasons we have for proposing the 
change in the location of our contemplated Agency whi- 
ch are that it is now altogether uncertain when the law 
providing for the Government of the Indians will be past 
by Congress, and when passed if passed atall, the seat of the- 
ir Federal Government will in all probability be located am- 
ong the Cherokees Chochtaws, or some of the numerous tribes 
in the sothern part of the Indian Teritory, which is a 
considerable distance from the Shawnees, the imediate objects 
of our care and as the many small tribes, and remnants 
of tribes are situated contageous to them, and less cared for 
by our Government than the larger tribes I have alluded 
to, it has seemed to us that we were best satisfied to propose 
to our Dear friends who are thus concerned, to have the 
Agency located at our Establishment on the Konsas 
River, we thought that an Agency might be placed with 
our friends who may be residing at that place without 
so great expenses, and do more good among the much 
neglected remnants of tribes who are for more exposed 
to the intreagues of the avoricious white Man, than the 
larger and better informed Nations are. I have hastly sketched this on behalf of our corispon- 
ding Committee and hope friends understand us on the subject I am about setting off for the Konsas River with 
my family to take charge of our school establishment among 
the Shawnees where I expect we shall remain for two years as 
Agents of the society. Any communication you may please 
to forward for our Committee, I suppose might be 
forwarded to me (or a copy at least) Addressed to me 
at, Westport Jackson County Misourie and I can lay 
the same before our Committee with what other information 
may necessarily come within my possion touching the subject 
in question of the establishment spoken of and shall be 
careful to give you more fully an account of the 
local situation of the Indians after becoming acquainted 
with them, their situation and country and the views 
such a knowledge may put me in possession of. In love I am thy friend. 
On behalf of the corisponding Committee. Henry Harvey. AN ADDRESS 
OF THE 
YEARLY MEETING OF FRIENDS, 
HELD AT BALTIMORE, 
TO THOMAS JEFFERSON , 
PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED SATES: 
AND HIS REPLY. [For the information of such as may read the following, we may state, that this address is reprinted at this time, 
in order to promote, in the public mind, if possible, the same humane and benevolent feelings towards the Indians 
that existed in the mind of THOMAS JEFFERSON .] 12th Mo. 1840 To THOMAS JEFFERSON , 
PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES. WE, the Representatives of the Yearly Meeting of Friends, for the 
Western Shore of Maryland, the adjacent parts of Pennsylvania and 
Virginia, and the State of Ohio, being convened in the City of 
Baltimore, on those concerns which relate to our society, feel our 
minds engaged to address thee on behalf of ourselves, and the 
religious society which we represent. Permit us to say, that whilst we desire to be preserved from inter- 
meddling with the policy of those governments under which we live, 
we believe it to be our indispensable duty, consistently with that 
Christian obligation, with relation to governments, to lead a quiet 
and peaceable life under them, in all Godliness and honesty. We feel gratitude to the Sovereign Ruler of the Universe, in that 
he hath influenced the councils of the general government of our 
country, to decide upon several important subjects, agreeably to the 
principles of eternal justice and right. Amongst the most prominent of those acts which claim our ap- 
probation, we are induced to notice thy efforts to preserve our coun- 
try from the ravages and calamities of war, by cultivating a dispo- 
sition, and pursuing a conduct, marked with conciliation and friend- 
ship toward all those nations with whom we have intercourse; 
thereby avoiding those grounds of dissention, which are often the 
sources from whence this desolating scourge has its origin, to the 
reproach of Christianity. For, as we are firmly persuaded of its 
obligation as a righteous principle, so it is our fervent desire, in re- 
gard to all men, that even the smallest germ of enmity may be era- 
dicated. And our ardent prayer to the Father of the Universe is, 
that, through the overruling order of his providence, the hearts and 
understanding of his erring and contending creatures may be illu- 
minated, so to behold the excellency of brotherly affection, as to be- 
come willing to admit the spirit of reconciliation. We are also bound to acknowledge those philanthropic exertions, 
which have been used to ameliorate the condition of the Indian na- 
tives, by introducing among them a knowledge of agriculture, and 
some of the mechanic arts. We sincerely congratulate thee on 
their progress in cilvilization, and the very encouraging prospect, 
abundantly evinced, that this truly benevolent and laudable under- 
taking will ultimately be crowned with the desired success--an un- 
dertaking which, whilst it increasingly obviates the wretchedness 
of their former condition, converts them from dangerous neigh- 
bours to valuable friends. But there remains a subject inexpressibly dear to our hearts, 
which was particularly interesting to our feelings. We rejoice in 
the prospect of a termination to the wrongs of Africa, and that a 
traffic, heretofore legalized in a district of our country, in its nature 
abhorrent to every just and tender sentiment, and reproachful to 
humanity, to say nothing of Christian principles, is inderdicted by 
our government.--For the exertion of thy influence, united with 
the National Legislature (may we not say.) to relieve our country, 
from the complicated evils attendant upon this cruel and inhuman 
trade, we are engaged, through this medium, to testify our warmest 
approbation. And may the future councils of our country yield to the influence 
of Him, who is called Wonderful Counsellor, The Mighty God, 
The Everlasting Father, The Prince of Peace; so that the 
exercise of additional acts of justice and mercy, towards this greatly 
oppressed part of the human family, may utterly remove the cries 
of oppression from this highly-favored land. With sentiments of respect due from us to those who, in the 
ordering of Divine providence are set over us, we are thy friends. 
Signed on behalf of the Meeting, by GERARD T. HOPKINS , CLERK TO THE FOREGOING ADDRESS, 
THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES 
RETURNED THE FOLLOWING ANSWER. I thank you for the address you have kindly presented me, on 
behalf of that portion of the Society of Friends of which you are the 
Representatives: and I learn with satisfaction their approbation of 
the principles which have influenced the councils of the general 
government, in their decisions on several important subjects confided 
to them. The desire to preserve our country form the calamities and rava- 
ges of war, by cultivating a disposition, and pursuing a conduct, 
conciliatory and friendly to all nations, has been sincerely enter- 
tained and faithfully followed. It was dictated by the principles of 
humanity, the precepts of the Gospel, and the general wish of our 
country; and it was not to be doubted, that the Society of Friends, 
with whom it is a religious principle, would sanction it by their 
support. The same philanthropic motives have directed the public endea- 
vours to ameliorate the condition of the Indian natives, by introduc- 
ing among them a knowledge of agriculture and some of the me- 
chanic arts, by encouraging them to resort to these as more certain, 
and less laborious resources for subsistence, than the chase, and by 
withholding from them the pernicious supplies of ardent spirits. 
They are our brethren, our neighbours; they may be valuable 
friends, of troublesome enemies. Both duty and interest then en- 
join, that we should extend to them the blessings of civilized life, 
and prepare their minds for becoming useful members of the Ame- 
rican family. In this important work, I owe to your Society an 
acknowledgment that we have felt the benefits of their zealous co- 
operation, and approved its judicious direction towards producing 
among those people habits of industry, comfortable subsistence, and 
civilized usages, as preparatory to religious instruction, and the cul- 
tivation of letters. Whatever may have been the circumstances which influenced our 
forefathers to permit the introduction of personal bondage into any 
part of these States, and to participate in the wrongs committed on 
an unoffending quarter of the globe, we may rejoice that such cir- 
cumstances, and such a sense of them, exist no longer. It is hon- 
ourable to the nation at large, that their Legislature availed them- 
selves, at the first practicable moment, for arresting the progress of 
this great moral and political error: and i sincerely pray with you, 
my friends, that all the members of the human family, may, in the 
time prescribed by the Father of us all, find themselves securely es- 
tablished in the enjoyments of life, liberty and happiness. TH. JEFFERSON. Nov. 13, 1807. Minute 
of 
New York 
Yearly Meetg. 
Indians 
west of 
Mississippi 
1840 At a Meeting of the Committee on the Concern of the 
Yearly Meeting for the protection of the Indian Tribes 
located west of the Mississippi, held in New York 
the 12th of the 6th Mo. 1840 Extracts from the minutes of the Yearly Meeting, were 
produced and are as follows The Committee on the concern of the Meeting in 
relation to the Indian Tribes west of the Mississippi 
made the following report The Committee is continued to the service to act in 
concert with Committees of other Yearly Meetings, which 
may engage in the Concern and it is authorized to 
disburse the money raised for this object, agreeable to 
the purpose for which it was collected and if way open 
to employ some suitable well qualified agent to reside 
at the principal central seat of government of the 
Indians located west of the Mississipi and the 
Committee on the Epistles was requested to communicate 
the present state of the Concern in the epistle to the 
several Yearly Meetings. Sam. L. Mott was at 
his request released from the appointment 
Extracted from minutes of said Meeting 
Samuel Parsons Clerk At a meeting of the Committee on the Concern of the 
Yearly Meeting for the protection of the Indian Tribes 
located west of the Mississipi, held in New York 
the 12th of the 6th Mo 1840 
The following minute is contained in the extract of 
the minutes of the Yearly Meeting On giving careful attention to the views of the Yearly 
Meeting, as stated in the above minute, it was 
concluded that it would be expedient to make 
an appointment to confer with the Committee of 
the Yearly Meeting of Friends in New England on 
this interesting subject, and to take into consideration 
what proceedings should be had in order to carry 
into effect the views of the two meetings, especially 
in relation to the appointment of an agent to reside 
amongst the Tribes for counsel and protection 
Tothis service the following Friends were appointed 
Richard Mott , Henry Hinsdale , Samuel Parsons 
and Extracted from the Minutes of the said Committee New England Yearly Meeting's response to proposition of New York 
to send qualified persons west of Mississippi to 
inquire fully into situation of Indians, &c. Providence 8 Mo. 10th. 1840 Dear Friend Mahlon Day I am directed by the Committee 
of our Yearly Meeting on the concern of the Indians located west of the Mississippi to inform the Committee of your Yearly 
Meeting on this concern that the Extracts from the Minutes 
of your Yearly Meeting and of your Committee relation 
thereto were duly laid before us by the Friends appointed 
by you to confer with us upon the subject who acceptably 
met with us at the time of holding our late Yearly 
Meeting--and for your information I subjoin the 
Report of our Committee and an Extract from the 
Minutes of the Yearly Meeting and of the Committee on 
this concern. To New England Yearly Meeting 
The Committee continued under appointment last 
year to correspond with similar Committees of other 
Yearly Meetings on the concern of the Indians located 
west of the Mississippi--report--that we have corresponded 
with the Committees of New York, Baltimore and Indiana 
Yearly Meetings, but that way has not yet opened to 
proceed in carrying into effect the concern of New York 
Yearly Meeting as communicated to us and united with 
last year. An interesting document from that meeting 
we herewith present. From the Committee of Indiana 
Yearly Meeting we have received a request to unite with 
them in their care over the Shawnee Tribe of Natives; but 
it does not appear to us that this would fully embrace 
the concern of this Meeting; which we understand to be, 
to promote in any way that we may be able, the welfare 
of the vast numbers west of the Mississippi, towards whom 
our Society have not heretofore extended any particular 
attention. And we are united in judgement that it is 
desirable to send one or more suitably qualified 
individuals among them to ascertain more fully their 
situation and necessities; and would propose that our 
Yearly Meeting should unite with New York in endeavouring 
to effect this object; and that the money raised last 
year should be thus appropriated should it be required. On behalf of the Committee 
Samuel Boyd Tobey ClerkNewport 6mo 18th 1840 At our Yearly meeting of Friends for New England 
held on Rhode Island in the 6th Mo 1840. The Committee on the concern of the Indians located 
west of the Mississippi made a report, which with the 
interesting document from New York therein referred to 
was read. The subject as thus presented claimed 
the renewed sympathy of Friends--and Rowland Greene 
and others were appointed a Committee to correspond 
as occasion may require with similar Committees of 
other Yearly Meetings; and were authorized to unite 
with the Committee of New York Yearly Meeting in employing 
should way open for it, one or more suitably qualified persons 
to visit the Indians in their present locations, in order to 
ascertain more fully their situation and necessities, as 
proposed in the report already laid before us, and 
with liberty to appropriate to this object, the money 
raised last year [say $714.--] for the benefit of this 
concern, should it be required. From the Minutes of said Meeting 
Abraham Shearman Jun Clerk At a meeting of the Committee on the Indian Concerns 
of New England Yearly Meeting held at Providence 
the 7th of 8th month 1840. The important concern of finding some suitable 
friend of friends to visit the Indians in their present 
locations west of the Mississippi was again brought before 
us and received our solid consideration--but as 
individual precounted at this time who felt it to be 
his duty to undertake this service. Extracted from the Minutes of said Com. Samuel Boyd Tobey Clerk 
To Mahlon Day Clerk of the Committee of New York 
Yearly Meeting on the Indian Concern John D. Lang & Sam. Taylor to go west of Mississippi New York, 9th mo. 8, 1841 Doctor S. B. Tobey 
Dear Friend Our committee on the concern 
for the Indians located West of the Mississippi, met 
yesterday. A good deal of interest was manifested 
by the Committee, that the views of Friends of both this 
and the New England Yearly Meeting's Com- 
mittee, should be carried out as soon as suitable Friends 
should be found, who would be willing to engage in 
this arduous concern of assisting the Indians. It being communicated to our Com- 
mittee, that two Friends of New England Yearly Meeting, 
(John D. Lang and Samuel Taylor jr) had intimated to 
a few Friends their willingness to engage in this mission, 
I was requested to write to thee, on behalf of the Com- 
mittee of our Yearly Meeting on this subject, and to state 
our entire approbation of the names of these Friends; 
and a hope was feelingly expressed, that they might see 
it right before long, to set out on this interesting service, 
and to add, that the expenses would cheerfully be paid 
on our part, out of the money jointly raised for this purpose, by 
the two Yearly Meetings. If your Committee could see it right to 
signify, with us, our full approbation with the prospect of these 
Friends, and for thee, on behalf of your Committee, to 
write to them , to encourage them with our sym- 
pathy and unity in this work of justice and love, and to 
express to them our strong desire for their help and en- 
couragement, it might enable 
them to move in a labor, in which, from its probable length toil 
and exposure, they might possible be fearful and re- 
luctant to engage but which we reverently hope 
would be owned by the great Head of the Church. If these Friends should see it right to give themselves 
up to the service it does appear to us best that they 
should be prepared to pay the Indians in their extensive 
location west of the Mississippi, a journal visit 
and be very minute in their observations, to gather 
all particulars of Indian manners and customs, 
situation, schools, religious engagements, governments, 
and policies, and to encourage them to pursue agricul- 
ture and mechanical employments, and to recom- 
mend such measures as would promote there and 
other peaceful objects, and to discouregement of a war 
Spirit and jealousies amongst tribes; in short, to and 
particular notes as far as would be practiceable 

so that these documents might be 
laid before our respective Committees for publication, 
or not; as might be thought advisable. It is easy to see, that such a statement would 
be exceedingly interesting to Friends, both in our own 
land, and to our dear brethren on the other side of the 
Atlantic, as will as to the public generally; and further 
move, it would be casting in our mite towards laying 
off an immeasureable debt which the white people owe 
to the aborigenies of this land, for the great injustice 
and oppression of which they have been so long and so 
unjustly the unhappy subjects. Providence 10 mo. 15th. 1841 Mahlon Day 
Dear friend Thy letter of the 8th ult. on behalf 
of the Committee of your Yearly Meeting on the concern of 
the Indians located west of the Mississippi was duly received 
and in accordance with the suggestion contained in it, we 
have corresponded with our friends John D. Lang and 
Samuel Taylor jun . on the subject of their engageing in a 
visit to the Indians to carry out the concern of New York 
and New England Yearly Meetings--and the result of this 
correspondence is that we find the minds of our friends 
are turned to this important service. At a meeting 
of our Committee held on the 12th inst (at which John D. 
Lang was present) there was a very full expression of unity 
with our friends in this engagement and they were 
incouraged to pursue it whenever they should 
that the time had come for them to enter upon it. Should the prospect continue to rest upon their minds 
and they to receive the unity of their friends therein, it 
is not probable they will think it best to engage in it before 
another season. In the mean time any information 
that you may be able to obtain, as to the best time of 
the year for visiting the Indians--the most suitable 
mode of travelling this their country, and any other 
information that might be useful to friends thus 
engaged would be very acceptable to them. Truly thy friend 
Samuel Boyd Tobey Our friend John D. Lang is now about to engage in a religious 
visit to some remote settlements in the State of Maine. Response of New York Committee to N. England's 
proposition. S. Taylor & J. D. Lang . New York, 10th mo. 30, 1841. 
Dear Friend 
Samuel Boyd Toby Thy acceptable letter of the 15th 
inst. has been laid before our Committee. Much 
satisfaction was felt at the prospect of the two 
Friends named in thy letter being willing to give 
up to pay a visit to the Indian Tribes located 
West of the Mississippi, and we trust their benevo- 
lent intentions will be carried into effect. Our committee desired I would re- 
ply to thy note, and assure your Committee 
on this subject of our hearts co-operation, and 
of our intentions to aid in this matter. They 
have directed me to correspond with indi- 
viduals, and to gather all the particulars we 
can, with the view of making the journey of our 
dear friends John D. Lang and Samuel Taylor, jr. 
as easy and pleasant as possible, knowing that 
such a vast field must be attended with in- 
conveniences and hardships, to travel over. We 
hope in due time, to be provided with information 
that will be of importance to them. To accomplish 
this more fully one or more Friends ought 
to visit Washington, during the of the 
coming winter. Would it suit thee, or some other 
Friend of your Committee, to join one of ours, 
to see the proper persons in Washington? With affectionate regard 
Thy friend 
Mahlon Day S. Taylor Jr. & J. D. Lang --subject continued in care 
of N. York & N. England. New York, 10th mo. 30th, 1841 David E. Knowles 
Dear Friend I have been requested to write to thee 
by the Committee of our Yearly Meeting on Indian 
affairs, to obtain of thyself and wife, all the informa- 
tion we can with respect to the Indian Tribes located 
West of the Mississippi. Two friends of England Yearly MeetingsNew- 
, have expressed a willingness 
to visit these people on behalf of the concern of 
their own and our Yearly Meeting, and our 
Committee wish to gather all the information we 
can, for their benefit and guidance. Be so kind as to put down, at thy earliest 
convenience, all such particulars as thou may 
feel a freedom to do, with respect to the most 
eligible route, mode of travelling, distances, & 
and every item that would be advantageous to 
these Friends, even to the best kind of clothing to 
suit the wear of the climate 
and travel of the Far West. They are two male 
Friends, and I would mention their names, if 
the matter had progressed so far as for them to 
lay the concern before their respective meetings 
As it is, it would not be proper now to make 
public their concern until sanctioned by the proper 
source. With affectionate regard to thyself and wife 
I remain thy friend Mahlon Day Queries What tribes did you visit? How did you find them as to comfort and 
progress in civilization? Did you learn of any acts of deceit and 
oppression in individuals in their dealings to- 
wards them, either of the whites or of government? Are they civil and kind to strangers? Would they likely receive a visit from 
Friends kindly? What route or particular road would you 
recommend to visit tribes you did? What mode of travelling is best? Are there guides to be obtained readily? Would it be best to employ an interpreter? How many miles in a day in the Indian country 
could a man travel? Providence 1 Mo. 19th. 1842 Dear Friend 
Mahlon Day The Committee of our 
Yearly Meeting on the concern of the Indians west of 
the Mississippi propose meeting at this place at the 
time of our next quarterly Meeting--two weeks from 
the present time--say the 2nd or 3 of next month-- 
either on fourth of fifth day evening. By a letter received yesterday from John D. Lang 
he informs us of the desire of himself and Samuel 
Taylor Jr. that something different should now be concluded 
on--both as to the time of entering upon the service--the 
necessary steps to be taken previously and many 
particulars in which our friends would desire advice 
and assistance--and John proposes that a delegation 
from the Committee of your Y. Meetg. should meet 
with us at the time proposed above--and I am 
requested by such of our Committee as I have 
been able to consult to write thee and make 
this proposition; with an expression of our hope 
that your Committee will be able to comply with it 
that thus a concern which has claimed the attention 
of Friends for as long a time may be advanced 
towards a completion so far as the sending of a Com. 
among the Indians will effect it. Our friends John D. Lang and Samuel Taylor Jr. we trust 
will be present at the proposed meeting. Thy friend Truly 
Samuel Boyd Tobey Meeting of Indian Com. of N. England & M. Day on behalf of 
New York. John D. Lang , &c. 2 mo 1842 
Letter from S. Taylor Jr. at Fort Madisons. Iowa. 
on way to Indian Ter.. 10 mo 1842 At a meeting of the Committee of New England Yearly 
Meeting on the concern of the Indians located west of 
the Mississippi held at Providence 2nd Mo. 3rd 1842. We have at this meeting the acceptable company 
of our friend Mahlon Day on behalf of the Committee of 
New York Yearly Meeting. Our friends John D. Lang and Samuel Taylor jun . 
being now present, the subject of their engaging in carrying 
out the concern before us has again claimed our solid 
and deliberate consideration, and our dear friends 
manifesting a willingness to yield themselves to this 
service, there was a united and full expression of 
unity with their therein. And it appearing to there 
view that it might be right for them to enter upon the 
work early in the autumn of this year, they were 
encouraged to attend to the prospect in taking such 
preparatory steps so may seem to them proper. Extracted from the Minutes of the aforesaid 
Committee 
Samuel Boyd Tobey Clerk Meeting of Indian Com. of N. England & M. Day in behalf of 
New York. John D. Lang , &c. 2 mo 1842. 
Letter from S. Taylor Jr. at Fort Madisons, Iowa 
on way to Indian Ter.. 10 mo 1842 10th mo. 15 1842 
Fort Madison Iowa Territory 200 miles up the Mississippi from St Louis Dear Friends Mahlon Day Having a little leisure at this time 
while waiting for a conveyance down the Mississippi to St Louis I 
have thought to occupy a part of it in writing to thyself and some other 
of our dear friend in the East, I wrote to our mutual Friend Henry 
Hinsdale about the time of our leaving Ohio. After leaving Ohio we 
went by water to Detroit Michigan to Chicago so on to 
Golane and Dabesque. We there hired a man to take us 100 miles 
to the Agency on the Neutral Ground occupied by the Winnebago 
Indians. David Lawry is at this time Sub. Agent of this Tribe. The 
U.S.Government have appriopriated about 5000$ for the support 
of a School amongst this Tribe. There have been 85 children 
receiving some instruction at the school the past year many of 
them have made pretty good progress in the various branches of 
an English Education. As near as we could learn this school is 
doing some good to this poor degraded tribe of Indians. As miserable 
and degraded as any of the Tribes west of the Mississippi River. This 
Tribe numbers about 2200 in all and fast waisting away through 
the destructive influence of the whites, many of whom are selling 
them whiskey and in every other possible way cheating them out of all 
their Annuities of money, Blankets Guns, &c. So that in a very short 
time after their Annuities are made the poor Indians have nothing 
to show but poverty and retchedness. We were informed by D. Lawrey 
the Agent that in a little more than one Year thirty nine persons Indians had been 
killed in their drunken revels, that had come to his knowledge. And he 
had not much doubt, but that a number more might have been killed 
which he did not know of We were kindly received and entertained by the Sub. Agent during our 
Stay at the Acengy, And every facility afforded for conversing with the 
Indians through his son who is an Interpreter, that their circumstances 
would admit of (it being a very busy time with them while we were there 
The Indians were coming in from all parts of the Indian country to receive 
their Annuity in money which was to be paid out to the head of every family 
immediately after our leaving the place, I think we were informed that 
about twenty eight thousand dollars was to be paid them at this time in 
money and that not a dollar of it would remain in the hands of the poor 
Indians in one week after the payment was completed, or at most but a 
very small part of it The Whiskey dollars, and Indian traders are generally 
prowling about the Indians, ready to seize upon the first opportunity 
of getting hold of the money or any other thing of value that the Indians 
may have, and this too for a little whiskey or some other trifling gewgaw 
of no real value to the Indians. Unless some thing is done to better the condition 
of this tribe and to prevent the introduction of whiskey amongst them 
they must soon all be waisted and Gone. We had two talks with a 
number of their chiefs and about 30 of their principle men. 
They listened very patiently to what we had to say amongst them 
manifested, their satisfaction that we had come so far to pay them a 
visit. They apeared sensible of the injury that whiskey was doing them 
and wished that it were otherwise, said before they were acquainted with 
white men they lived comfortable and happey, but as son as white 
men came amongst them they began to be sickly and diseased. Their 
young men and women died off, whereas before that time none of their 
young men died, but on the contrary all their people lived to be white 
headed, and that they had no sickness among them, but all died of old age 
One of the Chiefs told us in his talk to us that he supposed that the 
white men must have got the Fire Water from the bad Spirit for he was 
very certain that it never came from the Good Spirit. And that they should 
be glad of it could be kept away from them, but so long as it was 
within their reach they could not refrain from drinking it and they 
could not keep their young men from drinking and Getting drunk 
and when they were drunk they could not tell what they did but 
that they became unmanageable and killed one another. He said that 
their great Father the president had promised them that he would keep 
the whiskey dealers away from them but he had not done as he promised 
and they supposed he had so much great business to attend to that 
he could not find time to attend to there small concerns, and now 
it was to late to do them any good. We told them that we did not 
think it was told and that we wold try to let there Great Father 
know their situation and ask him to extend some relief to them, we also 
told them that they had a great many friends away to the east who 
loved the red man and who were trying to help them, &c. After spending about three days at this place and collecting what 
information are could from the Indians, visiting them at their lodges 
and collecting from the Agent and other white residents at the place (of 
whom there are about twenty) all the knowledge of the manners and customs 
of the Indians which they were able to give in so Short a time as will as thru 
suggestions of the most judicious method to be adapted for their 
benefit, we left for Dabuque, a distance of 100 miles across the prairie 
We were well satisfied in taking this journey, We then went aboard a 
Steam boat, and landed at, Burlington on the Misissippi about 30 
miles from Salem Henry Co. the principle Settlement of Friends in Iowa 
And went immediately out to Salem and learning that there was a treaty 
about to be made with the Sacs and Foxes for the remainder of their lands 
we started the next day for the Agency a distance of about 50 miles from 
Salem and reached in time to hear the Speaches of all their principle Chiefs 
as will as that of Governor Chambers of Iowa. Who was authorised to 
treat with them. The whole tribe was collected to the numbers of 2200 or 
2800 men women and children. Their appearance was much better than 
that of the Winnebagas. And yet the same may be said of them 
that they are fast waisting away by the hands of the whiskey sellers and 
other pernicious effects of their acquaintance with the whites The Governor treated us very kindly, spoke freely and feelingly 
of their situation and we thought him will disposed towards the Indians 
and using his endeavours to prevent the numerous frauds which are 
practiced upon these poor ignorant creatures, but he finds it impossible 
to prevent the whiskey sellers from introducing their poison amongst them 
The licenced Traders and Fur company are sapping every thing from 
them that they can get hold of. We had no opportunity of talking with many 
of the Indians it being so busy a time with them. The Treaty is con- 
cluded on. The Indians are to receive one million of Dollars and a 
part of their debts are to be paid over and above this sum and to leave this part 
of the country within three years and settle on lands south west of the 
Missouri River. We intend leaving this afternoon and to get foreward to Wesport 
as fast as possible so as to be amongst the Indians south of Missouri and Arkansas St Louis 10th mo. 17th 1842 and 2nd day of the week 
we reached St Louis this , in good health 
We intend stopping a day or two in this place in order 
to negotiate some few concerns and then go up the 
River to Wesport. My dear friend J. D. Land is writing 
at this time to Dr. Tobey of Providence. We have so 
far been favoured to get along to 
a good degree of satisfaction to . Thee 
will please accept for thyself and family our 
love and desire the same may be 
remembered to all our dear friends in N. York 
Thy assured friend. Samuel Tayor Jr J. D. Lang & S. Taylor Jr. to make report--N. York Com. 
invited to attend--1843 Providence 4 Mo. 25th 1843 My dear friend 
Mahlon Day I have just received 
a letter from our friend John D. Lang saying 
that he and Sam. Taylor jr desire to meet the 
joint Committee of your Y. Meeting and ours 
at this place next week. Will some of you attend 
to receive their report of their journey? Our Quarterly Meeting is held at East Greenwich 
(12 miles from here) on 4th and 5th days. Meeting 
for Sufferings 4th day afternoon. School Committee 
at the School house on 6th days. We should be glad 
of your company at these meetings. Third days 
would perhaps afford as much leisure as any 
day of the week to attend to the Indian concern--but it may perhaps be attended 
to in the evening of one or two days. You will 
please suit your own convenience about coming 
and we will endeavor to conform to it. Please write me when we may expect you. 
Affectionately thy friend 
Samuel Boyd Tobey Reposition 
to send 
Memorial 
to 
Congress Providence 11 Mo. 4th 1843 My beloved friend 
Richard Mott Thy favour of the 28th ult. with 
a proposed essay of a Memorial to Congress has been received 
and laid before the Committee of our Meetg. for Sufferings in 
conjunction with the Com. of our Yearly Meetg. on the concern 
for the Indians located west of the Mississippi. I am 
directed by them to inform your Committee that, after a 
time of careful and solid deliberation on the subject, way 
does not open with us to adopt the essay as extended and 
charged by you. That which we forwareded to you 
was prepared by the Com. of our Meetg. for Sufferings together 
with the Committee on Indian concerns, among whom 
were our friends John D. Lang and Samuel Taylor jr , and 
the practical points were stated in such a manner and 
extended as far as they believed accorded with the facts that 
had come to their knowledge and which in the guarded 
manner in which they were set forth they felt prepared 
and willing to endeavour to substantiate before Congress 
should their friends desire them to visit Washington and 
present the Memorial; as it was intimated to them would 
probably be the case. Under these circumstances, and with a desire that 
we may be favored to unite in a document to be laid before 
the General Government, if you are not easy to adopt the 
essay we have prepared, (which with a few verbal alteration 
we now again forward to you) we would respectfully propose 
a conference on the Committees of the two Meetings for Sufferings 
and in order that this may be effectual our Committee made 
no report to our Meeting which met today--but, to give us 
time to act in unison with you the Meeting adjourned 
to meet again in this place on third day the fifth of 
next month. Please to give us early information of 
the course you would propose should now be pursued 
in the case. Affectionately thy assured friend 
Samuel Boyd Tobey Baltimore Committee on Indian concerns, with Laws of 
Congress respecting Liquors, &c. 1847 REGULATIONS. THE attention of all the officers and agents of the Government in the Indian ocuntry, and of all per- 
sons residing of entering therein, under license or permission, is called to the 20th and 21st sections of 
the act of June 30th, 1834, and the the 2d section of an act, approved the 3d of March, ultimo, the great 
object of which is to save our Indian poulation from the ruinous effects of the use of intoxicating liquors. These laws impose upon commanding officers of military posts, and superintendents of Indian affairs, 
agents, and sub-agents, the following duties: 1st. To cause promptly to be prosecuted, any and all persons guilty of giving, or in any way 
disposing of, spirituous liquor or wine to an Indian, in the Indian country, or of introducing, or attempt- 
ing to introduce, the same therein; such persons, in the one case, being liable to a fine of five hundred 
dollars and imprisonment for two years; and, in the other, to a fine of three hundred dollars and impri- 
sonment for one year. 2d. To seach for any spirituous liquor or wine which there is reason to believe has been, or is 
about being, introduced into the Indian country, which is not intended as a part of the military supplies 
authorized by this Department, and, if found, to destroy it; and to seize upon the property of the per- 
son guilty of the offence, with which the same may be found, and deliver it over to the proper officer, to 
be proceeded against by libel in the proper court; such property being liable to forfeiture, one half to the 
use of the informer, and the other to that of the United States. It is also the duty of any person, in any 
way in the employment of the Government--and the same may be done by any Indian--to destroy any 
spirituous liquor or wine found in the Indian country. 3d. If the person guilty of introducing, or of attempting to introduce, spirituous liquor or wine into 
the Indian country, be a trader, it is the duty of the proper superintendent, agent or sub-agent, immediately 
to revoke his license and to put his bond in suit. 4th. To destroy any distillery in the Indian country for the manufacture of ardent spirits, and to 
cause to be promptly prosecuted any person or persons who may erect or carry on such distillery, in 
order to recover the fine of one thousand dollars prescribed for such offence. It is also provided that in all prosecutions for the offences mentioned in the first of the foregoing heads, 
Indians shall be competent witnesses. All military officers in the Indian country, and the superintendents, agents, and sub-agents of the 
Indian Department, are required and enjoined to be vigilant and active in the execution of the duties 
imposed upon them by these laws, which are appended hereto for their more particular information as to 
the nature and extent of their respective duties; and it is expected that all other persons in the employ- 
ment of the Government, or who are licensed or permitted to be in the Indian country, will, on every 
occasion, aid those officers and agents in the most effectual manner in their power. Any ommission on the part of the officers of, and persons employed in the Indian Department, particu- 
larly, or on the part of those licensed or permitted to be in the Indian country, to do all that can justly 
and fairly be done to put an end to the infamous traffic with the Indians, in or through intoxicating liquors, 
will be regarded as good cause for their removal in the one case, or in the other for the revocation of their 
licences or permits. Now that Indians are made competent witnesses in our courts, for the purpose of further enabling 
the Government to destroy an evil which has been so destructive of their best interests and happiness, it 
is expected that the chiefs and others, who desire welfare and prosperity of their people, will co- 
operate with the agents of the Government in arresting this great source of mischief to the Indian race. 
Those who fail to do so by every proper means in their power cannot be regarded as desiring or caring 
for either. By the 3d section of the act of the 3d ultimo, it is provided that No annuities, or moneys, or goods, 
shall be paid or distributed to the Indians while they are under the influence of any description of in- 
toxicating liquor; nor while there are good and sufficient reasons for the officers or agents, whose duty 
it may be to make such payments or distribution, for believing that there is any species of intoxicating 
liquor within convenient reach of the Indians; nor until the chiefs and head men of the tribe shall 
have pledged themselves to use all their influence, and to make all proper exertions, to prevent the in- 
troduction and sale of such liquor in their country. W. L. MARCY . 
 WAR DEPARTMENT, April 13, 1847. AN ACT to regulate trade and intercourse with the Indian tribes, and to preserve peace on the frontiers, approved June 30th, 1834. SEC. 20. And be it further enacted, That if any person shall sell, exchange, or give, barter, or 
dispose of, any spirituous liquor or wine to an Indian, (in the Indian country,) such person shall forfeit 
and pay the sum of five hundred dollars; and if any person shall introduce, or attempt to introduce, any 
spirituous liquor or wine into the Indian country, except such supplies as shall be necessary for the offi- 
cers of the United States and troops of the service, under the direction of the War Department, such 
person shall forfeit and pay a sum not exceeding three hundred dollars; and if any superintendent of 
Indian affairs, Indian agent, or sub-agent, or commanding officer of a military post, has reason to suspect, 
or is informed, that any white person or Indian is about to introduce, or has introduced, any spirituous 
liquor or wine into the Indian country, in violation of the provisions of this section, it shall be lawful for 
such superintendent, Indian gent, or sub-agent, or military officer, agreeably to such regulations as may 
be established by the President of the United States, to cause the boats, stores, packages, and places of de- 
posite of such person to be searched, and if any such spirituous liquor or wine is found, the goods, boats, 
packages, and peltries of such persons shall be seized and delivered to the proper officer, and shall be pro- 
ceeded against by libel in the proper court, and forfeited, one half to the use of the informer, and the other 
half to the use of the United States; and if such person is a trader, his license shall be revoked and his bond 
put in suit. And it shall moreover be lawful for any person in the service of the United States, or for any 
Indian, to take and destroy any ardent spirits or wine found in the Indian country, excepting military sup- 
plies as mentioned in this section. SEC. 21. And be it further enacted, That if any person whatever shall, within the limits of the 
Indian country, set up or continue any distillery for manufacturing ardent spirits, he shall forfeit and pay a 
penalty of one thousand dollars; and it shall be the duty of the superintendent of Indian affairs, Indian 
agent, or sub-agent, within the limits of whose agency the same shall be set up or continued, forthwith to 
destroy and break up the same; and it shall be lawful to employ the military force of the United States 
in executing that duty. AN ACT to amend an act entitled An act to provide for the better organization of the Department of Indian Affairs,and an act en- 
titled An act to regulate trade and intercourse with the Indian tribes, and to preserve peace on the frontiers,approved 
March 3d, 1847. SEC. 2. And be it further enacted, That the twentieth section of the act to regulate trade and inter- 
course with the Indian tribes, and to preserve peace on the frontiers, approved June thirtieth, eighteen 
hundred and thirty-four, be, and the same is hereby so aamended, that, in addition to the fines thereby imposed, 
any person who shall sell, exchange or barter, give, or dispose of, any spirituous liquor or wine to an Indian, 
in the Indian country, or who shall introduce, or attempt to introduce, any spirituous liquor or wine into the 
 Indian country, except such supplies as may be necessary for officers of the United States and the troops 
of the service, under the direction of the War Department, such person, on conviction thereof, before the 
proper district court of the United States, shall in the former case be subject to imprisonment for a period 
not exceeding two years, and in the latter case not exceeding one year, as shall be prescribed by the court, 
and under the twentieth section of the act to regulate trade and intercourse with the Indian tribes, and to 
preserve peace on the frontiers, approved June thirtieth, eighteen hundred and thirty-four, to which this is 
an ammendment, Indians, shall be competent witnesses. Baltimore 5 Mo 20, 1847 
To the Committee on Indian Concerns 
of New York Yearly Meeting 
Dear Friends At a Meeting of the Indian 
Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting held this day. 
In reply to a communication addressed to 
the Secretary of War, giving him some account 
of the past history & present condition 
of our Establishment on the Kanzas river 
and requesting from the Department a 
copy of the Laws & Regulations for preventing 
the introduction of Spirituous liquors into 
the Indian Country Adopted at the last 
session of Congress. A letter was received 
from Wm. McGill office of Indian Affairs 
enclosing several copies of the Document 
referred to. The Clerk is directed to forward 
a copy of the same to our superintendent 
& teacher at our Establishment and also 
to the Indian Committees of New England, 
New York, Ohio & Indiana with a copy 
of this minute Signed on behalf of the Committee 
Richard H. Thomas 
Clerk Report respecting Indians in New York, 
by Thomas Wells . 1848 No. 1 The Oneidas residing in Madison County 
number about 150 situated on two tracts of 
land about 3 miles apart, and their whole 
possessions in land is estimated at one mile 
square, some eight years since the State 
Legislature had their lands surveyed and 
divided into individual portions, giving 
to each a deed. This division amounted to 
about 7 1/2 acres to each, men, women & children. 
Since that time, most of them have sold their 
possesions and emigrated to Canada, 
Green Bay & other Western locations, joining 
other tribes, some of those emigrants, mostly 
aged women not feeling satisfied with their 
new homes, have returned, & are now living 
in old, deserted cabins, & are in a destitute 
condition, dependant on their neighbors for 
a subsistance. The young & industrious 
that remain on their reservations are imp- 
roving their lands, erecting good buildings, 
planting orchards of choice fruits & their 
farms may be estimated from 7 1/2 to 75 
Acres. They raise wheat & other grain, 
also potatoes & all kinds of garden vegetables 
for their own consumption & source for sale. 
They have some few houses & wagons; but 
their farms are bery bare of stock of all kinds. They have also 6 newly built frame houses 
of good size, divided into several apartments, 
the inmates of which live very respectably. No. 2 Some of the young men have acquired a 
little knowledge of the Mechanic branches, 
which they apply for their own convenience, 
but they depend on the culture of the soil 
for support. In both settlements there 
are about 50 children of an age suitable 
to attend school. There is a day school 
taught by a female, that has been in oper- 
ation about six months, with about 30 
children, of both sexes, including 16 adults. 
Also a first day school of pupils, from the 
ages of 6 to 55 which promises to be useful 
to both the old & young. The education 
of these people has been very much neg- 
lected. When about to leave their settlements 
they deputed one of their number, who 
could speak broken english, to call 
upon me & inform me on behalf of the 
rest, that they were much pleased with 
my visit. That it reminded them of 
those days, when Friends labored among them, 
and that they had often been sorry that 
Friends left them; but they could not blame 
them, for Indian so slow to give up the custom 
of their ancestors. The Onondagas in Onondaga County 
number about 300 and occupy a tract of land 
about 3 1/2 miles square, which is held in common 
each having the privalege to improve, as much 
as he shall have cause for, on any part of 
the reservation; but not to encroach on his 
neighbors possession. Their farms are estim- 
ated, from 5 to 300 Acres, most of which appear 
to be under pretty good cultivation, they have 
some few Orchards, and they raise several kinds 
of grain, and vegetables in use in that section. No. 3 Their stock of cattle is estimated at 250, viz. 
70 horses, 50 sheep & a considerable number of 
hogs; 30 wagons and 17 frame barns &c. There 
are 48 families, 14 of them live in comfortable frame 
houses, and the neatness of some of their buildings, 
and the improvement around their dwellings 
are quite respectable, a stranger would not 
suspect, that he was on an Indian reservation. The furniture in some house is 
quite costly, and considerable systen is obser- 
ved in their domestic arrangements, but 
this is not characteristic of them as a nation. There are 100 children that ought to go to 
school, but the schooling of their children 
is much neglected; they have a good school 
house and a day school in opperation, but 
not well sustained by the natives. A few Mechanics amongst the young 
men, but only one follows it as a business. The Methodists have labored among the 
Oneidas & Onondagas, with some success; 
a missionary is employed to labor among 
the natives of both reservations, and the Pagan 
party meet once a week for the exercise of 
what they consider religious worship, which is 
conducted in some solemnity, and the people 
are exhorted to observe temperance, honesty 
and strict integrity in keeping up the traditions 
of their forefathers. On the Cattaraugus reservation which 
embraces a tract land about 5 1/2 miles square 
in Cattaraugus County, there are four rem- 
nants of tribes besides senecas, which are 
privaleged to live promiscuously through the 
nation and enjoy equal privaleges to the soil 
with any of the nation; No. 4 The whole of the Indian population on this 
reservation is estimated at 1500, which are 
divided into 275 families, and their farms are 
estimated from small lots up to 200 acres; 
from which they raise wheat & other grain 
with vegetables sufficient for their own cons- 
umption and some for sale. Most of their Orchards 
are young trees of a good selection, having 
an eye to the eastern markets. They have up- 
wards of 36 frame dwellings, many of the newly built 
ones, are of good size, and much taste is dis- 
played in finishing them in good style, and 
is the work of the natives; also 34 frame 
barns with other outbuildings. Their improvements along the roads 
has the appearance of considerable industry, 
refined taste and enterprise. Their farms are 
generally pretty well stocked with horses, 
cows, sheep and hogs; and they own unwards 
of 90 wagons including some light ones; 
17 men follow differnet mechanical branches 
on the reservation and upwards of 20 have learning 
sufficient to transact business with themselves 
and the nation. About 250 children of 
an age to attend school, 3 schools have 
been taught most of the year, but this last 
winter in consequence of much sickness throug- 
hout the nation, the schools have been unusually 
small; upward of 60 deaths have occurred 
since 10th month, but is now much abated. Two of the above named schools are day 
schools, taught by presbyterians; the other a 
boarding school for females under the care of the 
Hicksites, with an average number of 24 girls 
who are taught domestic work as well as the use 
of books; a very important part of an Indian education. No. 5 On the Allegany reservation there are about 
900, including nearly 100 Onondagas and Oneidas, 
who are located on two reservations about 14 
miles apart; the main body of land is estimated 
at 40 square miles, the small tract of land 
is a mile square, called Cornplanters reser- 
vation situated on the Allegany river, in the 
State of Pennsylvania, and is considered the 
private property of Cornplanter heirs; the land 
belonging to the nation also lies on the Allegany 
river in Cattaraugus County, and is held as 
Common Stock; on both reservations, there are 
about 150 families, 50 of whom live in frame 
houses, 14 of which have been built within 
five years and are larger and better finished 
than those preciously erected. Considerable 
domestic arrangement & cleanliness is observable 
in some families, and the furniture suited to 
their condition; this domestic economy, no 
doubt is the result of missionary labor; 
They also have 25 frame barns and some 
orchards of natural fruit; Their farms 
are from small lots to 100 acres, but the aver- 
age would not exceed 20 acres; The men 
depend on the sale of lumber, to the neglect 
of their farming opperations, and it is thought 
this nation does not raise sufficient for their 
own consumption. They have about 100 
horses including ponies; 250 cattle, 120 
sheep acres a pretty good supply of hogs &c. some 
mechanics but none make it a business. There are not less than 300 children of 
an age to attend school and 4 day schools 
in which about 100 children receive instruction, No. 6 many of them can read and write pretty well, 
and have considerable acquaintance with Arith- 
metic, Geography and composition. Two of 
the above named schools are under the care of 
the Presbyterians and must be considered in a 
flourishing condition; The other two under 
the care of Friends of Philadelphia, sometimes 
taught by natives as an inducement to them 
to apply their education for the benefit of their 
own people, but this experiment does not 
meet with the success as was anticipated. 
A Friend is employed to have the general 
oversight on this tribe, and occasionally 
teaches one of the schools, as is considered as an 
indefatigable laborer; frequently visiting the 
families and laboring with individuals 
on the subject of intemperance, industry and 
honesty; and his labors in this way are held 
in high estimation by the Missionarys and 
respectable settlers around the reservation, 
as a school teacher, pursues a steady course 
amidst many discouragements. The Presbyterians have been laboring 
among the Cattaraugus and Allegany Indians 
for several years, have 4 separate congregations 
and many church members, and undoubt- 
edly have done much in reforming their 
moral and religious habits; there was 
much sickness on the Cornplanters reservation. The Tuscarora tribe are situated on 
Lake Ontario, Niagara County, a most delight- 
ful location, soil fertile, and beautiful scene- 
ry; their reservation including two separate 
lots tho. joined together measures 6249 Acres, which is No. 7 held in common, with the restriction that 
now shall cut off the timber for sale. 
There are many good farms on this reservation, 
some men have upwards of 50 acres in fall 
wheat; 20 in spring wheat, besides Oats, corn 
and potatoes with other vegetables. There is in the reservation 200 acres of meadow, 
and some of their farms number 200 acres 
but the average is thought would be about 
40 acres; They own about 60 Ploughs, and 
have many Orchards of grafted fruits, the 
work of natives; There are about 300 
who are divided into families of 50 each, 
living in log houses except 10 who have frame 
and one has a store house of considerable 
size. 14 frame barms a meeting and 
school house, all the work of the natives; They have about 22 wagons, 150 horses 
including ponies, 100 milck cows, and not 
less than 250 neat cattle, 200 sheep and 
500 hogs; As husbandmen this tribe must 
be considered in a triving condition. They have about 100 children of suita- 
ble ages to attend school, and a day 
school is taught by a female with an 
average of 50 children of both sexes. The Presbyterians have labored with this tribe 
for 50 years, commenced with them in a wild 
state and have now about 60 church members 
and no Pagan party; several of the middle 
aged men have education sufficient for com- 
mon purposes, but very few of the women 
can read and not one write; as housekeepers 
they are behing the other tribes, owing to their devoting No. 8 both time and talents to fancy bead word for 
a little cash to supply their pressing wants. 
They have very little furniture in their 
houses and both their persons and families 
sustain a great loss by their misapplication 
of time & talent. The Tonawanda's location 
in Genesee County are reduced to about 
450, and their reservation which the Ogden Co. 
claim, is estimated at 12,800 acres; they 
raise wheat and other small grain, and 
their farms are estimated form small lots 
to 75 acres, some of which look promising. 
They have a few frame houses and barns, 
but their improvements every way have been 
much impeded by the unsettled state which 
this company have thrown them into for the last 
10 years. There are not less than 40 fami- 
lies of white people who have procured land of this 
Company, and settled on the reservation 
to the great annoyance of the rightful 
proprietors of the soil. The Baptist society have had a labor 
school in opperation for 20 years, and 800 
Indians youth of both sexes have received 
instruction in labor as well as the use of books, 
and the beneficial effects of such instruction 
is very apparent in the midst of all their discou- 
ragement; I could not ascertain their 
stock & without raising their suspicions; 
after having an interview with their Chief and 
leading men and hearing their grievances, 
thought it most prudent to leave them with the 
hope that they may become more settled in their minds. No. 9 I spent 33 days on the reservations of those 
six remnants of tribes still residing in this state; 
visited them from house to house, eat at their 
tables and lodged under their roofs; sat with 
them in their meetings, Pagan, Political, and 
religious; visited their schools, heard the chil- 
dren read examined in Arithmetic 
and Geography and saw their writing and 
composition, distributed tracts amongst them 
and conversed with them on the opperations 
of the two Spirits which works on the mind 
and produces good or bad results; they 
listened with attention and appeared more 
than usually thoughtful. I also called 
divers meetings with both Pagan an Christian 
parties, conversed with them on their moral 
and religious obligations towards each other 
and towards God their Father & Preserver 
and God the son as their savious and Redeemer 
and God the Holy Ghost as their visitor, to 
reprove, instruct, and comfort them; and 
I have reason to believe that there are many 
honest and upright intentions amongst the 
pagans, but I cannot help lamenting over 
their strong prejudices against an acquaintan- 
ce with the content of the bible. Many of 
both parties expressed their unity with me 
and what I had said to them and promised 
to think about it in my absence, 
said they were much pleased to hear about 
their red brothers living in the far west, 
and about the good schools they had for 
the education of their children; hoped that No. 10 the Missionaries would not grow tired 
for Indian children not fast to learn and 
sometimes no ear to hear good words, sometimes 
no eye to see the good it will be to him to 
learn to talk, read, write and work like 
white man; they were very glad we 
learned them to work, as well as read for 
these Indian children learned to live as well 
as think; many said my visit had 
reminded them of many years past, when 
Friends labored among them, and wished 
I would talk with the Friends of New York 
an Philadelphia, to see if they could not 
help them in establishing a manual 
labor boarding school, for it was just 
what they needed, and these Indian 
would progress faster in the path of 
civilization, and with tears in their 
eyes, expressed a hope that they should hear 
from me again. The Senecas seemed quite disposed 
to adopt the form of government recom- 
mended by the State Legislature, and I 
was glad to find a number of educated 
men among them capable of carrying out 
the laws and regulations for the general good 
of the nation. On each reservation I found 
some industrious and enterprising men, 
who had houses and lands to rent, and 
had also comfortable homes for their own 
families; and in this way the white men 
mingle among them, sometimes to their adva- 
ntage; bust mostly to their disadvantage; 
it is in this channel that dealers in dry-goods No. 11 and spirituous liquors creep in among them 
and do them much injury by their example 
and precept. The men have generally 
adopted the American style of dress, and 
speak and understand our language, tho 
but little acquaited with books. The education of the girls has been much 
neglected, which accounts for their shyness 
and adherence to their ancient customs, 
both in style of dress, language &c. yet I found 
some few in each reservation, having had the 
advantages of a missionary education, 
They could read, and were cleanly in their persons 
and in their houses; but where the women 
have confined their attention to basket making 
and fancy bead work, they were very poor 
housekeepers and enjoyed fewer conveniences 
and comforts at home. The schools under the control of the Baptists 
and Presbyterian societies, have been supported 
with funds from the civilization appropriation 
by the General Government. Those under 
the control of the Methodists by funds from 
the State, within the last 
two years the state has built them several 
school houses, and appropriated a stipulated sum for 
Teachers saleries. In every nation, I thought 
I could discover the kind of labor that had 
been principally bestowed upon them, 
wether religious, moral or pagan. The general disposition of their minds as well as 
things around them, was a sufficient index 
of the kind of Labor that they had received from 
their White brothers and sisters. Temperance No. 12 societies have been formed in most of the 
nations; but still there are many very 
intemerate ones of both sexes, and thus it will 
be until grace changes their hearts, preserving 
them from the influence of like temptations 
of which they are much exposed to. I pray the Father of all good that He may send 
more Christian laborers among them, who 
shall feel bound to teach them Christian 
Principles and Practices and thus acquaint 
them with the contents of the bible, and the 
influence of the good and bad spirit 
which work upon their minds and lead them 
to work of vice or virtue, for it is by this 
kind of instruction, much will depend 
upon their prosperity in temporal and spirit- 
ual happiness. Treasurer's Report. Indian Come. pr a/c with John Barrow Treasurer. D. 1817 
6 m 20 To Cash p. Amos Ruthburn 180-- 9. 24 To Cash p. I. Neelsan advance to Ind. 30-- To Cash p. Sam Robens board of L. 8-- 12. 19. To Cash p. for Muslin &c for M Doxtater 1.56 20 To Cash p. Ja. Mott advan. to P Hunt &c 44-- 1818 27 To Cash p. Tho. Eddy sundry advan. 49.23 4. 16 To Cash p. Jn. Murray expen. M 23.62 14 To Cash p. A Rathbone 200-- 18 To Cash p. of Jn . & Tho. Dean 125-- 5. 20 To Cash p. M Doxater Expense 34.56 22 To Cash p. of Caleb Macomber 
and others 100-- To Cash p. R & J Walker 25-- To Balance in my hand 575.76 $1396.73 Dr. Interest Acc. 1817 
6 mo. 20 On $180.00 for 11 mo & 5 dys. 6 pr.ct. $ 10.05 9 mo 24 On 38.00 for 8 mo 1 dy 6 pr.ct. 1.52 12 mo 22 On 94.79 for 5 mo 3 dys 6 pr.ct. 2.41 4 mo 151818 
 On 348.62 for 1 mo 10 dys 6 pr.ct. 2.32 Balance 55 00 71 30 6 to 25 of 5 mo. 1818 Cr. 1817 
5. 20 By Balance Cash year 1161.73 1818 
5. 4 By In. on Bond from NYork 180-- By Balance of Interest 55-- $1396.73 Contra 575.76 Bond of the M. of New York 3000-- Interest Acc. Cr. 1817 
5 mo 20 On $1161.73 for 1 year & 5 dys 6 pr.ct. $70.67 5 mo 4 On 180.-- for 1 year & 21 dys 6 pr.ct. 0.63 $71.30 Indian Committee pr. a/c with John Barrow D. 1818 
6 mo 1 To Cash p. E. Websters Dft. $50-- 8. 4. To Cash p. A Rathbones Dft. 75.75 9.8. To Cash p. Ann Shipley sundry supplies 47.-- 1819 
1. 1. To Cash p. Eph. Websters Dft. 15.50 3. 5. To Cash p. R. Mott printing 33.57 5. 20. To Cash p. Acos Rathbones Dft. 35-- 28. To Cash p. Acos Rathones Dft. 300.-- 8. 7. To Cash p. Sam Wood Books Seneca Ind. 5.44 1820 
2. 19. To Cash p. Acos Rathbones Dft. 142.-- 6. 20 To Cash p. Cha. Willis 7.94 7. 3. To Cash p. Tho. Eddy for sund. 38.50 To Balance to 732.65 $1483.35 Cr. 1818 
5 m 28 By Balance p a/c setled with Com. 575.76 7. 1. By Cash on Bond of Indian Com. 500-- 1819 
5. 17. By Cash Int. on Bond to M. Meet. 150.-- 1820 
8. 4. By Cash Int. on Bond to M. Meet. 150.-- Interest moved in above at 6 pc 
to 12 m. 1. 1820 107.59 $1483.35 1820 
12 m. 1. By Balance due Indian Com. $732.65 D. Int. Acc.--y. m. 1818. 6.m.7. $50. 2.6. $7.50 8.4. $75.75 2.3.27. 10.56 1819 9.8. 47.-- 2.2.23. 6.29 1.1. 15.50 1.11.-- 1.78 3.5. 33.57 1.8.26. 3.52 5.20. 35.-- 1.6.11. 3.20 28. 300.-- 1.6.3. 27.15 8.7. 5.44 1.3.24. 42 1820 7.19 142.00 9.12. 6.66 6.20. 7.94 5.11. 20 7.3. 38.50 4.28. 3.94 Balance 107.59 $175.81 Cr.--y. m. d. $575 2.6.3. 86.53 500 2.5.-- 72.50 150 1.6.14. 13.85 150 0.3.27. 2.93 $175.81 Mo. Meetings Bond $2500--drawing 
Int. at 6pc. 
Errors Expected New York. 1m 1. 1820 
John Barrow 5 Mo 22 1816 by Cash of Joseph Frost C 
1-- hay $80 
00.40 Mo 1814 
1 yoke oxen 93.00 Cash of J. Frost 16.00 1815 
paid order to J. Grant 250.00 Mo 1816 
paid order to J. Grant 50.00 12 Mo 1816 
paid order to J. Grant 100.00 25th In Mo 1817 
paid order to J. Grant 180.34 1818 
paid my order 200.00 6 Mo 4 1818 
paid my order 75.75 2 Mo 1819 
paid by J. Hunt. 13.00 4 Mo 
paid by J. Hunt. 3.00 5 Mo 
paid order to J. Murry 35.00 5 Mo 
paid order J. Grant 300.00 9 Mo 9. 1820 
paid order to F. Handford 142.00 3 Mo 1821 
paid order to Clark 57.85 9 Mo 1821 cash of Phlena Hunt 15.00 6 Mo 1822 
cash of J. Hunt 2.50 1607 84 General Commtte D. 
To A Rothbun 5 Mo 1814 To Driving Cattle to 
oneida $00.75 To of hay $ 7.20 3 B Corn 12/-- 45.11 5 B potatoes 1.92 1 yoke oxen 70.75 Carry seed to oneida 5.6 Cash paid David Horsham 13.00 1815 Cash paid David Horsham 16.00 To Indians 4 Mo 1815 
To paid for M. 5.50 paid for Sichry 
Indians & fish Creek I. 23.50 5 Mo 
To 1 yoke oxen 93.00 To Cash for Expens 19. 100 1.00 Cash paid Nancy Smith 2.56 To Wm. Lurhrey scholl 
2 Month 1.4 $21 47.25 Cash paid sundry 
Nails &c 2.84. Cash for shingles 6.00 Cash for Carpenter 
work 5.00 To Mendam at Onida 2.00 Cash paid Aron smith 5.00 1816 for Rupey--Oni. paid for Mindry 
cart for Indus 15.00 for 280 D g flun 46.87. To 2 Days spent in 
Guley 3.00 Carry looms to Indus 2.00 Cash paid for flaxseed 4.00 18 1/2 B potatoes 4/ 8.25 Transportation 2.00 1 Day servis 1.00 19 1/2 B potatoes 11. 75. Cash for Building Chiagrory 8.00 4 Day servis 4.00 Indus 
4 Days 2.00 1 Day servis 1.50 2 Days servis 3.00 1 Wheat 3.00 A smith 
2 reeds at 16/ 4.00 60 D wool 4/ 30.00 To paid A Nun Nop 
for flaxseed 2.19 1 Day servis 1.00 401 02 10 Mo 1816 To plow Irons $6.00 To 1 reed & 3.00 Cash paid Nancy 
Smith 
for teaching Ind 2.50 2. Mo 
1817 by 
request of Comittee 6.00 1 Days servis 1.00 paid Mary Doxstater 
for last years 18.00 68 B potoes 6/ 51.00 To wintering 2 yoke 
Oxen 12 24.00 6 1/4 B. Corn 24/ x 18.75 2 Day 3.00 paid Dressing Cloth 13.2 Mary Doxstater 6.00 2 B potatos 6/ 1.50 Beans .56 2 D. 3.00 Daughter servis 3.00 2 D Service 3.00 potatoes .38 5 Day at Onida 12/ 7.50 Oxen & yoke 75.00 2 D Servis 3.00 1.50 2 D servis 2.00 20 lb flax & 1 bushel 6.13 3 pair Cords 6/ 2.25 40 lb wool 4/ 20.00 paid J. Clark for 
wheels Rub 
3. 1 
& repiring 4 wheels 11.25 Cash paid Tranportig 
4 Girls to albny 20.00 2 Day service 2.00 Cash paid for 
Leashry school 
to A 24 Cash paid L 
Mott 5.00 Cash paid J 
Hunt 2.00 paid Boost for 
schollery 2.00 1 1/4 Day servis 1.50 336 34 Contin'd 3. Mo. 1818 To Cash paid N Smith $10 To Cash paid S. Snyder 2.50 To Cash paid Mary Doxtater 21.90 4 four foot Wheels 36/ 18.00 2 large Wheels 24/ 6.00 to paid Dresery Coth 
for 3. Indians 
43 1/4 yards 13.27 To Cash paid Turnips 
seed 3.25 paid for weaving Cloth 6.30 To Cash paid Bhada 3.00 To Cash paid Selena 3.00 To Cash paid J. Hunt 
for lau. pork 
& wheat 39.95 21 1/2 B peas 8/ 
3 B peas 9/ 29.87 1/2 22 1/2 B oats 3/ 8. 43 44 36 3/4 B potaes 2/0 9.22 19 1/2 B Wheat 14/ 34.13 8 3/4 B Corn 16/ 17.50 2 B flaxseed 16/ 4.00 Beans at 62 1/2 31 47 lb flax 4 6.50 30 lb wool 4/ 15.00 wool 2.16 to paid for Garden seed 4.84 To paid Schoolery boy 75 To paid Mary Doxtater 3.00 5 B seed 12/ 7.50 To paid 1 yoke oxen 80.00 To paid Miller Janson 
1 yoke oxen 105.00 To Cash paid 2 Chains 8.00 To Cash paid for 1 
yoke oxen 80.00 To 10 B potaes 3/ 3.75 1 1/2 B peas 8/ 1.50 To 12 Days servus 
with the 10/ 14.50 15 of 5 Mo 1819 To 1 peck Corn & 
 pen 75 To Cash to Mary 7.00 To Cash 8 1 yoke of 
oxen 80.00 651 50 Contin'd 5 Mo 1819 10 lb Gun No 8. $6.56 45 1/4 lb wool 4/-- 
14 1/2 wool --4 29.62 1 Chain 4.00 To Cash for Corn 6.00 To Yoke & Irons 2.75 To tools for Onondaga 
to webster 19.30 To 2 Wheels 7.00 To paid Mary Doxtater 3.8 To paid Mary Doxtader 
for the tribe 2.00 potates 1.00 2 B. flaxseed 10/ 2.50 2 B. flaxseed 9/ 2.25 2 B. oats 2/ .50 4 B. potatoes 2/ 1.00 to Cash in 
1820 in 2.66 to Cash paid M. Doxtater 2.37 1/2 to Cardng 44 lb wool 3.52 To Dresing 25 1/2, 2/6 
 2/6 1.88 1821 To 2 Sheep 
Polly Doxstater 4.00 To paid E Webster 3.00 4 B peas 6/ 3.00 2 B peas 6/ 1.25 1822 6. B 2/ 1.50 118.71 641.50 336.34 461.02 $1557.57 Error in 
adding 28 55 $1586 12 1607.84 
1586.12 
$21.72 8th mo. 21th 
1823 Committee on the Indian concern for 
New York Yearly Meeting To splitting and drawing rails to fence 
house lot garding and pasture which 
was to have been done by the committee 
in our bargain but was not 11 25 To six pounds of nails 0 75 11th mo 8th Cash paid for cutting sawlogs 1 37 for drawing do 0 56 10th Lumber purchasd 13 46 12 &14 Team to draw lumber 2 0 20 500 brick 2 75+ Team to draw brick 1 0 50 lb of nails 4 38 43 bushels of lime 3 75 Team to draw lime 1 50 41 lb of nails 3 71 Labour tending mason and some other work 5 0 Team to draw lumber 5 days 5 0 Masons bill 6 0 Carpenters bill 58 1/4 days 58 75 14 weeks board of workmen at 10 5. per week 17 50 Lathces and hangings 3 50 mo. 3rd 
1824 Lumber purchased 8 25 Carpenters bill 7 1/3 days 7 75 his board 1 38 159.61 10th mo. 28th To cellar dug and stoned by the job $C stone drawn lime found 45 00 finished 26th 
of 11 mo. board of workman 17 50 hired hand 3 days 1 88 29th box of Glass and a half 4 84 2 lb of putty 0 25 paint and oil 1 00 10 pounds of cut nails at yd per pound 0 83+ 1 six light sash 0 27 4th mo 27th 
1825 30 lb of 3d nails 2 50 20 lb 4d do 1 44 20 lb 12d do. 1 44 35 lb 2 2 55 35 lb 8d do 2 55 10th mo. 4th 4 lb of cut nails 0 33 1 lb of white sead 0 17 8 lb of putty 0 75 100 cwt cut Iron for Manttetrees crane 
eyes cranes and other uses 6 00 3 locks 1 88 10th mo 20th 12 light sash for cellar 0 75 1 thunb latch 0 50 do 1 31 9 pair of buts 1 21 1 gross 1 1/2 screws 0 83 1 do 5/8 0 50 4 lb of 8d wrought nails 0 75 2000 ft of pine stuff 16 113.03 Team to draw it 2 00 37 bushels of lime 4 63 Team to draw lime 2 00 3130 bricks 12 62 1/2 drawing brick 6 00 Cash paid for drawing logs for lath 3 19 Masons bill 21 00 masons board 4 50 Hand to tend mason 14 days and 6 days 
drawing sand sifting lime and 
mixing mortar before hand 1--0--50 board for hand 3 75 Carpenters bill 61 25 boards 20 00 151.44 10th mo 31st 
1825 A stove and Pipe for the childrens 
workroom purchased by the advice of 
the sb committee 20 42 The whole amount 444.69+ 6th mo 4th 
1823 Recieved of john Barrow treasurer to the 
Committee on the Indian concern to be 
applyed in building and repairing 300.00 An old ox taken late in the fall of 1823 
belonging to the concern dear at 20.00 One yoke of old oxen taken in the spring 
of 1825 prized by Wm. Willits at 20.00 one sick when taken and remaind so 
during the greatest part of the Season 340.00 Examined by Wm. P. Barling Brothertown April 6th 1818 John Barrow please to pay Grin 
Gridley on order the sum of one Hundred 
& twenty five Dollars & Charge the same 
in Acct. with the Committee &c and 
oblige thy friend. 
$125.00 Thomas Dean Rec. New York 4th mo 16. 1818 for Jn. Barrow 
Treas. to the Committee on the Ind. Concern. Twenty three Dollars 62/100--being for parrage & 
board of Mary Doxator & 6 Indian Children from Hudson 
also some other expenditures on their account. 
$23 62/100. Jn. Murray Treas. $50. Farmington 5th Mo. 4th 1818 On sight, please to pay to Wm. Kibbe 
on order fifty dollars, and place the 
same to our account, as per advice from 
Thy Friends 
 Richard R. Lawrence Jon. Battey Caleb McComber David Baker Joseph Campton Ira Lapham 
New York 3rd mo.th 15th 
1824 Committee on the indian concern to bush and half dozen seed purchasd L 3.0.0 7th mo. th 9 to 2 weaver reeds 1.8.0 to teacher to instruct indian girls and 
children between the 19th of 2nd mo.th 
and the 16th of 9th mo.th 18 weeks at $1 per week 7.4.0. to board of teacher at 6 L per week 5.8.0. to tools purchased on the old promise 1.0.0. 11th mo.th 1st to Loom 3.12.0. 2nd mo.th 15 to clothing for an indian boy a stranger that 
got his leg broke that had neither father nor 
connections to help him 0.6.0. one quill wheel 1.2.0. one set weavers spools 25 0.7.0. to repairing linnen wheels 0.13.0. to wages and board of blacksmith for one year 50.0.0. to 8 weeks of teaching 3.4.0. to board at 6 L per week 2.8.0. 3 plains 1.2.0. 2 1.12.0. L 82 6 0 25 lb Flax 16.8 Doctors bill 18.0 6 weeks of Teacher 21.8.0 board of Do. 6 weeks 1.16.0 5.18.8 L 88.4.8 Friend John Griscom Please to pay Isaac and 
H. Rankins on order Two hundred Dollars and charge 
the same to my account for Indian affairs Acors Rathbun 
 Verona 24th. of 3rd. mo. 1818 Rec. New York 9 mo 24 1817 of John Barrow Thirty Dollars for this sum advanced the 
Indians Chiefs from Onondaga & who visited 
the Com. in New York &. Adam Mott 
for James Nelson 9th mo 24th 1817 Richard R Lawrence 
to Sam. Robbins for boarding an Indian chief 
from the 19th before dinner to the 23rd before breakfast 
 3 3/4 days at $1 per day $3.75 John Sky D 1 3/4 days at D. 1.75 Metinas Dennis the Interpreter 1 3/4 days at D. 1.75 washing .75 Rec. payment of John Barrow 
for Sam. Robbins 
Harriet A Robbins $8.00 Recieved 12 mo. 23. 1817 of John Barrow Forty Five 23/100 
Dollars being amount of Monies expended by me last summer 
on a/c of the Indian Committee. 49 23/100 Thomas Eddy Farmington 5 Mo 7th 1818 $50 On sight please to pay Wm Kibbi 
on order fifty dollars and place the 
same to our account as per advic 
from thy friends 
 Richard R Lawrence Joseph Compton David Baker Ira Lapham Caleb McComber Jon. Battey 
New York New York 16th 5 mo 1818 Josiah Field 
Bo. for Mary Dockstodder 
of Samuel Wood & Son 
 1/2 Doz. Testaments 8/ 6.00 1/2 do 0.25 1/2 do Precipters 0.50 1 Quire paper 0.25 1 Quire Letter do. 0.31 Bot of Benjamin Pipe 
6 pair Specticles 2.25 paid Cash for her Expences 25.00 $34.56 Rec. New York 5 Mo 20 1818 of John Barrow 
the above amt in full 
 Josiah Field Committe on the indian concern Dr. 
for a hand to help in the family from 14th 
of 5th mo. th 1825 for one year at $1 per week 
 Wages $52-- board for hand at 75 cts per week 39-- to cash laid out for medical aid for the indians 
where they were unable to help themselves 
in a number of cases this done without consulting 
the sub committee there friends can do as they 
see fit in regard to allowing it 15-- Paid out for expences the last year $46.08 100 3.92 Reciecd of Wm. Banlin 50-- 
3.92 $102. 8 Mahlon Day will please pay H. Hinsdale 
or order Eighty Dollars & charge to the Indian 
concern & oblige. $80 Samuel Taylor Jr New York 6 mo 24th 1842 Mahlon Day will please pay H. Hinsdale 
or order, fifty Dollars & charge to the Indian 
Concern, & oblige. $50 John D. Lang New York 6 mo. 24th. 1842. Mr Sam. Taylor Jr 
Bought of Ja. W. Faulkner 
For the Indian Concern 
1 Silver Watch warranted $15.00 Received payment 
New York August 30th 1842 Ja. W. Faulkner Indian Concern 
To Mahlon Day Dr. 1842 
8 Mo 29 To Cash per J.D.L. & S.T.Jr 300.00 29 To G.R. Cholwell's Bill 13.75 29 To J.N. Faulkner's do. 15.00 29 To Bill of Books &c 16.50 29 To 2 dz Knives 1.00 6 mo 18 To Bill of Maze 4.50 $350.75 
Correct. Henry Hinsdale. 
1/9 mo. 1842. Yearly Meeting Indian Concern 
in acct. with Mahlon Day Treas. By Cash received from Quarterly Meetings $934.50 1840 
4 Mo 24 D. To. Cash pd. Postage .25 1842 
2 Mo 7 D. To. do -- do 1.69 7 D. To. do M Days Exp to Providence 14.50 6 Mo 18 D. To. Mdze fr Lang & Taylor 4.50 30 D. To. Cash do 130.00 8 Mo 29 D. To. Mdze do 16.50 29 D. To. Cash do 301.00 9 Mo 1 D. To. do do 61.75 3 D. To. Portage .19 11 Mo 1 D. To. Cash Lang & Taylor 200.00 1 D. To. Portage .25 1843 
4 mo 29 D. To. do .19 730.82 $203.68 125.50 
0.29.18 New York 4 Mo 29. 1843. 
130 
301 
200 
990 
21 The Indian Committee at a 
meeting held 4th mo 1st, 1844 
directed the Treasurer of the 
Fund raised by the Yearly M. 
for the benefit of the Indians 
residing West of the Mississippi 
to pay out of said fund, the 
within Bill Mahlon Day , Clerk & Treasr. 4th mo 1, 1844 Received Thirty five Dollars of 
the within Bill 
Mahlon Day 
Received Thirty five Dollars of 
the within Bill 
M. Willis Indian Concern 
To Mahlon Day & Co
 Dr To Printing 5000 Copies Report of Com. 56th 70 token c 40c 50.40 26 grs Paper for Covers 20c 5.20 Doing up 5000 c 40c &. 20.00 Enveloping 370 c 20c &. .74 Box Cooperage & Cartage for 
3000 sent to Providence 1.25 $77.59 New York 1 Mo 2 1844. 
Rec. Payment 
 Mahlon Day Cl. The Tres. is requestd to pay the above Bill. Indian Committe 
To William F Mott Dr. 1844 11 mo 13-16 Reams of paper $52 0 5% Do. for Cash 2.60 $49 40 Carting 31 $49. 71 Rec. pay't from M Day Tre. 
Wm. F Mott To the Committees of New England and 
New York Yearly Meetings of Friends, on the concern 
for the Indians located west of the Mississipi River. Dear friends, Having been permitted through the 
goodness and merciful preservation of our Great Care 
Taken to accomplish our journey among the Indians, 
we would now inform that we have visited about 
twenty Tribes and remnants of Tribes of those located on 
the western frontier of the United States, and have taken 
the following notes and observations respecting them. At the close of New England Yearly Meeting 
of Friends in 1842, having consulted with several mem- 
bers of the Committee on Indian affairs; both of New 
England and New York Yearly Meetings, and they having 
expressed thier concurrence in our prospect of visiting Wash- 
ington at that time in order to procure some documents from 
the Indian department. We proceeded directly there and 
had an introduction with the Commissioner on Indian affairs. 
Upon being made acquainted with our business he re- 
ceived us kindly, and freely offered to furnish us with 
such letters and documents signed by the Secretary of 
War and himself as might be useful in facilitating our 
contemplated visit--while at Washington we pro- 
cured some public documents and Reports respecting the 
Indians, and returned pretty directly to New York; there 
we made some arrangements with the Committee preparatory 
to our journey, and then returned to our homes. Having made the needful proparations we took 
leave of our dear families and friends the latter part of 
the eighth month 1842--on our way we called on 
some of the Indian Committee in Providence, and then 
proceeded to New York, where having completed our 
arrangements for the journey we took leave of the Com- 
mittee there, and many other dear friends. From New 
York we pursued our way to Ohio Yearly Meeting through 
Washington, calling at the Indian department--we attended 
the several sittings of the Yearly Meeting, and two sittings of 
the Committee on the concern for the Indians; heard the Report 
of their Committee respecting the condition of the Shawnee 
School, and made such inquiries as seemed proper respecting 
the best mode of getting to the Mississipi River: and 
having a special desire to commence our visit as far north 
as the Winebago Tribe of Indians; fearing that the boats 
would be impeded on account of the low stage of water in 
the Ohio river, it seemed most advisable to take the north- 
ern route--for accordingly travelled by land to Cleaveland, 
thence by Steam Boat to Detroit, and by land across the 
State of Michigan to the mouth of the St. Josephs River, 
here we took Steam Boat over Lake Michigan Sixty 
miles to Chicago; after waiting one day in this place 
we departed by Stage for Galina and Dubuque, cross- 
ing the State of Illinois a distance of one hundred 
and eighty miles. We reached the latter place 
in safety, though much fatigued with our journey, the 
roads being dry and dusty, and the weather exceedingly 
warm: we arrived in Dubuque early on first day morning, 
and the following evening procured a conveyance to the 
Winebago Indians. On second day morning we left 
in a waggon; travelling in a north westerly direction 
about one hundred miles across a beautiful prairie 
country to Turkey River--on third day afternoon 
while stopping for some refreshment about twenty 
five miles distant from the Indian villages, then came 
to the house five or six Indians in a state of intoxica- 
tion (having procured their whiskey at a shop near 
by); they were very noisy, calling for whiskey &c. 
and greatly annoying those peaceable settlers. The next morning after leaving for the agency 
we fell in with a number of companies most of 
whom were intoxicated; some of them carrying whiskey 
on thier ponies to their villages. On fourth day of the week and 29th of ninth 
month 1842, we reached the mission for the Winnebego 
Tribe of Indians, and took lodging with the Sub. Ag- 
ent David Lowry ; where we were kindly entertained 
by him and his family, and every facility in their pow- 
er afforeded us for conferring with the Indians; as 
well as a readiness to furnish such information as 
was desired. Winnebago. Tribe of Indians. This Tribe is located north west from Iowa Territory, and 
west of Prairie du Cheine, on lands called the neutral 
ground. They are located on different parts of 
this land in settlements called villages; thier principal one 
called the School Band is near the sub Agency of David Lowry 
on Turkey River, and about one hundred miles north west from 
Dubuque, and within four or five miles of Fort Atkinson. They number all together about Two Thousand--these 
Indians live in rude lodges or Wigwams as they are sometimes 
called, built in the usual indian style, by forcing forked sticks 
into the ground for posts, into the forks of which they lay 
poles for plates and ribs, preparatory to covering them with 
oak bark: the sides are either made of bark--mats made 
of flags--or skins, fastened to the plates and extending to 
the ground. These wigwams are from ten to twenty 
five feet in length, and about ten feet wide--the inside 
of the building is fitted up with a sort of frame work 
on each side, made of poles two feet high and about 
three feet wide; intended for a sort of bedstead, on which 
they fasten skins or mats, where they lounge and 
sleep--leaving a space through the centre--four feet 
wide--at cash and there is an apperture or door. 
The fire is built in the centre, the smoke escaping 
through a hole in the top. There are not unfrequently as many as three or 
four families amounting to twenty persons or more, occu- 
pying one of these miserable hovels--when about their 
homes they live principally upon soups made of wild 
fowl and venison, turnips and potatoes: they also eat 
an abundance of boiled corn;--some corn bread is used, 
and a very little wheat flour;--There is no regular 
order as to the time or manner of taking their meals; 
some are seen eating their soup outside the wig- 
wam. Some are eating while sitting on thier beds, 
while others are engaged in different pursuits: 
and should any person of another family happen 
to come into the lodge when he neede food, he 
would freely partake without invitation as he 
would of his own. The dress of the men consits mainly of 
blankets; all of them wear the waist cloth, some 
wear moccasins and leggings; and a few wear a 
calico frock or skirt--the head is more generally 
uncovered, a few however use a turban. The dress of the women consists of a broad 
cloth skirt and blanket--some of them wear moccasins and leggings, 
the head is entirely uncovered, except that the blanket is 
sometimes thrown over it for a coming, but they use no 
other. The dress of the large children is similar to that 
of the grown persons of the same sex; most of the small chil- 
dren go naked during the warm season:--those that attend 
school are clothed similarly to the white children on the 
frontier settlements. The greater part of the men and women 
wear ornaments, such as wampum beads, bells and jewelry; 
most of the men paint thier faces on special occasions: 
some part of the face is painted red, and some black. The principal employment of the men consists in 
hunting at certain seasons of the year, and when they 
are not thus engaged they do but very little labour of 
any kind: it being considered disgraceful both by men and 
women for the man to be seen at work. Much of 
thier time is spent in riding (of which they are exceedingly 
fond): they likewise spend some time in ball playing 
and other sports, and a considerable time is spent in 
lounging about in idleness. The women are generally industrious, per- 
forming the greater part of the manual labour, both in 
the camp and on the land: they look very dejected, and 
appear more like slaves than otherwise--many of the 
women receivd very severe treatment from the men; some 
of them are lame from the rough treatment of the men in 
their drunken revels. The Winnebagoes have but one school, and that 
is supported by the General Government, and is under the 
immediate superintendence of the sub agent. There have been the past year about ninety children 
at the school, some of whom have made pretty good profi- 
ciency in learning: it was vacant while we were there. 
The Teachers say that they have much difficulty in getting 
the children to attend constantly, and not unfrequently 
the parents have to be bribed to let them go: and oftentimes 
a compliance with the wishes of the teachers to have the 
children attend regularly, is induced only by a state of the 
most abject suffering on the part of both parents and chil- 
dren. Sometimes the parents will consent to let thier chil- 
dren attend school on receiving thin rations of bread and 
meat to carry home to the family; instead of boarding at the 
house provided for their accommodation. The school may be considered as rather an interesting Insititu- 
tion, and from what we could gather from the teacers the 
children were as ready to take learning as the whites: they 
are taught in the english language altogether. This Tribe is governed by chiefs who sometimes 
hold their office heriditarily--sometimes by a choice of the 
people--and sometimes they are appointed by the agents 
of the General Government. They have some vague notions of the Deity or Great 
Spirit as He is more generally called by them--they also 
believe in a state of future rewards and punishments, and 
talk about a bad Spirit--very few, if any, have embraced 
christianity. The annuity paid to this Tribe is very large, 
amounting to nearly Ninety Thousand Dollars; in money, 
goods, and appropriations for different purposes. Previously to their receiving their annuity, the sub agent 
collects the whole Tribe, and pays over to the head of each 
family the amount due them--notwithstanding the large 
sum which they receive, they are still in a most deplor- 
able and suffering condition and fast wasting away. Much of their misery may be traced to the treatment of 
the white people towards them. But leaving the past and looking only at the present 
conduct of the white man; it is evident that unless something 
more effectual is done to break up the corrupt and iniquitous 
trafic in whiskey; as well as the fraudulent trade carried on 
amongst the Indians by those persons licensed by the Govern- 
ment, the Winnebagos will in a few years be numbered 
with the Tribes that are not. We were credibly informed, that in difiance of the 
present rigid laws,immediately after the payment of 
1841, there was sold to this Tribe Two hundred barrels 
of whiskey: and at the time of our being there in 1842, the 
sellers thereof had increased in number one third. These whiskey dealers and licensed traders find a 
Strong inducement to follow up the poor Indian, from the 
fact of his receiving so large a payment at one time--the 
indian as a general thing is improvident to the last 
degree; and but poorly calculated to keep any amount 
of surplus property: so that within four or five days the 
whiskey seller, residing on the frontier, and the licensed 
trader who is permitted to vend his goods amongst them 
get nearly all the money. These licensed traders are numerous, and generally plant 
themselves at the time the money is paid over in the im- 
mediate vicinity of the place where the payment is 
made: they sell the Indians the most trifling and 
worthless articles for an enormous profit: he is temp- 
ted oftentimes to buy these articles from their gaudy ap- 
pearance--after he has parted with his last dollar 
in money to the whiskey seller of licensed trader in 
payment of old debts for whiskey or some of the above 
mentioned articles (and they are always largely indebted 
to these dealers) he then takes the articles he has purchased 
of the licensed trader to the whiskey shop and sells them 
for a much less price than he gave, and takes his pay 
in whiskey at ten or even twenty times its actual cost 
to the seller. It is no uncommon thing for an Indian 
after he had parted with all his money and many other 
necessary articles; to barter away his gun, horse, and even 
his blanket of a few bottles of whiskey--we were 
credibly informed that these whiskey shops not unfre- 
quently have large piles of blankets, and large stacks 
of guns that have been taken from these poor natives 
for a little whiskey. Thus we see that the policy of the Government, 
and the benevolent efforts of those who are honestly 
labouring amongst them for their good are entirely defea- 
ted by the avarice and wickedness of these lawless men. On sixth day of the week and first of tenth 
month, agreeable to previous arrangement, we met 
about thirty of thier chiefs and principal men in Council 
at the Agents house. Our object in calling them 
together was explained to them by David Lowry the 
sub agent, and then our Certificates from our friends, 
the Letters and Tack from the Secretary of War, address- 
ed to them--we then felt constrained to make a few 
remarks and extend such advice as seemed proper. 
After which, Little Hill , one of the chiefs, replied, 
That what he had heard was very good, and that they 
had heard a number of such talks from thier great 
father the President; and he had promised to help 
them, and keep off the whiskey sellers, but he 
had not done it: and now it was too late: he 
supposed he had tried, but could not; and had such 
great matters to attend to that he could not see to their 
small concerns, and now it was too late to help them. We then told them we did not believe it was too late, 
for them to refrain from drinking whiskey; we told them that 
much that they had complained of we believed to be true, and 
that the white man had wronged them; but that we wished 
them to understand that they yet had good friends among 
the whites who were grieved with the conduct of bad white 
men towards them; we hoped they would not be disour- 
aged, but strive to do better themselves, and that we and 
our brothers at home were disposed to do all in our 
 power to help them; and after making on our part 
some other remarks relative to their condition, they ex- 
pressed their satisfaction. Little Hill spoke to some 
of the elder Chiefs, and as we understood requested them to 
reply to us, as he was young, and wanted some of his 
older friends to make a speech. They said 
they were well pleased with our talk, but had nothing 
further to say. Little Hill then arose and shook hands 
with us, and then commenced speaking to us through the 
interpreter Young Lowry . Refering to their former con- 
dition previous to this intercourse with the whites, he 
said the Great Spirit had made us all, but he had 
made us different. Some men he made white, some 
he made red; and placed them at a distance one 
from the other. They the red man lived happy, and 
he supposed the white an lived happy too. They 
then had no sickness nor deaths amongst them except 
from old age; all thier people lived to be old and 
white headed; but when the white man came amongst 
them, they then became sick and died young. The 
white man brought fire water amongst them--they 
supposed that the white man got the whiskey from 
the bad Spirit, for surely they never got it from the 
Good Spirit. They began to sell it to the Indians 
and then thier miseries commenced; and they had be- 
come reduced and could not repair from drinking so 
long as the white men sold it to them; and now 
they dispaired of ever being any better--and the only way 
for them to be made better was to keep the whiskey 
away. The white man did not know what 
it was to go hungry and cold, but the poor Indian did. 
He believed that we pitied them and talked to them for thier 
good; and he thanked us for it, and said he would tell it 
to his people, and hoped they would mind our talk; to 
which they all assented. He then said, Brothers, I have 
nothing more to say. and shaking hands with us again sat down. After gathering the foregoing facts and obser- 
vations respecting the Winnebago Indians, and not seeing 
that much usefulness would result by a longer stay at 
this place; we took leave of our friend Lowry and family 
as well as the other white inhabitants connected with them 
at the establishment, and returned to Dubuque on the Mis- 
sissippi. We then took Steam Boat down the river 
about Two hundred miles to Burlington; from thence we 
took State and private conveyance by way of Mount 
Pleasant and Salem, Iowa, to the Sacks and Fox Agency 
distant about eighty miles. We reached this place 
8th of Tenth month about one o clock P.M. The Tribe were at the time assebled for the 
puropse of negotiating a Treaty with our General Government 
through Governor John Chambers the negotiator. The whole Sack & Fox nation were in the neighbor- 
hood, but the men only attended the Council. Just as 
we reached the council the Chiefs commenced speaking and 
spoke with much animation. One of the Fox chiefs spoke 
first, then a Sack, and so alternately until four had spoken, 
the last being Kecookuk , thier principal chief a cele- 
brated orator. The purport of thier talk was about the 
same; and resulted in an agreement to sell all their lands 
in the United States for the sum of one million fifty 
five Thousand Dollars, Eight hundred Thousand of which 
was to be put at interest at 5 per cent, and the remain- 
der to be appropriated to the payment of thier debts; 
south west of the Missouri River where they were to 
remove within three years. After the adjournment of the Council 
at that time we went to the Agent's house where the Governor 
put up during his stay at this place. He received us kindly 
and entered into conversation very freely respecting the 
condition of this Tribe of Indians--he remarked that un- 
less something was done to better thier condition and 
that soon; they must in a very few years all be wastid 
away in consequence of the wickedness and treachery of the 
whiskey sellers and other traders who are taking advan- 
tage of these poor ignorant natives, by obtaining thier 
money and other valuable articles, in exchange for 
whiskey and other trifling commodities of no real val- 
ue to the Indians. These articles, he remarked, are 
frequently sold to them for ten or twenty and in some 
instances for one hundred times their real cost, and in 
a very short time these unprincipled traders manage to obtain the 
last dollar the Indian has. And further, he said 
that some of the accounts brought in against the Indians 
stagger credulity; that in one instance one of these 
was exhibited for settlement amounting to Sixteen Thou-
sand Dollars, which he had ascertained to have grown 
out of the remnants of an old stock of goods not 
worth five hundred Dollars. He remarked that 
whiskey was no doubt in many instances sold to the In- 
dians and charged as corn, blankets and other articles 
which the licensed traders may have a right to sell 
to the Indians; while it is unlawful to sell them 
whiskey. He said also that the advice of the 
whiskey sellers and other traders, in its influence upon 
the Indians was unbounded; and that he had found 
much difficulty in treating with them on that account; 
as they were constantly hanging about them and advising 
them against adopting such a course as would be for 
thier good, cautioning them not to leave the chase, 
not lay down the gun, nor the blanket--not to 
have school, established amongst them; and in fine 
against civilization in any way. And from what 
we saw and heard, during our stay at the Council Ground, 
we were led to place the most implicit confidence in 
the remarks of the Governor. While we were at the Council we met 
with men of the popular class, some of whom it is known 
have been long engaged in a trade with the Indians by 
which they have amassed great wealth--these men used 
their utmost skill to make us believe that the Indians 
were a happy people; that there was no necessity 
for any benevolent exertions on thier behalf, and that 
they were now living very comfortably. An Indian (say they) was made to hunt not 
to work; and they are so very happy in keeping to thier 
old habits of living, that any attempts to induce a change 
only serve to make them unhappy--they argued aga- 
inst educating the Indians altogether 
either within or without thier borders; saying that 
they have as much knowledge as is necessary for an 
Indian to possess. There were also other men associated with these 
traders either by friendship or otherways; men of 
high standing in the Public Community, who were for- 
ward in sustaining these traders in these selfish and 
erroneous statements. And what is most to be 
deplored is, that the Indians will more readily lis- 
ten to the Council of these men than to those who 
are disinterstedly engaged for their good. The 
only hope (according to our conception of things) for 
these Indians is, that when they shall be removed 
to their new homes, all intercourse with their old ad- 
visers will be broken off, and they as we hope, will 
be left to receive better council from men who are 
not so intently bent upon thier own aggrandize- 
ment at the expense of the life and happiness of 
the Indian. This Tribe numbers about Twenty Two hun- 
dred in all. They are a large stately race particular- 
ly the men. There are none of these Indians who to 
our knowledge cultivate the soil; but are in general 
hunters--they however have a large pattern farm 
carried on for the benefit of the Indians by a Govern- 
ment farmer. Thier annuities are large, not dif- 
fering materially from the Winnebagoes. They live in wigwams or lodges similar to 
all the uncivilized Indians. They have no schools 
and no civil or religious instruction amongst them; 
but in other respects thier manners and customs are 
about the same as the Winnebagoes. Some few of their 
children have recieved some instruction at the Chactaw 
academy in Kentucky; but for the want of suitable 
opportunity to apply what little learning 
they may have obtained, and in consequence of the 
jealousy and prejudice of thier own nation against 
civilization; soon after thier return they fall 
into the destructive habits of thier uncivilized brethren. There was little opportunity while there of 
conversing with them, owing to thier engagements in 
making their Treaty. We visited most of their tents 
and took a view of them as they were encamped on 
the open prairie. After collecting what facts we could in relation 
to this Tribe, we returned to Salem a distance of about 
fifty miles, where we staid two or three days with 
Friends and gave them an account of the Indians. 
We then returned to the Mississippi where we took stage 
at Fort Madison for Kecookuk , and from thence by 
Steam Boat went to St. Louis--while there, we called 
on D. D. Mitchel superintendent of Indian affairs. 
He received us kindly, we presented him with our 
Documents from the War Department as well as our 
Certificates from our friends at home. He gave 
us a passport to travel through all the Tribes with- 
in his superintendence. Here again the same lamentable tale was 
told respecting the devastation that whiskey was 
making amongst all the diferent Tribes within his 
jurisdiction. He informed us that they were 
annually diminishing in numbers, and that unless 
something more effectual could be devised for their 
benefit, by way of putting a stop to this iniquitous 
trafic in whiskey, they would soon be all wasted 
away. He gave us copies of Reports recieved from 
the several schools within his superintendence, for 
our perusal. We left St. Louis by Stage for St. Charles 
a distance of twenty miles, thence took Steam 
Boat for Westport nearly five hundred miles up the 
Missouri River where we landed in safety; we then 
proceeded by land about nine miles to Friends school 
in the Shawnee nation. The navigation of the 
Missouri at this time was considered very precarious 
on account of the low stage of water, and the nu- 
merous snags and shoals in the river: which 
caused great anxiety to us as well as to the officers 
of the Boat, both by night and by day; yet through 
all we were mercifully favoured to reach our de- sired port unharmed. We reached the school early in the evening, where we 
were cordially recieved by all the Friends of the Establishment 
and hospitably entertained. The day following we made arrangements for a Coun- 
cil with the Indians, viewed the premises &c; and in the 
evening we visited the school, heard the scholars recite thier 
Scripture questions, spell &c. The school consisted of twenty three boys and four- 
teen girls; we were pleased with its appearance at this 
and the subsequent visits that we made. The scholars 
manifisted a good degree of activity, and appeared cheerful 
and happy: they had made considerable proficiency in 
thier studies, as much as could reasonably be expected 
under the circumstances in which they were placed. They are taught in the English language and converse 
in english with the whites; but when conversing among 
themselves they speak the Shawnee altogether. Attached to this School is a large farm the income 
of which goes to the support of the family. The boys 
work on the farm and are instructed in agriculture: the 
Institution being conducted somewhat on the plan of 
a manual labour school. We were well satisfied 
with the appearance of the farm. The buildings, were poor and ill adapted 
to the wants of such and Institution. This school is supported by the Yearly 
Meetings of Baltimore, Ohio, and Indianna. We made a visit to the Methodist Mission 
School distant about three miles from that of Friends; thier 
buildings are of brick and are large, and an extensive 
farm is attached to the Establishment: this school 
is likewise conducted on the manual labour plan. They instruct upwards of eighty children annually, 
at this Institution. Our Government has done much 
towards its establishment, and the deficiency is made 
up by the Methodist band. The children were making 
tolerable progress in the various studies in which they 
were engaged; as well as in agriculture and the mechan- 
ic arts. The Baptists have also a small school in the 
Shawnee nation; but at the time of our visit it was 
vacated. After visiting the Schools, we called on several 
families of the Indians; many of whom appeared to be 
living tolerably well, in comfortable log houses. Some 
of them have pretty good furniture, and utensils for 
cooking, &c. Some have barns for their cattle, and other 
out buildings. They raise a supply of indian corn 
for themselves and cattle, and keep oxen, cows, horses hogs 
and a few sheep. They all raise a large number of 
fowls; some of them have peach orchards, and have sent 
peaches to market the past season. Many of the 
men of this Tribe are industrious as well as the women. A few of the men are mechanics, and work by the 
day for the white settlers, and give satisfaction to thier 
employers. They appear to be adopting the dress, 
and manners of the whites, and to be advancing slowly 
in civilization. It is reported, that some of them have 
embraced christianity; but most of them adhere to thier 
ancient views of religion. A considerable number 
are yet given to dissipation. They all appear to have a high regard for Friends, 
and recieved us kindly; manifesting much interest with 
our visit. We held a number of councils with them during 
our stay in the nation, to pretty good satisfaction; and 
rendered them such advice as appeared proper; to which 
they listened with interest and attention--they were 
apt at making us acquainted with their grievances: 
at one of their councils with the Chiefs and head 
men of the nation. The following speech was made, 
our certificates and documents having been previously 
read, and we having rendered them such council 
and advice as way opened for. 
Speech-- Brothers, 
Perhaps it is the will of God, that we should 
meet to day to talk over things together; and if 
there was no trouble in the way, we could get 
along much better in making you a reply. You 
know that when there is only a little trouble in 
the way we can not get along so well. Brothers, We are glad to hear you talk, and 
when we meet in this way we think about God, and 
talk about Him, for we believe it is his will that 
we should think about Him, and talk about Him. 
We greet you as brothers, and send our love and best 
wishes to our friends the Quakers who sent you to 
see us their Indian brothers. Brothers, This is not the first time our friends 
the Quakers have come to see us, to instruct us in 
the things you have been talking about to day. 
A long time ago our friends the Quakers gave us 
the same instruction; and our young men who 
are seated around you at this time have heard 
their talk, and now live agreeable to their advice; 
for we think that your way of living is good. Brothers, All our young men who are here to day 
understand what you say and like your talk: 
they do not drink whiskey; but work, raise corn 
wheat, oats; and have horses, cows, sheep and 
hogs, and live comfortably and are saving some- 
thing for their children. As to my improvement 
it is growing less as I grow older. Brothers, We that are seated around you believe 
that what you say is true; I have given up drink- 
ing whiskey a long time ago, and think about other 
things. I think about God, and feel that I 
have religion in me. We believe that your 
religion is a good one; and your talk and your 
feelings towards the Indians are good and right. A long time ago your old men talked to us about 
your religion; and we told them about our religion, 
and they told us that though your religion was 
different from our religion; yet if the heart was 
right, we could travel together through the world 
and be saved at last. Brothers, You say that you have come a long 
journey to see your Indian brothers, and now you 
see we are in a bad condition (alluding to their 
head Chief who was present in a state of intoxication) 
like some of our Indian brothers whom you 
have been to see. We can not help it, so long 
as the white men will sell whiskey to the Indians. Brothers, We want you to talk to our great 
Father the President about the white man selling 
whiskey to the Indians. Our Great Father can pre- 
vent it, but no one else can. We want that 
he should stop up the barrel, and not suffer any 
to run out to the Indians. Brothers, As to the School, we can not do much, 
we can talk to our people about sending their chil- 
den; but if parents will not send their children 
we can not help it. If you get along well 
with the children you now have, parents will 
see it and become willing to send their children; 
as they wish them to learn to work, and read 
and write like white people. Brothers, We believe that all you have said 
to us is true; and we wish you to carry this talk 
of ours home with you, and tell our friends the 
Quakers all about what you have seen amongst 
your Shawnee friends--that many of them have 
good farms, raise stock--viz, horses, cows, sheep 
and hogs, and many of them do not drink 
whiskey; but have good houses, good furniture, 
and live comfortably. Brothers, That is all I have to say. The Shawnee Nation of Indians number about 
Twelve hundred--they are situated on the east 
side of the Kansas River, and west of the State of 
Missouri, they have a most beautiful tract of 
Country, twenty five miles wide, and one hundred 
miles long. The Kickapoo Tribe of Indians. After spending some time with the Shawnees, we hired horses 
and an Indian guide and rode up the Missouri River about fifty 
miles to the Kickapoo's a small Tribe of about four hundred 
situated above Fort Leavenworth on the Missouri. They are nearly all agriculturalists, raising a sufficien- 
cy of corn for themselves and some to sell; they also raise 
some wheat, potatoes and other vegetables, and keep horses 
cattle and hogs; some of them live tolerably comfortable; 
their cabins generally are filthy; and some of them 
exceedingly so. They have no school in this Tribe. 
A number of them belong to the Society of Methodists; 
others are the followers of an Indian man whom they 
call the Prophet, a man of some talent, but said to be 
an arch deciever. The greatest number still adhere to 
thier old traditions. The general appearances of these 
Indians was filthy; many are much given to dissipation 
and other vices; especially those residing near the Fort. The Methodists have a Missionary in this Tribe. We held a Council with them and endeavoured 
to lay before them what appeared porper; persuading 
them to leave their bad practices, and become sober and 
virtuous. There were present at this Council about 
thirty of their Chiefs and principal men. They 
heard what we said to them very attentively; but not 
being ready to reply, requested another interview. Accordingly a number of them met us in the evening 
and after consulting for a time among themselves, made 
the following reply through one of thier number who 
understood english. Brothers, We understand what you had to say to 
day to us; and this is what our chiefs say to you. We are glad you have come to see us, we believe 
what you have said to us to day is true; we were once 
bad, but now try to do better, and hope you will help 
us. We remember what you said about the Great Spirit, 
and we know what you said about the Great Spirit to 
be true. We are very glad you have come to talk to 
us about these things. We believe the Christian way 
is the best, and what you have told us about it is true. We are glad to hear what you have said to us 
about building houses, and schooling our children. We can not do much, we want you to tell our 
great Father at Washington to help us. We heard 
his talk to us about whiskey and other matters, we dont 
make whiskey ourselves, and we tell our young men 
not to drink it; but we cant help it so long as white 
men sell it to them. We dont know how to make the white men 
take the whiskey away, but the great men at Wash- 
ington do; we hope they will help us. They them informed us how glad they were we 
came to see them, and wished us to tell the men 
at Washington of their wants. Said they were poor 
and had no waggons to gather thier corn in, and 
carry it to market. They had no ploughs, thier 
mills were out of repair, and thier young men 
had to go to mill near the whiskey shops, and 
they would get drunk. They said these things were 
due to them by Treaty Stipulation; and that their 
great father had promised to attend to these things, 
but had not. They wished us to go and see 
him and let him know what they said. After this talk they took us by the hand and 
parted with us in a very kindly manner. The next morning 3d. of eleventh month 1842 
we returned on our way back, as far as the Stockbridge 
Tribe, a small remnant of a once numerous Tribe 
of Indians; but at this time numbering only seventy seven. 
They were originally from New England. We reached 
the house of the principal chief, Thomas T. Hendrick 
about eleven o clock A.M., having previously made an 
arrangement for meeting with them. He had a long 
trumpet which he made use of to collect the Tribe; 
which being sounded, they soon come together, men 
women and children. They all set down in an 
orderly manner, like a company of Friends. We had a religious opportunity with them great- 
ly to our peace and comfort, and as they nearly all 
understood some english, we spoke to them without 
an interpreter; it being the first instance of our ad- 
dressing a company of Indians in this manner. The greater part of the adults of this Tribe 
are professors of Christianity. The principal Chief 
is a sober sensible man. After we had relieved 
our minds to them, he spoke some time to his people 
in the Indian tongue, referring as we understood to 
what had been said. One of their number, a young 
man who had recieved an education at some of the 
schools in Connecticut was requested by the Chief, to say 
to us that they understood all we had said to them, 
and that it was all true; and he hoped they might 
often think of it, and improve from it. They said they considered it a great favour from 
God that He had sent us to see them, and give them 
such good advice. The Quakers had always been 
friends to the Indians, and had never wronged them; 
other white men had. They had heard much 
about the Quakers, and considered them thier friends They said they noticed our advice to them to endeavour to 
forget the injuries done them by the 
whites, and he hoped they might practice it. They said they were a very little company, but 
they had long resolved to improve and live like 
good white men. They had given up hunting 
and drinking whiskey; and were trying to live 
by farming. They wished us to tell our friends at 
the east, that they were going to build a school 
house and have a school for thier children. They appeared to be very sincere in thier remarks, 
and we were encouraged to hope that they would 
continue on in thier improvements. They were 
further advanced in civilization than any of the 
Tribes we had previously visited. The Chief
Thomas T Hendrick , had quite a library of books 
and could write tolerably well. They complained 
that they had not recieved thier portion of the money 
due them for the lands sold the Government at Green 
Bay, that they were promised this money at the time 
of thier removal; but have not yet had it: and 
that they needed it in carrying on thier farming op- 
erations, and were now suffering for want of it-- 
that they were poor and not able to go to Washington 
but desired that friends would lend them some as- 
sistance in getting thier just dues. We accidentally met with an aged female 
Indian residing not far from this settlement of Stock- 
bridges who appeared perfectly bright although she 
had lived to the advanced age of seventy four years 
She was living in a small log cabin, her name 
is Catherine Everett , she told us that when she was 
a child, she lived at Eavesham New Jersey, and that 
she was well acquainted with friends, and said she knew 
that dear old friend Joshua Evans , the man who wore 
a long beard. She said she thought him the best man 
in the world, he was so very good to the poor Indians, 
and she always loved the Quakers from her childhood, 
and thought a great deal about her good friends in 
the east; and she believed they prayed both for her 
and for the Indians in the west; and that thier pray- 
ers were heard and answered;and that she rejoiced 
that the Lord had remembered them, and sent the 
Quakers to see them and encourage them; for they 
needed it. She knew she was a poor ignorant old 
creature; but sometimes she hoped to be permitted to 
meet her Saviour in that Mansion where Christ had 
gone to prepare for his followers; where there was 
no difference between the white man and the red man 
for she thought there would be but one place for 
the good white man, and the good red man; and 
one place for the bad white man and the bad Indian She desired we and our friends would remember 
the poor Indian in the west. Sometimes she 
awoke in the morning, her soul was filled with love 
to God and all mankind: to a great many that she 
never saw in this world. She said she knew she was 
a very poor old woman and had been very wicked, 
but hoped the Lord would forgive her; and she 
was sometimes comforted in remembering that Christ 
said; he that cometh to him he would not cast 
off. She said she wanted we should give her 
love to our brethren in the East; and desired 
them to pray for her, for she was a poor crea- 
ture. The fervent prayer of a righteous man 
said she avails much. Sometimes she was very 
sick and thought she should die, and at those times 
she thought she should be happy; for her soul 
was filled with love to God and to everybody. 
She wanted to think of God all the time; it made 
her so well in her heart, putting her hand to her 
breast. When we were about parting with her 
she appeared much affected; so that the tears rolled 
down her furrowed cheek. She observed we might 
never meet again in this world, for it was but a little 
time that we had to stay here--but we should meet 
again in another world where there would be no 
more trouble. I am said she, a poor red creature, 
and dont know much, but I feel to love God, that 
has done so much for me through Christ. We next visited the Delawares, They are situated on the west side of the Kansas 
River, opposite the Shawnees, and number about 
one Thousand souls. They have an excellent 
country, calculated to support a large population. About one half of them are in an improving 
condition; cultivating corn and vegetables -- 
They keep horses cattle and hogs and an abundance 
of fowls. Most of them live in comfortable log 
or timber houses, and are advancing slowly in civilization. 
Some few of them have cast off the blankey, and adop- 
ted the dress and manners of the whites, have given up 
drinking whiskey and send thier children to school-- 
a large portion of them however yet remain in an 
uncivilized state, wear the blanket, hunt some, and man- 
ifest no disposition to improve in anything good. They drink whiskey, fight and are addicted to all 
the views common to the Indian in his savage state. Some of these are celebrated hunters and warriors 
and often fight thier way through the wild Tribes 
quite to the Rocky Mountains. They kill the 
Buffalo and bring home the skins, and barter them 
away with the traders for whiskey and other articles, 
such as beads wampum &c. Thier near location to the line of 
Missouri, and the whiskey sellers and other traders who 
settle on or near the line operates as a great hindrance 
to thier improvement; and will continue to be a bar 
in the way of thier advancement while these un- 
principled traders are suffered to carry on a trafic 
with them. Every advantage appears to be taken 
of thier ignorance as well as thier natural thirst 
for drinking. We met with two of thier principal 
Chiefs and some of thier head men at the Bap- 
tist Missionary house, and rendered them such 
advice as appeared to us proper upon subjects 
relating to thier welfare; all of which they 
appeared to recieve kindly according to thier 
reply. They refered to the friendship which 
had long existed between the Quakers and the 
Delawares, and said that this friendship had 
never been broken; and after speaking of the 
wrongs that had been practiced upon them by 
some of the whites, they said, the Quakers had 
never injured them; that they had never opened 
thier viens nor so much as scratched them. They were pleased that we had thought 
so much about them as to come so great a distance 
to see them. They hoped they should mind what 
we had said to them and try to improve. The chief said he was sorry that there were 
no more of his people present on this occasion; 
but hoped we should not be discouraged, for it was 
a pity for any one to begin to do good and then 
give it up. There are quite a number of was chiefs be- 
longing to this Tribe, who refused to meet with 
thier brethren on this occasion; having at a previous 
time met and heard some remarks touching thier 
dissipation and other immoral practices with which 
they were not well pleased, and were decidedly 
opposed to meeting again on such an occasion. We did not however feel satisfied to leave 
without seeking an opportunity with them; and 
accordingly appointed a time when we would 
like to meet them at one of thier own houses: 
and when the time came we met some ten 
fifteen of them, and addressed them on subjects 
relating to thier moral and religious welfare, 
to all of which they expressed thier satisfaction; 
saying they were glad to have us talk, and hoped 
they should mind what had been said to them. Although these fierce looking warriors had 
previously made some secere threats against the 
first man who should name these subjects to them; 
they offered no violence or unkind treatment to 
us; but appeared very attentive and willing to 
hear us speak with freedom on all the subjects 
relating to thier welfare; and them addressed 
us in a kind manner. The head Chief saying he was glad 
to see his dear brothers and hear them talk, and 
hoped they should mind what was said to them. We them parted with them feeling much 
relieved, and they manifesting much affectionate 
feeling towards us. The Moravians, Methodists, and 
Baptists, have each separate missions among the 
Delawares. The Baptists have a small school 
where some ten of fifteen children are annually 
receiving some instruction. The Moravians are educating a larger number in 
that portion of the Tribe called Munsees. The Baptist 
school was not in operation when we were there. The Methodists have a Missionary but no school. 
A few of the Delaware children are recieving some ed- 
ucation at the several schools in the Shawnee nation. The Munsee Indians, consisting of about Two hun- 
dred are a branch of the Delaware nation, and former- 
ly resided on the Lehigh River in the State of Penn- 
sylvania; and as we understood these Indians are the 
descendents of the Tribe that made the Treaty with 
William Penn under the great Elm Tree. This memorable event has been handed down by 
tradition from generation to generation; and there are 
now a number who can give a pretty correct history of the 
transactions of that remote period. The Moravian brethren have extended a care towards 
a portion of this Tribe for more than half a century. Teachers and Missionaries have ever since that time 
been employed amongst them, and at the time of our 
visit there were two men and thier wives engaged 
in giving them some literary moral, and religious in- 
struction. They appeared to be pious persons and 
honestly engaged in the discharge of thier arduous 
duties. They recieved as cordially and manifested a 
willingness to assist us in promoting the object of our 
visit. Owing to the unsettled state of these Indians, 
thier wandering habits, and an unwillingness to work 
on the land; and the small annuity paid them by 
Government; there has not been that improvement that 
might be reasonably looked for when we take into con- 
sideration the great amount of labour bestowed upon them Most of them have log or timber houses, and 
cultivate more or less land; and raise corn for thier 
supply during the year. Some few cultivate wheat, 
and potatoes. They keep horses, cattle, hogs and 
fowls. They have some furniture in thier houses; 
such as poor beds, tables, and chairs; some cooking 
utensils &c. They all wear the blanket, and in 
many respects dress in a state about half way 
between the whites and Indians. They are great 
smokers, and some of them drink whiskey to excess. It is said they are a kind hearted people, and a num- 
ber of them have embraced christianity, and joined either 
with the Moravians, Methodists or Episcopalians. The Moravians have a small meeting house, and school 
house on thier land. We met sixty or seventy of these 
Indians of both sexes at thier meeting house on first 
day evening; they behaved themselves with sobriety and 
christian gravity; and after we had freed our minds 
and our certificates had been read, one of the chiefs 
of the Delawares, after having spoken to his associate 
chief a few words (both of whom were at a previous meet- 
ing of ours) rose and delivered the following remarks. Brothers, We are glad you have come to see us, 
and give us such good advice, and to talk with us 
and tell us about living better and becoming better 
men and women Brothers, I hope I shall do better myself, and 
that my people will do better also. Brothers, 
our fathers and your fathers lived together as friends 
and brothers, they never shed each other's blood, no, 
they never scratched each other, and I am glad the 
friendship continues even to the present time, and 
that the blood now runs freely in our viens &c. Afterwards, one of the principal men belong- 
ing to the Munsees made a few feeling remarks ex- 
pressive of his satisfaction with the meeting; where 
it closed. Second day morning, being informed by the Moravian 
Missionary that they usually met every morning at 
nine o clock for worship, and that there was liberty 
for us to go in and sit with them if we chose; after 
reflecting upon it we thought it might be best for us 
to attend the Meeting; and accordingly we went in and 
set with them until thier services were over, after 
which we had some labour amongst them. One 
of thier principal men then rose, and in a feeling 
and broken manner, even unto tears, made the fol- 
lowing very affectionate and pertinent remarks. Brothers, I want to talk a little with you, 
I am glad to see you this morning, and glad to hear 
you talk about Jesus, and was glad to see you and 
hear you yesterday. Brothers the munsees are 
spread all about, and have now no chiefs; some 
few are settled round here--some are mixed with the 
Stockbridge's--some with the Shawnee's, and some are 
yet living at Green Bay. But the Munsees have 
all forsook thier heathen customs, and practices of 
thier forefathers, and now live in the customs and 
practices of the Christians. Some of these that live 
round here are Moravians, and some that live in 
other places are Methodist and some Episcopalians. 
But they are Munsees let them live where they 
will, and all live as the Christian people do, and 
do not follow the heathen practices of thier 
fathers. Brothers, I do not live in heathen prac- 
tices but believe in the one true God and Jesus 
Christ--me a poor Indian; me feel very poor, 
but me feel religion in me though very poor. 
poor Indian believe that God sent his son into 
this world, and that he died for all poor Indian 
as well as white people; and I believe He is now 
with God in Heaven, and that He comes into our 
hearts by his spirit, even poor Indian's and will 
be there forever. Now me think what Christ 
say to his followers I am going away to leave 
you, but I will come again in Spirit into your 
hearts that I may be with you forever, be 
where you will and now me feel him re- 
newedly in my heart at this time. Brothers, I speak these things not from the 
tongue, but I feel what I say in my heart, tho, 
Indian a very poor creature, and like little child 
in these things, yet me feel the Spirit of Christ with 
me this morning and feel glad to see you and to 
hear the good advice you have given us, and I 
feel my spiritual strength renewed. Brothers, Your fathers William Penn and 
other of your old men, and our old men the Mun- 
sees lived in peace like brothers, and made the 
Treaty under the Elm Tree, and the Quakers and 
munseeind have always been friends; and my heart 
is glad you still think about your poor Indian 
brethern and come and see them, for it makes 
poor Indians heart glad when they see thier Qua- 
ker brothers. Brothers, that is all I have to say now. An account of the Kansas. This Tribe number about sixteen hundred souls; the 
country they claim as thier own is situated on both 
sides of the Kansas river, commencing sixty miles west 
of its nouth in latitude about 38 [degrees] north, and is thirty 
miles wide. The soil is fruitful and well watered; 
but sparingly timbered; it is well adapted to agric- 
ulture, and the climate is healthy. The Kansas spend a part of thier time in 
hunting, a part in idleness, and a part in planting 
and cultivating small crops at home. They are 
irregular in thier manner of living; and though 
not inclined to eat unwholesome food, yet from ne- 
cessity they eat such as causes sickness amongst them. 
They use ardent spirits less than many other tribes, 
yet they are degraded and improvident to some ex- 
tent by this poison--some few of them have 
become reformed; they are more ready to receive 
instruction than they were formerly, but most 
of them are strongly inclined to hold to thier 
savage habits and superstitious worship. The main difficulties in teaching these Indians, 
are their wandering habits, and thier fondness for 
war with other Tribes--they are at home only 
about four months in the year--they have a 
Smith and a teacher of agriculture furnished 
them by Treaty who are to continue with them 
five years and then all thier stipulations with 
the Government will end. At the time of our visit the greater 
part of this Tribe were gone on thier Fall hunt, 
and therefore we had an opportunity of seeing but 
few of them. After we had completed our visit 
to the Delawares, Munsees, Stockbridge's and 
Kickapoos, and had seen some of the Kansas 
Tribe, and collected such information as we 
deemed useful; we returned again to Friend's 
school in the Shawnee Nation to prepare for our 
visit to the more southern Tribes. The Indians understanding that we were 
about leaving this part of the Country, numbers 
of them came to make known to us thier grievances 
and others to take leave of us. They represented 
to us that there was a prospect of the Wyandotts, 
(now living in Ohio) coming to settle on a part of 
of thier land; and that a very few of the Shaw- 
neese were favourable to such a move, but that 
the most of them were decidedly opposed to it and 
much troubled on account of it. We were not 
without serious apprehensions that 
great difficulty might yet arise from this circum- 
stance. We rendered them such counsel as 
we believed might be proper for them to follow, 
advising them against discords, jealousies and 
divisions, all of which appeared to be kindly reci-eved. An aged Shawnee Chief came to us and said 
he wished to have a talk with us. He said when he 
lived in Ohio he had a good farm and lived well, 
and was acquainted with friends, but by moving to 
this country he had become poor--that he was 
now gaining a little and wanted to live where 
he now did, and so did all his Tribe want to him 
where they now are--they did not want to be 
moved again, but feared they should be soon. he 
said he was now old and lame, he could not go 
farther. he wanted to die and be buried here 
and not go away off and die on the prairie. It made him feel very bad to think of being moved 
again for it seemed like being thrown over a bank away 
off west of the prairie where they would all die--he 
appeared much distressed on this amount. he wished to 
know if we had heard the men at Washington talk 
about removing them again and remarked that he 
had heard they had been talking about it--he 
wanted we and our friends the Quakers should 
help them in getting the titles of thier lands fixed 
so that his people might always live where they 
now are. he thought the white man ought to 
be satisfied that the Indian had been moved far 
enough, and not move him any further. he 
said he was an old man and could live but a 
little while; and wanted to know before he died 
that his people and children could never be 
moved again--all of which was spoken in a 
feeling and candid manner. After this a Chief of the Chilicothe band 
remarked that the Indians showed mercy to the 
white man when they first come across the great 
water; the white man came to the Indian four 
times with his hat under his arm, and asked the 
Indian to have mercy on him, for he was poor 
and needy. White man say when Indian is 
poor and needy he would have mercy on him, 
as long as grass grows and water runs. Indian then let him come on the land 
and live, he now wanted white man to re- 
member his promise and have mercy on the 
Indian for he was poor and needy; and not 
remove him any further. Having completed our visit to the Indians 
in this section of the Country, we took leave of our 
kind friends at the Shawnee school on the tenth 
of eleventh month, and proceed on our way about 
forty miles in a southwest direction to the sub. agency 
of A L Davis in order to visit the several Tribes 
in that vicinity. We arrived there in the evening 
of the same day, and made known our business 
to the sub. agent. He kindly entertained us and 
offered to lend all the necessary aid in collecting 
the Indians; and also to furnish us with such 
information as he possessed respecting thier state 
and condition. The day following there was 
an unusual fall of snow for the season in con- 
sequence of which but few of the Indians came 
to the council--yet some of the principal men 
of nearly all these remnants of Tribes were pres- 
ent. The names of the several Tribes are 
Weas Peankshaws, Kaskaskias, Peorias, Ottawas, 
and Chippewas; numbering in all about Five 
hundred and fifty. These Indians are making but 
little improvement in agriculture or otherwise, 
yet most of them raise some corn and veg- 
atables, and keep some cattle, horses, hogs and 
fowls--they are but poorly prepared for carry- 
ing on farming; having no ploughs, waggons 
or tools of any kind, which is cause of much 
discouragement to them. With the exception of a few instances they 
have made but little advancement in civilization. 
Some of them live in poor log houses, and some 
in wigwams--they generally wear the blanket, 
and in most respects dress like the wild Indians. They are much given to idleness, vice, and dissi- 
pation. they have no school in any of these 
Tribes--there is one Missionary amongst the Peorias, 
but none in any of the others. Like many other Tribes they are fast 
wasting away. Some of them are professors of 
Christianity, but much the larger part of them still 
adhere to thier old traditions. They complain of having made a bad 
Treaty with the General Government, and are solic- 
itous of further assistance from that source; and 
say that if thier Great Father would send out some 
good white men to instruct and advise them 
they would endeavour to improve from it. We 
encouraged them to break off from thier old habits 
of dissipation and indolence, and to become a sober 
and agricultural people; holding out to them the 
advantage that would arise from such a change. They manifestid much interest in what was 
said to them, saying they believed it all to be true, 
and hoped they might follow our advice. They 
promised that they would tell thier absent broth- 
ers what had been said to them and advise them 
to mind it. They were pleased that we came 
so far to see them and parted with us in a frien- 
dly manner After collecting the foregoing account re- 
specting those small Tribes, we left for the Pot- 
awatomie nation, situated on Potawatomie creek 
about sixty miles from A L Davis ' agency. We 
arrived at the house of a man by the name of 
Simmerwell a smith employed by the General 
Government in repairing the Indian guns &c. 
The day being too far spent for a council 
with them that evening, we thought it most 
advisable to have notice given for a meeting 
with them in the morning. This smith has been for many years engaged 
amongst the Indians, in repairing their guns and 
otherwise assisting them. We believed him sincere- 
ly devoted to thier welare; he lamented thier de- 
plorable condition; and from his own personal 
knowledge of the facts attributed most of thier 
misery to the avarice and wickedness of the traders 
and other corrupt white men, who have ever since 
his requaintance been prowling about them like 
the beast for his prey. Agreeably to our previous appointment we 
met a number of the Chiefs and head men of 
the nation at the house of the blacksmith. We endeavoured to impress upon thier minds 
the importance of a change in all thier habits 
and modes of living, and to adopt the manners 
and habits of good white men. They listened 
attentively to what was communicated to them and 
expressed thier gratitude towards the society of 
Friends, that they had thought so much of them 
as to send persons so far to look into their con- 
dition. One of thier Chiefs remarked that 
thier great father had promised to send them ma- 
ny things, but said he, they have not yet got 
along. The person who interpreted for us is a full 
blood Indian, educated at Hamilton School in the 
State of New York, and speaks and writes the engl- 
ish language well; he also converses freely in 
the Potawatomie tongue, and may be reckoned 
among the most intilligent of the Indians in the 
west. he is married to a half blood woman 
and possesses very considerable property; and might 
have been rich, but for his great extravagance 
and dissipation. The Pottawatomies are divided into three 
bands. viz. Pottawatomies of St. Josephs--Pottawatomies 
of the Wabash, and Pottawatomies of the Prairies. The St. Joseph's band formerly recieved some instruc- 
tion from the Baptist missionaries while they were 
located on the St. Joseph's river. This band live 
principally by cultivating the soil, and what they 
recieve from the Government by way of annuities 
They are poor and making very little advance- 
ment in civilization, they have no school nor 
missionary. Some of them live in poor log cabins, 
others in wigwams; most of them keep cattle, horses 
and hogs: nearly all of them drink whiskey and 
spend much of thier time in idleness and dis- 
sipation. They spend thier annuities soon 
after recieving them for whiskey and articles of 
no real value to them. The manners, dress and general appearance of 
these Indians do not materially differ from those 
small tribes located near them; they wear the 
blanket as the principal article of dress, and 
hunt some on thier own lands and in the adjoin- 
ing State of Missouri: but do not go on the long 
hunt to the west. Our next visit was to the Wabash Band, located 
about twelve miles from the gun Smith's. There are about six hundred of this Tribe, 
comprizing about one third of the nation, and are 
principally settled in one neighborhood. They are 
completely under the control of the Catholics, 
and have three Jesuit Priests among them, who 
are educating forty or fifty Indian children-- 
thier school is divided into two departments, 
one for boys and the other for girls. The one 
for girls is said to be doing some good; the oth- 
er is in a languishing state. This band are building comfortable log hou- 
ses, and cultivating the land; keeping some cattle, 
horses hogs &c, but thier location is said to be un- 
healthy, and they are addicted to all the vices, 
and immoral practices common to the Indians; 
and are fast wasting away--thier numbers 
have greatly diminished within the last few 
years. The Prairie band is interspersed 
amongst the other two bands, and live much 
after the same manner. The whiskey sellers and other traders practice 
the same impositions upon these Indians that 
they do upon all the other Tribes within thier 
reach. Osage Nation of Indians. Understanding that these Indians were out on 
their fall hunt, and that we should not have 
an opportunity of seeing many of them; and 
thier principal village being distant about 
forty miles from the Pottawatomies, we did not 
visit them; but had an opportunity of seeing a 
few of the Tribe, and from good authority gath- 
ered the following account respecting them. This Tribe is located about one hundred 
miles south of the Shawnee Nation, bordering on the 
State of Missouri. They once were very numerous, 
but at this time number only about Five Thou- 
sand, and are fast diminishing in consequence of 
thier roving and intemperate habits. They are more like the wild Indians of 
the Rocky Mountains, than any other Tribe on the 
frontier. They are great hunters of Buffalo, and 
furs, and the fur traders depend more upon them 
for Buffalo Robes and furs, than upon any other 
Tribe of the south western frontier. This circum- 
stance operates as one of the principal causes of thier 
small advancement in civilization. Much labour has been bestowed within Twenty 
years, by the Presbyterian Missionaries from New 
York and Boston, to improve their condition; but 
it was attended with little success; owing (as it 
is said) to the prejudice of the Indians against 
the Missionary, from the influence of the fur 
traders. This influence remains to the present 
day; and there appears to be no prospect of im- 
provement among them, while this state of things 
exists. The traders discourage them from following ag- 
ricultural pursuits, telling them they do not want 
to buy corn or cattle; but buffalo skins and furs-- 
thus prompting them to keep up the chace. They also advise them not to have Schools 
or any religious instruction amongst them; hence 
there are no schools or missionaries among 
them at this time. We were informed by apparent good 
authority that the Indian Agents, combine with 
the agents of the American Fur Company, and 
control the manner of paying out the annuities to 
the Indians; by which the agents for the Company 
are enabled to monopolize the whole trade with 
them. It was said they first took all the 
annuity money and deducted thier charges against 
the Indians; and for the balance gave to each 
man as many cents (with a particular mark on 
them) as there were dollars due him; promising 
to pay him as many dollars in goods as he had 
cents; thus compelling te Indian to purchase 
all his goods of them at an exorbitant price. There was recently a large amount of 
appropriation paid out to this Tribe, in cattle 
swine and agricultural implements: the In- 
dians not being acquainted with the use of them 
soon sold and gave away all thier ploughs, 
killed the cattle and swine, and the whole 
plan was frustrated. The Osages are a statly race, the men 
are exceedingly large and tall, but the women 
are short, and like the females of the Winnebagoe 
Tribe appear dejected--they dress altogether like 
the wild Indians. After collecting the foregoing account 
respecting the Osages, we travelled south towards 
the Cherokee nation; intending on our way to 
pay a visit to the United Tribe of the Seneca 
and Shawnee Indians. We lodged with one Jackson 
and half . In the morning men to meet 
us at his house; with whom we held a council We gave them such advice as in our opinion 
was needful. They appeared perfectly friendly 
and listened attentively to what was said to them We spoke to them through Jackson who in- 
terpreted for us. They made no reply to us as 
there was no suitable interpretor. We learned that the greater part of these 
Indians were raising some corn and domestic 
animals, and have pretty comfortable log cabins, 
& some fear of them are adopting the habits of 
the whites in various respects; such as laying aside 
the blanket as an article of dress, putting on pantaloons 
instead of the leggings, &c. They have no School amongst them, and none 
of thier children are recieving an education out of the 
nation, excepting two of Jacksons'. The moral habits of the female part of this 
Tribe were represented as exceedingly gross and licen- 
tious; and from all accounts they are fast wasting away After visiting the Seneca's and 
Shawnees, we rode sixteen miles to the house of Dan- 
iel Adams a Mohawk Indian residing in the Seneca 
nation. The tribe located in this place are 
the Sandusky Senecas. This Adams is a man 
of tolerable education and speaks and writes both the 
English and Indian language; he is married to a 
Stockbridge woman, formerly from the State of New 
York. She informed us that when a girl she spent 
four years on Long Island , where she was educated 
at a Friends School; she retains a grateful remem- 
brance of the many kindness that were shown her 
by friends in those parts, the names of some of whom 
she mentioned--her appearance was greatly superiour 
to any Indian woman we saw while on our journey: 
her whole conduct and conversation were dignifi- 
ed; she was easy in her manners and conversed 
understanding upon a variety of subjects, but more 
especially upon whatever related to her friends the 
Indians of New York State. She manifested a deep 
interest in the Treaty lately made with the Seneca 
Indians there. This woman and her husband 
are both professors of the Christian religion, and from 
appearance were honestly engaged in the discharge 
of thier social, moral and religious duties: they 
had a family of three small children, who were 
clothed in the style of the whites and taught in the 
english language altogether. They resided in 
a good timber house newly built and well fur- 
nished--thier manner of living was superior to the 
generality of the whites in the west. They spoke 
freely of the lorn state and condition of thier peo- 
ple, and of the strong prejudices existing in thier 
minds against the whites, and of the difficulty of 
overcoming these prejudices in conseguence of the ill 
treatment they had in too many instances recieved 
from them. There is at this time no school 
nor religious institution in this Tribe. A few of them profess the Christian relig- 
ion and have joined themselves to some of the dif- 
ferent religious sects, the greater part of them yet 
adhere to thier former views and superstitious 
worship. Nearly all of them are engaged in 
agricultural pursuits in a small way, and keep va- 
rious kinds of domestic animals. We did not learn 
that any of this small Tribe keep sheep or manu- 
facture cloth of any kind. Thier principal food 
is pork, and deer, wild fowl, corn bread, potatoes 
and other vegetables. Some of them have laid 
aside the blanket as an article of dress, but the 
greater part attire themselves in the Indian style; 
and in no important particular differ from the 
other Tribes that have been removed from the 
East. They are said to be very immoral in 
thier conduct among the neighboring whites; they 
are unwilling to recieve white men among them 
as teachers, but would not object to having thier 
children instructed in english by persons of thier 
own cast is those suitably qualified could be pro- 
cured. They are located upon a small tract 
of land west of the State of Missouri, on the Ne- 
osho River bordering on the Cherokee nation; and 
numbered at the time of thier removal Five 
hundred and fifty one, but have since diminished The Cherokee Indians. This Tribe is settled on lands laying west of 
the State of Arkansaas, bordering on the Arkansas 
River and numbered about Twenty Thousand souls, it is 
thought they have diminished in number since thier 
removal west. The history of this nation is 
generally known to the public, therefore it may not 
be expected to be so particular in our account of 
them. We entered upon the north east corner 
or thier lands, and travelled south to thier lands 
bordering on the west line of Arkansas, are hilly 
and well watered and timbered, but not well adap- 
ted to agriculture: in other parts it is level and 
fertile. The Cherookees live principally by farming, 
they raise neat cattle, horses and other domestic 
animals, and keep an abundance of poultry. Some of the Nation are extensive farmers and 
planters; Cotton is grown in the southern part of 
the nation, where all who are able keep slaves to 
cultivate the land, and do the work in thier houses 
&. The manner and customs of this portion of 
thier community, as well as thier style of dress and 
mode of living does not differ materially from 
the white planters in the south west. A few of 
the Cherokees are large slave holders. Thier laws for the government of thier slaves 
are similar to those of the Slave States. The slaves 
frequently desert thier masters and run away. 
Some cotton and woolen goods are manufactured 
for domestic use. We saw a number of good 
dwelling houses as we passed through thier country, 
but the most of them reside in small log cabins. 
They have more generally adopted the manners 
of the whites than any other Tribe we have met with 
While passing along we frequently saw white 
men who were married to Indian women, and 
in some instances an Indian man was connected 
by marriage to a white woman. There is less similarity in the general appearance 
of the Cherokees than in that of any other Tribe. 
They are divided into three distanct classes. First. 
Those who are pretty well civilized and appear 
intelligent, Second, Those who may be reckoned 
among the half civilized or apprentices in civili- 
zation. Third, Those who have made but little 
improvement in thier dress and manners--this class 
is much the most numerous. They are cultivators 
of the soil, and have generally given up hunting, 
but are dissipated. They have a number of Missionaries and native 
preachers amongst them; and about Two Hundred 
profess the Christian religion, and have joined them- 
selves either to the Presbyterian, Baptist, or Methodist 
Societies. They have thirteen schools in the Nation 
where all the children attending them are taught 
in the english language. These Schools are rep- 
resented to be in a flourishing condition, and in 
thier general features are similar to our district 
schools in New England. Many of the Cherokees 
manifest an interest for the welfare of thier chil- 
dren, and the rising generation; and have recently 
made very considerable appropriations in order to 
extend the benefits of education and civilization 
amongst them more generally. They have a 
printing press in the nation where they have thier 
laws and public documents printed both in the English 
and Cherokee language. We arrived at the Council ground at a time 
when thier National Council was in session. The Government is divided into three departments 
viz. executive, legislative, and judicial. They 
style the head of the Executive department Principal 
Chief, Thier legislative department is divided into 
a Committee and Council. The Judiciary is com- 
posed of a supreme court, and an inferior or Circuit 
Court. John Rop is now and has been for 
many years Head Chief of the Nation. Thier Committee and Council consist of 
fifteen members each, elected by the people: all laws 
are enacted by the Legislature and signed by the Princi- 
pal Chief. Thier Supreme Court is composed of five 
judges. At the head of this Court is Jesse Biskey- 
head, a half blood Indian, and a Baptist preacher We were introduced to all the members of the 
several departments of Government, where we had an 
opportunity of witnessing thier manner of transacting 
business, which altho. simple and plain, was nev- 
ertheless very much to the point The whole nation (or at least as many as wi- 
shed to assemble) were one day while we were there collec- 
ted together in order to hear the annual message of 
thier Principal Chief, and likewise the Report 
of the delegation who were sent to Washington 
the last winter to transact some business with the 
Government; which Report embraced all their 
correspondence with the President and Secretary 
of War. This Message and Report were drawn up 
with ability. We witnessed nothing like a spirit of 
hostility on the part of these Indians towards the 
Government of the United States; and yet they have 
not forgotten the wrongs that have been practiced 
upon them by the whites. It affords them some 
relief when they can meet with persons who are 
willing to lend a listening ear to the sad tale of 
those sufferings and miseries caused by the State 
of Georgia, as well as the Agents and officers of the 
General Government. By accounts from persons 
of unimpeachable veracity, those who were eye 
witness of some of the horrid scenes, we were led to think 
that the half had never met the public eye They treated us with kindness and much 
attention while we were in the Nation, and altho. 
they have not had much acquaintance with mem- 
bers of our religious society until recently; yet 
they looked upon them as thier friends, and spoke 
with grateful hearts of the benevolent and Chris- 
tian interposition of Friends in a great many 
instances on behalf of the red man. Much might be said respecting the advance- 
ment of this Tribe in civilization &c; but we 
will conclude by saying that our hearts were 
made to feel deeply for them, and to put up 
our feeble petitions to the Father of all our sure 
mercies, that He might yet smile upon this strip- 
ped and pealed people, and awaken them under 
a sense of the mercies extended to themselves to 
a feeling of thier own obligation to deal justly, and 
show mercy, and kindness to those poor descend- 
ants of the African race who are held in bon- 
dage among them. A band of the Seminole Indians 
(lately from Florida) were temporarily settled upon 
the Cherokee's land near by the Council ground, 
at the head of which, were two Chiefs by the 
names of Wild Cat , and Alligator , who were 
noted men in the late Florida War. We held 
two Councils with these Chiefs, at one of which 
came about Twenty of their principal men; 
Wild Cat and Alligator made many bitter 
complaints of the ill treatment of the white men, both 
before and since their removal. We feared there 
might be an outbreak by Wild Cat and his party, in 
thier present excited state. It was expecting that the 
Agents would soon remove them from the Cherokee coun- 
try to lands provided for them the General Govern- 
ment in the Creek nation; at which Wild Cat and 
Alligator appeared much offended. We conversed 
with several of the Agents and officers, and desired 
them to consider thier peculiar dispositions, and 
use all conciliatory measures in the removal of 
these unhappy and unfortunate beings. We also endeavoured to persuade these Seminoles 
to live peaceably with thier neighbors, and to break 
off from thier old habits and become farmers, like 
the Cherokees and other Indians around them. They are much given to drunkenness, stealing 
and other vices, and live like the wild Indians. They formerly belonged to the Creek Nation, 
and now speak the same language. Some of 
them hold slaves who serve for interpretors and 
sevants to them. We next visited the Creek Na- 
tion. They are situated south of the Chero- 
kees, on lands bordering on the Verdigris River, and 
number about Fifteen Thousand Indians, and 
Three or Four Thousand Slaves. We had an in- 
terview with Benjamin Marshall , a Native 
and very intelligent man, and one of the most 
wealthy and influential in the Nation. He informed us that every family of the 
Creek nation would raise enough produce the present season to supply 
thier wants throughout the year; they are fast 
improving in agriculture and domestic manu- 
facures, and in thier manner of living. They 
expect soon to manufacture all thier own clothing 
--many of them live in comfortable houses and 
dress like white people, but others still wear 
the blanket and are much given to dissipation They have a late become anxious that 
thier children should be educated, provided it 
could be done in thier own nation, but are 
generally averse to sending them abroad for 
this purpose. They have made application to 
our Government for thier school fund to be ap- 
propriated to education in thier nation, instead of 
its being spent at the Chactaw Accademy as hereto- 
fore. They have at this time but one school, and 
that is continued throughout the year. They have 
recently passed severe laws to prohibit the vending 
of ardent spirits among them; which took effect 
about six months ago, and those who had been 
opposed to the law have seen the good effects of 
it and become satisfied. Many of the slaves and Indians appear 
sober and religious--some of the slaves are approved 
preachers, and hold meeting regularly on first days; 
We attended one of these meetings, which was 
conducted in a moderate and becoming manner. 
It was composed of Indians, slaves and thier 
masters. Thier minister was an uneducated slave: 
all seemed interested in thier meeting, and several 
much effected, even unto tears. A slaveholder told us he was willing his 
slaves should go to these meetings, for it made 
them better men and women. The Creeks have long been slave holders, 
and appear insensible on the subject of this 
great evil. Thier laws respecting thier slaves 
and the Government of thier Tribe are similar to 
those of the Cherokees and Choctaws. Thier Country is good for agriculture, will 
watered and timbered, and we believe this Nation 
would soon become a prosperous and flourishing 
people, were it not for the injustice and de- 
structive influence of slavery within and around 
thier borders. A few days previous to our arriving 
there, about Five hundred slaves ran away from 
thier masters. They belonged in the Creek and 
Cherokee nations; this caused much excitement 
and a posse was sent after them from both 
nations. Both Church and State seemed 
aroused on account of these desertions, and ready 
to make every possible effort to recover them 
at all hazards; and in future to enact more 
stringent laws for the government of thier slaves, 
and for binding thier Chains more strongly upon 
them. The Choctaw Indians. 
fifth day of the week and first of Twelfth 
month 1842. After having finished our visit 
to the Cherookees, Creeks, and Seminoles, we 
hired a private conveyance to Fort Smith, on 
the border of the Choctaw nation. We there 
took horses and rode fifteen miles to the Choctaw 
Agency and put up at a Tavern kept by an 
Indian woman. In the evening we had some 
conversation with a young Indian who had been 
educated at the Choctaw accademy in Kentucky; he 
was not very 
flattering. We learned while in the 
Nation that at the Council lately held on 
Red River, the Choctaws resolved not to have 
anything more to do with that school. Their annual Council was in Session 
near the Red River where the greater part of 
the Choctaws reside. Many of the Indians near Red River are 
said to live well, they keep slaves, and raise 
Cotton for thier own consumption, and for mar- 
ket, they also raise corn, wheat, potatoes and 
other vegetables, and keep large stocks of neat 
cattle, horses and swine, and a few of them 
have sheep, and make some cotton and woolen 
goods for thier slaves and for themselves. They have in general comfortable log houses 
and live like the new settlers in the west. They have six or eight schools in the nation, 
where the primary branches of an english education 
are taught; there are however but a small por- 
tion of the Choctaw Children who are recieving 
and education at schools, either in or out of the 
nation. We were informed that the Council 
now in Session, have resolved to establish two 
manual labour schools on an extensive plan. 
One them is to be located on Red River, 
and the other at Fort Coffee on Arkansas 
River; and one important feature in the 
plan about to be adopted by them is, that 
the female children of the nation, are to be 
educated at a place several miles distant from 
where the males are educated. They have appropriated Eighteen Thousand 
Dollars towards the support of these schools. It was reported that the Methodists were 
expecting to have the control of the one at Fort 
Coffee. We visited one of thier primary schools 
taught by a man from South Carolina, which 
consisted of about Twenty Scholars. We were 
pleased with the appearance of it, and thought 
the teacher was doing well for the scholars. He informed us that he had been engaged 
in this school since 1838. and had a salary of 
Eight hundred and fifty Dollars per annum. The Country owned by the Choctaws 
extends from the Arkansas to the Red River, and 
is generally fertile and well adapted to the grow- 
th of cotton, corn, wheat, and potatoes. Some of the Indians have embraced Chris- 
tianity, but the greater part of them still ad- 
here to thier old traditions. Some have become 
temparate, but dissipation, idleness, and thier kin- 
dred views are very prevalent amongst most of 
them. The Government and Civil policy of 
this Nation are similar to that of the Cherokees 
heretofore discribed. We saw a few of the 
Chickasaws, but ascertaining that there was no 
material difference between these Indians and 
the Choctaws, we did not consider ti important 
for us to make a special visit to them. They are settled on the Choctaws land, and 
speak the same language, and intermarry with 
them. General Remarks. After having spent several months in 
travelling among the Indians located on our 
western frontier; and having used our ut- 
most endeavours to gather such facts and 
information as we apprehended might be 
useful or interesting to our Society and the 
Community at large; we deem it right for 
us to submit points; for the future con- 
sideration and action of the Society of Friends 
on behalf of the Aborigines of our land. During our visit among the Indians 
many circumstances were apparent, which in our 
opinion tended to prevent thier advancement 
in civilization and otherways. We are aware that much labour and prop- 
erty is expended yearly on thier behalf, and yet 
it is sad to relate that these poor benighted and 
almost friendless beings are daily diminishing in 
numbers, and sinking deeper and deeper in misery 
and woe. There are but few to look into thier 
wants, or to raise a voice against the mal-practices 
of the numerous unprincipaled white men who 
infest thier country in order to obtain the mon- 
ey annually paid to them; and 
at the same time are practising the most degra- 
ding and immoral conduct. If the hand of the destroyer is not spee- 
dily staid, in all human probability it will be but 
a few years before this once numerous race will 
be numbered with the nations are not. Nearly all the Tribes are decreasing yearly, 
and some of them at the rapid rate of from tw- 
elve to twenty per cent. The present condition of the elder part 
of the uncivilized Tribes is such (having long been 
a prey to the unprincipaled white men,) that we 
can not look for much change for the better 
in many of them--yet in beholding the younger 
men and women, and the little children, who all 
appeared endowed with talents for improvement 
equal to the whites, we were encouraged to look 
forward with a hope of better days, for this poor 
unfortunate and almost friendless people, if the 
christian community should without delay use 
thier influence to remove the prominent obstacles 
now in the way of thier civilization. First, we would remark that the Indians 
who have been removed from the east to the west 
side of the Mississippi River appear to be in an 
unsettled state, and entertain fears of being again 
removed. They say they have no guarantee from 
Government, that they shall remain on these lands 
any longer time than it may suit the convinience 
of the whites; and some of them are desirous that 
friends should use thier influence to have thier 
lands secured to them, in fee simple for ever; that 
thier fears on this account may be quieted, and 
they encouraged to lay up something for themselves 
and thier children. Secondly--Nearly all the Tribes have annuities 
paid them in goods or money, quite sufficient in 
most cases to make them comforable during the 
year, if rightly applied. Each Tribe recieves all 
thier money at one payment, and this money passes 
from them in the course of a few days; and in 
nearly every instance the poor ignorant Indian has 
nothing of value to show for it, but is in fact 
made more miserable on account of it We would suggest to the Committee that it 
may be proper for our Society to use thier influ- 
ence, in endeavouring to bring about a change 
in the manner in which these payments are 
made, so as to place thier money if possible, out 
of the reach of whiskey sellers, licensed traders and 
agents of the Fur companies. We are aware, that to effect such a change 
would be attended with much diffuculty; but the good 
that would arise to the Indians would warrant friends 
in making some sacrifice, to effect so desirable an 
object. The Indians in thier present state are very 
improvident; and in most cases incapable of 
managing thier affairs, and expending thier money 
to advantage. We would not hold out to the world, that 
they are recieving more than thier due, but in 
as much as the Government consider them as 
thier wards, they should extend thier guardianship 
a little further, and not leave them so much exposed 
to the avaricious unprincipled traders. The Indians in general are not governed by 
by moral or religious principles, and every means is 
used to place before them such things as will entice 
thier appetites and passions; and having but little 
to restrain them, they are immediately drawn into 
temptation; and the work of destruction goes on, 
while they are possessed of anything that is valuable, 
or have any credit left. We believe it may be proper for Friends 
to urge upon our Government the necessity of adopting 
more effectual measures to prevent this work of 
destruction against this deeply aggrieved and injured 
people; for however well disposed Government may 
be in paying them large annuities; it is in our 
view an undeniable fact, that the Indians are 
made more miserable by any dollar of annuity 
money paid them--and that if this money must con- 
tinue to be thus wasted, it would be far better to 
have it paid directly to the whiskey dealers and traders; 
and an incalculable amount of misery would be sa- 
ved to the Indians by such a change. Another source of immorality and misery is 
thier near location to the Military posts. While the ostensible object of these fortifica- 
tions is to guard the Indians on the frontier, from 
being harmed by the wild Tribes, and to prevent 
hostilities between them and the frontier settlers, 
the licentiousness practiced by the soldiery and the 
female Indians in every Tribe, is too gross to be 
mentioned; the effect of which is to destroy the 
morals of many of the whites, and to entail wretch- 
edness, misery and death upon thousands of the 
Indians. In regard to thier farming operations, we 
would remark; that the manner in which Government 
expends the Indian appropriations for agriculture is 
to prepare and carry on a farm at a suitable 
place on the land owned by the Tribe, as a pat- 
tern or sample farm--this manner of farming 
is attended with considerable expence, and in most 
cases, of little apparent adbantage to the Indians, 
they being more like children, who cannot 
set themselves to work, but might be assisted 
in carrying it on; if they had for a few 
years suitable instructors, not only to show, but 
also to help them do the work. Therefore we thought, to warrant success, 
it would be important to employ persons, to 
give daily attention, and assist each Indian 
in the management of his own particular lot. One man could assist twenty or more persons, 
and it would be desirable that some of these 
men should have wives with them, who should 
be employed to instruct the women in the 
various branches of housewifery, for we think 
much more may be expected, from the im- 
provement of the women than the men; the 
women being more associated with the chil- 
dren, and much better acquainted with habits 
of industry. This mode of instruction would 
not be attended with much more expense, than 
the pattern farm system, and would promise 
better success. Those Indians who live in wigwams are 
much inclined to rove, and it is not uncommon for them 
to remove several times during the summer--on this account 
it seemed very important that they should be encouraged 
to abandon the wigwam altogether, and to live in houses, 
and to have private lots attached well enclosed, so that 
an individual interest might be excited, instead of 
having things in common as they now do; for unless 
such an interest can be raise among them, it will be 
very difficult to make much improvement in many of 
the Tribes. We would also give a few hints upon 
education. The Indians being so prejudiced aga- 
inst the white people, are very much averse to 
thier children being educated by them, either 
in or out of thier own nation; and boys who 
have been educated abroad, are treated with much 
neglect when they return home; and these having 
into favour with thier Tribe, return to the hab- 
its and practices of uncivilized Indians. We regretted that there were no educated 
Indians employed as teachers or assistants, in any 
of the Tribes, white people supplying such 
places entirely. But we believe that much 
advantage might arise in many respects, both 
to parents and children, by encouraging native 
teachers and assistants; and we would suggest 
that special care be taken to bring about 
so desirable an object. Having completed the foregoing 
statement of facts, from extended notes taken 
during the course of our journey, which oc- 
cupied us from the latter part of the eighth 
month to the last of the year 1842, during 
which we were partakers of many mercies and 
preservations, we submit it to the consideration 
and disposal of our dear friends of the Commit- 
tees of New England and New York Yearly 
Meetings. (Signed,) John D Lang 
Samuel Taylor Jun. 4th Month 19th 1843. INDIANA YEARLY MEETING, 1861. REPORT of the COMMITTEE ON THE EXAMINATION of the SCHOOL ESTABLISHMENT AMONG THE 
SHAWNEES. TO THE YEARLY MEETING: The Committee to visit Friends Institution among the Shawnees in Kansas, have attended to 
the appointment, and are united in reporting, that we visited the Establishment about the middle of 
the Sixth-month, and were kindly received by James Stanley and Rachel , his wife, the Superinten- 
dent and Matron in charge, and Lydia Butler , the Teacher of the School. We found the premises 
in as good order as circumstances would well admit of, and the family and Indian children enjoying 
good health generally. The School consisted of 24 children, 12 boys and 12 girls, to-wit: 7 Shaw- 
nees, 10 Wyandotts, 1 Stockbridge, 1 Brothertown, 1 Seneca, 1 Chippewa, 1 New York 
Indian, and 3 white children of the family27 in all. The general order of the family and school 
was goodas good perhaps as we might expect to find in any family of nearly 40 persons. All of 
the Indian children can now speak English, excepting five, who had been recently admitted. They 
all appear to be making good progress in learning under the efficient management and instruction 
of their present teacher. We were highly gratified, in particular, with their recitations in Geogra- 
phy, and their answers in Scripture. They are nearly all orphans, having either no parents, or only 
one parent living. About 20 other children had lately been offered to the Superintendent by the 
Ottowas, whom he had postponed receiving on account of the low state of his means to sustain the 
expences. The Farm consists of 320 acres of first rate land; of this, about 100 acres are in corn, 40 in wheat, 
25 in oats, 25 in meadow, 5 rented out, 10 about the buildings, and the rest, about 115 acres not broken, 
and the greater part in shrub-woods. The crops all looked wellexcept that the cultivation of the 
corn was behind handthe season having been very favorable; but we believed that the Superinten- 
dent was overcharged with cares, in proportion to his means, and feared that part of the crop might 
suffer for want of attention. We have since understood that this has been the case, partly on ac- 
count of protracted wet weather. It will be observed, that so far as the Shawnees are concerned, the school is nearly a failure, as 
only 7 of their children out of 200 to 250 belonging to that tribe, are now receiving its benefits. We 
believe this decline, as to them, is owing to several causes. One probably is, the unsettlement in the 
minds of the tribe. Most of them are farmers, and they are located upon a district of land, not ex- 
celled probably by any other in Kansas, and having few equals even in the rich valleys of the West. 
But their annuities, which have been paid them for some years by our government, instead of excit- 
ing them to industry, economy, and spirited improvement, would appear to have had a contrary effect, 
by enabling them to live in indolence, and contract habits of vice and drunkenness, leading to de- 
generacy: also to cause them to be infested with a class of rapacious whites, whose example and in- 
fluence are deleterious in a high degree. There are some Shawnees, however, who are exceptions 
to this, who are moral and temperate; and are well off as to property: but there is a general rest- 
lessness among them, owing to the above cause, and to their aversion to becoming subject to the 
State laws, and hence a disposition to sell their lands, and remove to the southern border ofKansas , 
where they can again be more exclusively to themselves. Another reason is, there are some district day schools organized, so that some who desire to do 
so, can and do send their children to those schools; and thus they are able to give their children 
some education without parting with them from their families. They are reputed to be indulgent, 
and to be sensitive as to the treatment which their children must sometimes receive in the Boarding 
Schools in order to subject them to the required discipline. Another, and perhaps the greatest on their part, it the natural carelessness usually prevailing 
in ignorant and uncivilized communities as to education itself. Few of them, therefore, take much 
interest in the schools. To the foregoing may be added, on our part, 1. A lack of sufficient funds to prosecute the 
concern to the best advantage; 2. Overtaxing those we employ with more services than they are 
able to perform to profit; 3. Too frequent changes in Superintendents and Teachers (for these 
should be devoted persons of much Christian endurance and patience, who can remain in their posi- 
tions for years together); and, 4. A want of that Missionary spirit and those Christian gifts 
which are necessary to success, in the Superintendent, Teachers and others employed in the 
concern. If the foregoing views needed confirmation, examples in point are within observation. A large 
establishment, munificently supplied with income, and every appurtenance (so far as it appears), which 
could well be desired, as to buildings, etc.enjoying the favor and patronage of the government, 
and of proportions sufficient to educate all the Shawnee children of the tribe, languishes, with a bare 
existence as to a school, nearly to a failure, with very little usefulness, for the same reasons above 
mentioned, and perhaps others in addition. While another establishment, which having not suffered 
for want of sufficient means, but which has had one persevering and devoted Superintendent for 24 
years, has in it more than 60 students of the tribe in which it is located, and is in prosperous and 
profitable progress. We give it as the judgment of the Committee, that the success of an Institution of this kind de- 
pends, under Providence, upon the employment of well qualified Superintendents and Teachers, who 
will remain with some degree of permanence, in the work, and give their hearts conscientiously to it; 
and that such qualification and devotedness are indispensable. It now appears probable, that the title, in fee-simple, to the land upon which our Institution is lo- 
cated, will be obtained by treaty before very long, as the Shawnees have given their consent, and 
the present administration in our government, will probably favor it; if, however, this shall fail, the 
premises may be obtained by purchase, under the treaty of 1854, if rightly attended to. But if this 
shall not be the result, and if the premises pass out of our possession, we would favor employing the 
proceeds of the value of the improvements to the purchase of other property in some suitable loca- 
tion for a Boarding School for Indian children without distinction of tribe: for we believe that the 
hearts of Friends are warm in this work of benevolence and labor of love, and that they will contri- 
bute for its support and continuance, if they can be satisfied that their contributions and their labors 
are efficient and profitable. But we believe the prospect of extensive benefit to the Shawnees exclu- 
sively, is not sufficiently encouraging, for the future, to justify the labor, care and expenditure, which 
are indispensible to such an establishment. Much good has been done to the Shawnees, as a tribe, 
since our Society first commenced their labors with thema fact which they freely, and many of 
them gratefully acknowledgebut the state of things is now so changed, that a change in our course 
of proceeding is called for. We unhesitatingly believe, that a well conducted Indian Boarding School, for the benefit of the 
half-civilized and wild tribes of the West, from whom we might wish to receive children to educate, 
under the management of Christian officers of adequate ability and permanence as aforesaid, with an 
ample appropriation of means, might and would be sufficiently patronized by; the Indians that its 
success, under Providence, would be certain; and that its advantages to them would be inestimable. 
Without the requisites above named, such an Institution would be a failure. A large proportion 
perhaps nearly all of the children sent to such an Institution would be orphans; but this would not 
in the least militate against the workon the contrary, it would be desirable, for such children re- 
main with fewer interruptions of absence, and for a longer time in the Institution. And above all, 
it should be the united effort, uppermost in the mind, that while we labor to instruct them in litera- 
ture, agriculture, housewifery, moral discipline, and the arts of civilized life, their religious instruc- 
tion in the principles, precepts, and doctrines of Christianity should be carefully attended to. We 
would heartily commend the modification of the present, of the establishment of a new Institution 
of the character here designated, to the solid and weighty consideration of the Yearly Meeting. 
To accomplish anything valuable, requires a mind disposed to act, a willingness to be made useful under 
Divine influence, in promoting the welfare and happiness of our fellow men, with our labor and 
means, and with those abilities, which are given to us for a good end; and when these are guided 
by prudence, discretion, and a prayerful spirit, leaning with an humble reliance for help, of the arm 
of Divine Power and Goodness, there is every reason to believe that His favor and blessing will be 
granted, when thus engaged under His sanction. In the management of such an Institution, the Book Accounts of the establishment should be 
kept full, clear and explicit, and if the Institution be under the care of a Committee, a clear quar- 
terly statement of account-current should be laid before them; and no one should be entrusted with 
the management of the finances and affairs of such a concern who is incapable of keeping such book 
accounts accurately and explicitly, nor any one who does not manage his own affairs successfully 
and economically. We also think the Committee should hold their meetings frequently at the establishment; the 
advantages of which are too obvious to require comment. And inasmuch as many valuable Friends 
are now settled in Kansas, with a prospect of more, we propose that the Committee which is now 
standing be dissolved, either the present year or at no very distant date; and that a new one be 
appointed, most of whom shall be residents of Kansas: and that they meet quarterly, and at the 
premises of the school at least twice in the year. Also, that one or two Friends be appointed as 
correspondents with the Committee for each Quarterly Meeting, and residing in the limits thereof, 
and that they and the Committee hold an annual meeting together at Whitewater, at the time of the 
Yearly Meeting, and make a united annual Report, showing the expenses for the year, and the gen- 
eral finances in a condensed account-current, also the number of students, and a careful summary 
of their progress and general condition. In conclusion, we wish to say that, in the foregoing remarks and statements, there is no inten- 
tion to cast reflection upon any one who is now, or who has heretofore been, connected with the 
establishment; but to give candidly, as appears to be our duty, our views and convictions relative 
thereto. ELIJAH COFFIN , 
JONATHAN BALDWIN , 
WM. H. COFFIN . Eighth Month 12th, 1861. Minutes of the Conference. At a Conference of Representatives of Seven Yearly Meetings of the SOCIETY OF FRIENDS, held by appointment on the 
20th of First month, 1869, to take into consideration Christian duty in the present condition of Indian affairs, the following 
Friends were present: On behalf of Ohio, Indiana, Western, and Iowa Yearly Meetings
JOHN BUTLER , ENOCH HOAG . New England Yearly Meetings
WILLIAM C. TABER , GEORGE HOWLAND, Jr. 
GILBERT CONGDON . New York Yearly Meeting
WILLIAM WOOD , WILLIAM B. COLLINS , 
AUGUSTUS TABER , BENJAMIN TATHAM . Baltimore Yearly Meeting
RICHARD M. JANNEY , FRANCIS T. KING , 
JAMES CARY , JAMES C. THOMAS. 
 BENJAMIN TATHAM was appointed Clerk. JOHN BUTLER and ENOGH HOAG informed the conference that they had received from senator POMEROY , of Kansas, a copy 
of the Bill presented by him to the Senate, and that he desired it should be examined by the members of the conference for such 
suggestions as may appear to them desirable. The Bill was accordingly read, and referred to a Committee of six for examination 
and report. The attention of the conference was called to the Report of the Joint Special Committee of Congress and that of the Indian 
Peace Commissioners and other documents relating to the condition and treatment of the Indians; and after discussing this subject, 
it was decided to address a memorial to Congress to urge that sufficient provision be made to insure justice and protection to the 
 Indians, and for their civilization. A Committee of seven was accordingly appointed to draft an essay, and present it to a future 
session. The conference then adjourned to 8 oclock, P.M., at which time it met. The Committee appointed to examine the bill of the Senator from Kansas to create a department of Indian affairs, reported 
that its provisions were generally approved, but that some parts of it appeared to require modification. The several clauses were 
then read, and the Committee was requested to inform Senator POMEROY of our views in accordance with his request. The Committee on the memorial presented an essay, which was read and referred back for amendment. The conference 
then adjourned to half-past 9 oclock on the 21st instant. 1st mo., 21st. Conference assembled. The Committee presented a draft of memorial to Congress, which was read, and after 
revision, adopted, and a committee was appointed to have 750 copies printed for presentation to Congress and for distribution in 
our meetings. It was then proposed, and after careful consideration, agreed, that an address to our fellow-citizens should be prepared, 
setting forth the treatment and condition of the Indians, and our indibidual responsibility in reference to it, and to this service a 
committee of six was appointed. In order to allow time for members of the conference to proceed to Washington, to urge upon members of Congress this sub- 
ject of our concern, the convention adjourned to the evening of 7th day, 23rd, when it again convened. The Friends who had been 
to Washington, reported that they were kindly received by several Members of Congress and others interested in the objects of our 
meeting, and that arrangements had been made for an interview with the Committees of both houses of Congress on Indian affairs 
in a joint meeting for that purpose; and also for a meeting with General GRANT , to take place on the 25th Instant. The Committee on the public address presented an essay which, upon a subsequent meeting was agreed upon, and referred 
for completion and publication in pamphlet form, and in the public press. It was agreed that 10,000 copies should be printed and 
distributed as follows:--for Iowa, Indiana and Ohio, and New York yearly meetings, each 1500 copies; Western and Baltimore, 
each 1,000 copies and New England 2,000 copies. It was also agreed that the publication in the public press should be left to Friends 
in their respective neighborhoods. On 2nd day, evening, the conference met pursuant to adjournment, and the following Report was submitted to be entered on 
our minutes. We met the Committees of the two houses of Congress as previously arranged. Our memorial was read and the object of our 
interview freely discussed. General HARNEY , who had recently arrived from the scene of his peaceful operations with the Great 
Sioux Nation, numbering 28,000 individuals, was present, and fully confirmed the position assumed by the Indian Peace Commission- 
ers, that it is easier, better, and cheaper to conquer the Indians by kindness and justice than by all the forces of unscrupulous war. We then called upon General GRANT , and were introduced by Senator WILSON , of Massachusetts. After stating the object of 
our visit, to which he listened with respectful attention, he informed us that he was familiar with the past management of Indian 
affairs, and sensible of the injustice to which they have been subjected,--and he expressed his views sufficiently at length to show 
that he desired, so far as he could, to remedy the abuses of our Indian system. We then called upon the Committee on Appropriations, and had a satisfactory interview with a prominent member of that 
committee, who explained some of the difficulties which surround the subject. He assured us of the desire of Congress to have the 
money, to which the Indians were entitled, faithfully applied for the benefit; and he expressed the confident belief that it the 
Society of Friends, or any other religious or benevolent association, in whom Congress could feel confidence, would establish mis- 
sions amongst the Indians, and send competent and reliable persons to instruct and aid them in the arts of civilized life, Congress 
would appropriate all the money necessary to that end. Upon a review of the facts now reported, it is the judgment of the Conference that full information should be given to the 
members of all our Yearly Meetings, so that any right concern to labor in the field which has thus opened before us, may be 
encouraged and carried out. And it is our united belief that the remuneration of the agents and representatives of our Religious 
Society should be defrayed by the society, and not diminish the Indians funds. We feel that in assembling together our own weakness and inability to labor in the vineyard of our Lord, except as called and aided 
by His Holy Spirit, we separate in mutual love, and desires that each of us shall faithfully attend to every duty that may open 
before, and be laid upon us. Signed, on behalf of the Conference, 
BENJAMIN TATHAM, Clerk.BALTIMORE, 1st mo. 25, 1869. To the Senate and House of Representatives 
in Congress assembled: The Memorial of the undersigned, representatives of Seven Yearly Meetings 
of the Religious Society of Friends in the States of MAINE, NEW HAMPSHIRE, MASSACHU- 
SETTS, VERMONT, RHODE ISLAND, CONNECTICUT, NEW YORK, MICHIGAN, MARYLAND, VIR-
GINIA. OHIO, INDIANA, ILLINOIS, IOWA and KANSAS, 
Respectfully represents:-- That we have met in the City of Baltimore unitedly to consider our Christian 
duty in reference to the present condition of the Indians of our country. Whilst thus engaged, having before us the Report of the Joint Special Committee 
of Congress upon the Condition of the Indian Tribes, printed January 26, 1867, and that 
of the Indian Peace Commission, January 14th, 1868, and subsequent reports of the civil 
and military proceedings in reference to the Indians, we have realized the deep responsibility 
which rests upon all members of a community professing to be Christians, in their dealings 
and intercourse with the feeble remnants of the aboriginal inhabitants of this land. In contemplating the disgraceful facts revealed in those Reports, and the admission of 
our own witnesses that our wars with the Indians, which have been almost constant, have been 
uniformly caused by injustice on the part of our white citizens and of Government officials,* 
we are reminded of the fact that the Treaty of the Indians with William Penn was faith- 
fully kept during the seventy years, in which the Government of Pennsylvania was admin- 
istered upon the principles of its founder; and history tells us that Whilst the surrounding 
Colonies were ever and anon at war with the Indians, and the scalping knife and tomahowk 
brought to death and terror to many a hearth, the Pennsylvanians and all their possessions 
remained uninjured.The Indians remembered the Treaty with the sons of Onas (Penn) 
and kept it inviolate. Is there any reason to suppose that the Indians of the present day are less disposed 
to be faithful to their engagements than were their ancestors? The testimony of Colonel 
Bent, confimed by other witnesses, before the Joint Committee above referred to, states, 
after thirty-six years experience in the vicinity of the Indians against whom the United 
States Army is now engaged in hostile operations, that nearly every instance of difficulties 
between the Indians and the whites during his residence there, were from aggressions on the 
Indians by the whites. And after giving an interesting detail of the causes which have, 
directly or indirectly, led to the present deplorable state of affairs, this experienced witness 
closed his testimony with these remarkable words: If the matter were left to me I would 
guaranty with my life that in three months I could have all the Indians along the Arkansas 
at peace, without the expense of war. But we do not desire to dwell upon the sickening history of the past except to 
guard against its repetition in the future. Whilst the white men, whose brutal murders 
have brought upon many innocent settlers the vengence of an outraged savage for, still go 
unpunished, with blood their hands demand the extermination of the Indians, 
many of the Tribes, both innocent and guilty of retaliation, have been destroyed by the 
sword, and their survivors have been reduced to subjection, and have submitted themselves 
to the sense of justice in the white man's breast. Whilst we have no sympathy with wrong or outrage of any kind, we cannot but 
express the hope that the further shedding of blood shall cease, and that the leniency which 
becomes a powerful nation may be extended to the children of the forest who have been 
struggling for their right to live upon the soil of their ancestors. Mercy to him that shows it, is the rule 
And righteous limitation of its act, 
By which heaven moves in pardoning guilty man; 
And he that shows none, being ripe in years, 
And conscious of the outrage he commits, 
Shall seek it, and not find it, in his turn. *But it is said that our wars with them have been almost constant. Have we been uniformly 
unjust? We answer unhesitatingly, yes! See Peace Commissioners' Report, signed by Taylor , Henderson , 
Sherman , Harney , Sanborn , Terry , Tappan and Augur .--January 7, 1868. 